Part 3. Chapter 62 to 100.

What made the desert life bearable was the scorpion that led Livia and its group. She hadn’t known they lived in groups until she discovered dozens of them hiding near the spring. The ones that had initially shown wariness when Livia first arrived had grown familiar with her, coming to play with Tuktuk and touching her.

Tuktuk was the baby scorpion that had first brought Livia here. It had kept circling around her, so she gave it a name, and it seemed to respond as if it understood.

It was a fascinating creature. In this place where she had to endure time without purpose, Tuktuk became a small source of vitality.

Livia stayed near the spring and interacted with the scorpions. Despite their fearsome appearance, the scorpions were quite cute, and their actions were clumsy.

They weren’t particularly skilled at hunting, often losing their prey to desert rats or simply dropping it. Unable to merely watch, Livia occasionally helped them hunt. Then even a mother scorpion carrying two babies on her back began circling around Livia.

Seeing how it appeared to be asking for food, Livia gladly caught small insects and brought them. Fortunately, there was plenty of food for the scorpions near the spring.

The scorpions always repaid Livia’s help. For instance, they would give her half of the spider they had struggled to hunt…. Though it wasn’t something Livia needed, she smiled at their touching gesture.

How many days have passed here?

How much time had passed outside the trial?

Though she felt anxious, she also thought this moment wasn’t so bad. Everything was harmless. Nothing hurt or troubled her. When she zoned out, even the momentary sadness of remembering her family would blur. Though somewhat boring, it was peaceful. She wanted to stay frozen like this. So much that she thought it would be fine if this trial never ended. Just like this, for a little while, just a little….

Livia fell asleep peacefully with her forehead resting on her knees. Tuktuk approached and leaned against her.

The peace was shattered that very night.

As if waiting for her to let her guard down, an incident occurred.

“What, what’s happening? No! Don’t fight!”

Intruders entered the cave. It was another group of scorpions. The red-striped scorpions tore apart and killed the scorpions that had shared life with Livia. The mother scorpion carrying babies on her back, Tuktuk’s father who had torn and shared half a spider with Livia, the small group of scorpions for whom Livia had built homes with stone piles.

They all died, either torn in half or burst open.

The black scorpions rushed in recklessly to defend their territory, and the intruders also charged in, willing to risk death to seize this abundant territory.

Watching the scorpions die with a pale face, Livia helped the black scorpions drive away the red-striped ones. She stomped some to death, stabbed some with her knife, and in anger, crushed others with rocks.

The scorpions’ war was easily settled with Livia’s intervention. The black scorpions were delighted. They had saved their territory, their cave! Though words couldn’t be exchanged, she could feel everyone’s joy. Livia was happy too. Her heart, which had been pounding from the sudden, horrific battle between scorpions, wouldn’t easily calm down. It should be fine now. Yes, it would be fine.

Livia slumped down and blankly stared at the corpse of a red-striped scorpion sprawled near the spring. Her chest ached sharply.

However, the peace didn’t last long.

The poison spread by the dying red-striped scorpions had contaminated the spring. Several black scorpions died helplessly after unknowingly drinking the water. A small snake nearby perished as well.

They had to abandon the cave they had fought so hard to protect. Livia also couldn’t stay there anymore. She followed the black scorpions to another location. Fortunately, they found another cave. However….

Livia watched with a distorted face as grey scorpions confronted the black scorpions.

‘What is this….’

Watching the scorpions start another war for the fertile cave, something crumbled inside Livia. Though the black scorpions were fewer in number, they were strong, while the grey scorpions were more numerous but smaller. The scorpions fought fiercely again. It had to be fierce as survival was at stake. As Livia watched in bewilderment from behind, Tuktuk tapped her feet.

She seemed to hear Tuktuk’s voice asking what she was doing, telling her to come fight together. Though it must have been an auditory hallucination, at that moment it felt real. Livia stared blankly at Tuktuk before approaching the scorpions. This time, instead of fighting alongside them as before, she tried to mediate between the two scorpion groups.

The cave was large, and the spring was wide, so it seemed sufficient for both scorpion groups to live together.

“Scorpions, don’t fight. Fighting will only end up hurting all of you. Hey! This place is already large enough…!”

But the scorpions didn’t listen to Livia. No, it seemed they couldn’t hear her voice at all. It was natural. How could a human’s voice reach scorpions?

Though she had believed they had connected, it wasn’t true.

They were scorpions, and Livia was human.

The black scorpions won the fight. They easily claimed the other cave and gained access to cleaner water. But Livia wasn’t happy.

Not happy at all.

Every time she fell asleep, she worried about other scorpions invading. As she had feared, fights were frequent, and the number of dead scorpions increased.

Among that number was the small scorpion that had led her here.

Tuktuk….

Livia gently pushed the limp small scorpion. The scorpion was helplessly pushed aside by her finger. The one who would normally raise its pincers and wave them around thinking she was playing showed no response.

…Could it be sleeping? Maybe it had fallen into a deep sleep, exhausted from the fight.

“Tuktuk…. Tuktuk. Wake up. Okay?”

Livia waited. For this small scorpion to wake from its deep sleep and raise its pincers… Or to raise its tail sharply as if angry at being woken up. But Tuktuk didn’t move. Not the next day, nor the day after that, and not the day after that either. Livia had to acknowledge it belatedly.

Tuktuk was dead.

Now there was no scorpion to tap her toes. No scorpion to sting her gently with its tail when startled.

How had she become so attached to something like this….

Livia carefully placed the dead Tuktuk in her palm and buried it in a sunny spot. A tear dropped with a plop onto her hand as she patted the ground.

Livia was tired. Exhausted. Damn trial, cursed trial! Trial! Trial!

She was sick of everything – the cold that felt like it was separating flesh from bone, being isolated in darkness, spending time alone growing attached to small scorpions she couldn’t even communicate with, getting involved in the conflicts of beings different from herself.

“But it’s confusing.”

“Somewhere it must be very uncomfortable, irritating, and painful.”

The god of the sea was truly a bastard.



Livia no longer stayed close to the scorpions. They fought often, though some days were peaceful. Then they would struggle through their own crises and fight again. Livia observed from afar before eventually turning away from them.

Outside the cave was barren desert, and inside the cave, conflicts frequently occurred. Livia was just sick of it all and wanted to rest now. She curled up deep in the cave. A sense of helplessness overwhelmed her.

How much longer would she have to stay here…. Why was she here?

A long time passed. Livia tried endlessly walking through the desert, tried drowning herself in the deep water where animals gathered, but when she opened her eyes, she was back in this place.

Again, a long time passed. Or honestly speaking, she couldn’t tell how much time had passed. To Livia, it just felt like terribly boring and futile time crawling by.

When would this trial end? Livia felt she had aged considerably. Though she couldn’t see a mirror, she thought she must have become middle-aged or elderly. Livia felt herself growing weaker.

The fatigue of enduring for so long also wore her down. Though she tried hurling curses into the air and banging her head against the wall, this nightmare-like trial wouldn’t end.

‘Triton, what do you want from me?’

She crawled into the darkness and just endured time. She didn’t want to see anything – sunlight, desert, scorpions, animals, nothing. Her body, stiff as stone, ached.

Even passing wind made her skin throb, and even brief sunlight felt like it would scorch her skin. But what troubled Livia more than that was….

‘I’m lonely.’

The solitude. The helplessness of having to endure alone endlessly weighed her down.

Livia didn’t want to acknowledge it. She couldn’t acknowledge it. She didn’t want to accept the fact that she had become weak because of such things.

And so Livia stubbornly endured again.

She endured.

She en…dured.

En….

‘….’

Livia’s expressionless face slowly contorted. Her body, parched from refusing to drink water, couldn’t produce tears.

How much time had passed? She crawled out and frantically dug up the ground where she had buried Tuktuk. Perhaps not as much time had passed as she felt. If there were still traces of Tuktuk in this sand…!

“Ah….”

But there was nothing under the sand.

“Ah…. Ahhh!”

Tuktuk had disappeared without a trace. That small life had already decayed and become part of the desert. That’s how much time had passed. That’s how much time she had spent here.

Ah, this cursed god of the sea.

Livia, swallowing her tearless cry, stumbled and collapsed on the ground. The rough floor seemed to undulate up and down. It looked just like the sea, like waves, and it made her grind her teeth.

bastard.

bastard….

A small beam of light touched Livia’s head as she sobbed. Livia noticed it was someone’s touch. As she suddenly rose and glared at the empty air, she had to admit. She wanted to wake up from this insufferable nightmare.

So, get me out of here now.

“…Triton.”

At that one name spoken in a suppressed voice, the world stopped.

The nightmare that had imprisoned Livia crumbled. Through the gaps of the fake world scattering like ashes, in that pitch-black darkness, a man appeared silhouetted against a hazy light.

With skin that seemed immune to heat, glistening as if moistened, and silver-blue hair that flowed beautifully like the finest silver thread, the man stood alone, proud in the pitch-black darkness.

“Though you knew the answer, you called quite late.”

Though she knew the answer to escape the trial, how stubborn of her. But she had finally broken. Despite all her resistance, hadn’t she finally called his name?

A satisfied smile spread across the face of the man who lifted up the parched and haggard Livia.

A beautiful smile that contrasted with his dark and sinister eyes.



Livia opened her eyes to a headache that felt like her head would split. Looking up at the sky with bleary eyes, she saw the familiar water-colored ceiling and small clownfish swimming through the air.

‘…I’m back.’

Just as relief washed over her, chills ran down her spine.

‘Back? This isn’t even a place I should feel relieved to return to…!’

Though she hadn’t eaten anything, she felt like she would be sick. Livia jumped up from her spot and wrapped her arms around herself with a small groan. Every movement made her acutely aware of each ripple that touched her skin.

Was it because she had endured places that were cold, hot, and burning? Her sense of touch had become hypersensitive.

Normally, after such hardship, shouldn’t one become more numb…. Though Livia found it strange, she couldn’t question anyone since she didn’t know the cause. Her breathing became ragged as she curled up tightly. Her hollow eyes reflected a mixture of anger and fatigue.

She was exhausted.

She wanted to end this quickly. Just as she staggered to rise from her spot, a long black snake suddenly slithered out from under the bed.



Livia’s face froze when she saw the snake.

The black witch Echidna’s snake. Something that shouldn’t be here was present.

The snake flicked its tail playfully in front of Livia and wrapped around her ankle once, displaying an unsettling friendliness. Friendliness – it was an absurd situation.

However, regardless of whether Livia was frozen in surprise, the snake opened its mouth wide and regurgitated something. A small black bottle shot out from inside the snake’s mouth.

The snake extended it toward Livia while opening and closing its widely spread mouth. As its split tongue made a metallic sound in the air, the snake’s language echoed in her mind.

“Triton.”

…Was it telling her to feed this to Triton?

Livia picked up the small bottle the snake had left with her cold, stiff hands. The snake that had been watching turned its body. Livia quickly grabbed the snake.

“Wait.”

While the snake stopped, Livia quickly reached her hand over the snake’s head. Though she wasn’t sure if it would work, she believed the goddess hadn’t spoken meaningless words. Livia drew letters in the air with her finger.

Hydria.

Light began from Livia’s fingertips, drawing lines that soon became letters. The letters transformed into multiple lines, and the lines suddenly became a jar-shaped drawing that enveloped the snake.

“Kyaaaaaaaaah!”

The snake trapped in the jar drawing let out a horrifying scream. Soon there was a bone-chilling sound of breaking bones, and the snake’s head split into three. While a startled Livia stepped back, the snake that had split into three began attacking itself.

‘What, what is this?’

One neck was severed, one eyeball burst. Meanwhile, one snake head began strangling the other two heads by wrapping around them. Black snake blood splattered inside the jar, but none escaped.

Soon, with a thud, even the snake’s body burst. A black finger fell in its place, but even that exploded inside the jar and disappeared without a trace.

The jar, where all the snakes had died and vanished, shook slightly and crumpled, then turned into a single point. And that point cleanly disappeared as if it had never existed in this world.

Everything happened in the blink of an eye.

While she was blankly staring at the empty space, someone entered the bedroom. Startled, she turned to see Audike, holding a large tray of food, staring at Livia with wide eyes.

“Oh my, you’re awake! I was just told to bring some food and wondered if maybe…!”

Audike approached Livia in one breath, her face clearly showing delight. She set down the tray and gently caressed Livia’s cheek with her cool hand.

“You collapsed suddenly and slept for days, your face looks so gaunt. You must be hungry. Quickly, have something….”

Audike, who had been pouring out worried words, froze in surprise. A tear had dropped from Livia’s expressionless eyes that still seemed half-asleep.

“Why, why? Are you in pain? Did you perhaps have a bad dream while sleeping?”

“…Bad dream.”

Livia, who had been echoing part of Audike’s words, let out a bitter laugh.

Days, she said…. Just, only days have passed?

All that painful and lonely time Livia had experienced was just ‘a few days of bad dreams’? Her despair and frustration, her loneliness, all felt like bubbles bursting. What had she endured it all for? Why was she even here?

The answer was already set. To harm Triton and avenge her family…!

Livia gripped the black bottle the snake had left behind and clenched her teeth. Something hot seemed to block her throat, making her feel nauseous. With her current state of mind, she felt capable of anything.

After a silence, Livia quietly asked Audike.

“Do you know where ‘he’ is?”



Aack-!

Echidna screamed and grabbed her trembling wrist where the flesh had burst. Her pale face looked in disbelief at the hand that had instantly lost three fingers.

“What, what is this….”

Two fingers that should have been there had vanished. To lose them raw, without even using them for a spell!

It was impossible. Moreover, it shouldn’t have happened. This would disrupt her plans.

“Damn it, who, who…!”

Echidna’s sea snake had been perfectly hidden. It had even stayed outside the palace when that human woman wasn’t around, concealing itself completely.

The Golden Palace was Triton’s domain. Of course, all seas were his domain, but the palace was completely in the palm of his hand. That’s why the snake sent there was Echidna’s most meticulously crafted snake, and the one she had imbued with the strongest power. But even so, it shouldn’t have cost three fingers when it was destroyed.

Then someone must have amplified her power and sent it back.

Who could it be? Who? Could Triton have discovered it?

Though she wanted to absorb the snake’s final memories, it had disappeared without leaving any trace, making it impossible. Echidna paced anxiously in the darkness before suddenly stopping.

Her wrinkled face trembled as she glared at the curse spell that was staining the cave floor blood red.

To complete a powerful curse, sacrifices and offerings were needed. The stronger the offering and the greater the sacrifice, the more powerful the curse would become. Echidna was willingly making herself the sacrificial lamb to complete the curse.

Of course, she wasn’t the only sacrifice….

Echidna stared with dark, sunken eyes at the hair spread across the floor. The hair of a mermaid who failed to achieve love and ultimately became ‘sea foam’….

It had been given to the witch in the deep sea by some foolish, pitiful mermaid who wanted to abandon her beautiful tail and gain legs.

She had barely obtained it after searching the deepest depths of the sea. Though the decrepit old witch had struggled not to hand it over, she was no match for Echidna who had returned from the underworld.

Echidna looked down at her fingers, now only three remaining. One on her right hand, two on her left.

This wasn’t enough. With just this….

It seemed she would need more ‘sacrifices.’ Echidna, who had stopped abruptly, pulled up her hood. Her hunched elderly body shrank, and soon a black stingray floated up languidly.

Behind the stingray that had become so small it seemed pathetic, faded red hair placed on the ominous spell circle fluttered weakly.



He had gone into the ‘Spring of Rest’ in the underground cave of the palace just moments ago.

Spring of Rest? How leisurely.

A cold sneer crossed Livia’s face. When she roughly rubbed her tear-stained face with the back of her hand, her face flushed red. The stinging sensation made her irritable.

It was inexplicable why her body had become so sensitive when it had just been a dream. Just a dream that lasted only a few days!

Her body trembled slightly with each running step, and even those small vibrations made her whole body ache. Ignoring the pain, Livia hurried along.

The black snake was surely Echidna’s doing. If so, the black bottle the snake had left behind was likely poison that could harm Triton. The question was how to make him drink it.

She couldn’t just pour it into a glass, nor could she simply hand it to him asking him to try it. They weren’t close enough for such exchanges, and Livia wasn’t patient enough to wait for such a moment.

Then there was only one way.

Livia opened the bottle in front of the entrance to the underground cave where the Spring of Rest was located. A fragrant grape scent rose from the small bottle’s mouth. Too sweet a scent for poison.

Though momentarily puzzled, she didn’t dwell on it long. Without hesitation, she let the sweet poison flow into her own mouth. Then she immediately entered the underground cave.

The man was leisurely resting in the warm, steaming spring. Though he appeared to be sleeping with his eyes closed as he lay there, Livia didn’t believe it.

How keen and cunning was this man? He had sensed her presence even when she was hiding on the temple floor. Pretending not to know she was hiding, he shamelessly pleasured himself, then dragged her out and forced that hideous, massive organ into her mouth.

Even if he wore an innocent face, she mustn’t trust him. Even if he smiled kindly and pretended not to be an enemy, she mustn’t think of him as an ally.

Livia jumped into the spring with reddened eyes. The somewhat hot water overflowed and enveloped her. Her sensitized body screamed with stinging pain at the heat.

As Triton lazily opened his eyes at the splashing sound, Livia grabbed his neck with both hands. Livia’s eyes, full of rage, became wet.

Damn it! She hadn’t wanted to show tears, but they came unbidden. When Livia dug her nails into his neck with an irritated face, he reached out with a smile.

“Quite exhausted, aren’t you, Livia?”

His usually cool hands were warm from being submerged in the hot water. He caressed her tear-stained cheeks with those warm hands.

“Did those foolish scorpions trouble you? Or was it… the trials that wore your body down as you wished? I didn’t put in any monsters, so surely that couldn’t be it, right?”

Each time Triton spouted nonsense, she tightened her grip on his neck, but his face showed no impact. It was as expected. Perhaps this man had anticipated this much as well.

But he wouldn’t have expected what came next.

Livia moved her hands from choking his neck to wrapping around his nape. When she pulled with her insignificant strength, the man’s neck was drawn closer more easily than expected. One eyebrow raised in apparent curiosity. Livia pretended not to notice and lowered her eyes. At the same time, their wet lips overlapped.

Harder, even harder….

Livia pressed his lips firmly until they parted. His mouth opened easily without much effort. Livia split the slightly parted gap with her tongue tip and entered. Then she poured the black bottle’s potion she had been holding in her mouth into his.

Triton briefly furrowed his brow but showed no particular resistance. No, even if he had resisted, she held his neck tightly to ensure he wouldn’t pull away and pushed it in until the end.

Gulp.

When she finally heard the desired sound, Livia tried to separate their lips. But the situation reversed.



Suddenly her nape was caught. A firm hand also encircled her waist, preventing her from struggling. Along with splashing water sounds, her lips were spread wide as if they would tear.

He thrust his tongue deep inside, stabbing at her throat as if performing a piston motion. As she trembled with a gasping sound, the next moment her lower lip was gently sucked.

Having somehow ended up on his lap, she struggled to push him away, causing hot water to splash in all directions. Simultaneously, she felt his erect organ between her spread legs.

Livia shuddered at the creepy sensation. Holding the trembling Livia tightly against him, he pulled her tongue with his firmly erected tongue tip and nibbled it finely. After sucking her lips until Livia was gasping for breath, Triton slowly separated their bodies. The way he licked his lips and savored the taste as if having eaten something delicious was incredibly shameless.

“You, dog….”

“Where did you get Dionysus’s wine?”

“…What?”

Hearing unexpected words, Livia frowned. Triton stroked beneath her reddened eyes and whispered.

“Didn’t you know what you fed me was the wine of pleasure and madness?”

“What are you….”

“Where did you get it? It doesn’t seem like you received it from Dionysus….”

When Livia remained frozen without answering, Triton found the answer himself.

“Echidna gave it to you, didn’t she?”

The woman tried to hide her confusion behind an expressionless face, but it was a futile attempt. Her slightly trembling green eyes were more honest than her false lips. Triton smiled quietly with a face that understood everything.

How naive, to accept whatever was given.

The exhausted expression on the woman’s face caught his attention. This woman’s hardships were both pitiful and lovely to see each time. Every time, she survived to the end with such a deathly face, admirably returning to his side. Even if that wasn’t her intention, Triton quite liked it.

She returns again and again. No matter how many times he kills her, no matter how many trials he gives her, to his side….

Through any storm and tempest, she survived desperately and pointed her blade at him.

Each time he saw her stubborn survival, Triton felt both the desire to completely crush Livia’s will and the wish that she would never realize her challenge could never succeed.

Do you truly believe you can harm me with your own hands? With these small, thin, dry hands…

Oh, foolish Livia. My pitiful, naive human.

Though he considered showing her how trivial these inadequate challenges were to him and breaking her, he would regret not being able to see her crawling back to him again.

And these soft lips and warm, supple flesh he had just tasted were far more to his liking than expected….

Triton traced the sensation on his tongue inside his mouth. That sensation mixed with the thick grape wine fragrance was sweet as if melting his mouth.

“So you fed this to me without even knowing what it was?”

Of course. She had no reason to doubt something given by Echidna who had told her to pierce his heart. She probably thought it was some kind of poison that could harm him.

Moreover, while it had been just a moment for her sleeping body, Livia’s mind had returned after enduring endless trials. It was understandable if she wasn’t in her right mind.

Triton laughed softly and reached into the air. The black bottle Livia had left in front of the underground cave flew into his hand. Seeing her face freeze as if realizing what it was, he grabbed her face.

“Try drinking it yourself. Then you’ll know what kind of wine this is.”

He forcefully parted her lips and poured the remaining wine in. Though Livia, who had frozen, shook her head, the red wine had already flowed down her throat.

Gulp, her throat rippled.

The sound she had been glad to hear from Triton moments ago now returned through Livia’s throat. Triton lightly kissed her pale white lips and said,

“Don’t be afraid, Livia. Unfortunately, it’s not poison.”

blood vessels burst in her eyes as they widened in shock. Forcefully pushing against Triton’s chest with both hands as he tried to come closer, she screamed, cursing at him.

“You vile god! Filthy scoundrel!”

“That’s not wrong.”

“You, you, son of a bitch…!”

“Now that’s not quite right.”

Triton grinned and thrust up the thigh Livia was sitting on. Her back stiffened with a gasp. Cruelty flickered in his ocean-blue eyes.

“Keep going, Livia.”

“…..”

“I get quite excited when you do that.”

Glaring at him with a pale face, Livia drew her golden dagger and frantically swung it at him. She slashed and stabbed at his shoulders, chest, and arms indiscriminately, but only managed to create a few scratches.

…How, how am I supposed to pierce this man’s heart with something like this!

Tears burst forth from frustration and indignation. That made her even more angry, and she bit her lip until it bled, forcefully swallowing her tears.

“Oh, poor Livia.”

Triton’s hand, his voice tinged with laughter, cupped Livia’s reddened cheek. She flinched in surprise and tried to shake off his hand, but it wouldn’t budge. However, the problem wasn’t this man touching her cheek.

‘…Why, why is my body like this?’

Whether it was from being in the hot water, her body grew increasingly hot and her breathing became labored. Moreover, why was that intimate place between her spread legs so itchy?

Whether because of that or not, every time Triton’s erect organ touched her, small moans kept escaping. Her hips moved on their own and her private parts twitched obscenely.

The symptoms worsened at a rapid pace. Before she knew it, she even found herself wanting to bite and suck on Triton’s fingers that were touching her cheek.

“How does the wine brewed by the god of pleasure and ecstasy taste?”

…So that’s what it was.

Pleasure and ecstasy. The words attached to this forcefully aroused sensation were terrifying.

“The… worst… ahh!”

“Dionysus would be disappointed to hear that review.”

Livia, who had been panting while trying to suppress her arousal, trembled as if having a seizure. It was because Triton’s hand, which had been caressing her waist, was now stroking her butocks.

“Don’t, ugh…! Don’t touch, me…!”

At her desperate words, Triton obediently removed his hands that had been kneading and spreading her butocks.

Unable to even open her eyes, intoxicated with ecstasy, she hung her head and panted. She wanted to collapse forward, but that would mean leaning against his chest.

As she tried to resist that with all her strength, the force went to strange places instead. Her private parts, which should have been tightly closed, gaped on their own, and her butocks trembled. Like a puppy that needed to relieve itself, she twisted her hips and rubbed her intimate place, then startled, tried to jump up from her spot.

“Ah, hah…!”

But her body, already beyond control, swayed and collapsed in place. Her legs trembled violently. Though she hated it more than death, her collapsed body fell into Triton’s embrace.

Haa, haa.

As she took rough breaths leaning against his shoulder, Triton gently stroked the back of her head. Like his voice pretending to be gentle, his touch also pretended to be kind. As if he had forgotten it was he who had made her like this.

…Damn deceiver.

“I told you, not to, touch… ahh…!”

She bares her teeth while wearing a face that looks like she’d die of pleasure if only he’d touch her. Seeing her glare fiercely with thoroughly melted, reddened eyes, still refusing to submit until the end, Triton burst out laughing.

Pretending to be proper, he obediently pulled both hands back and whispered regretfully.

“I’ve dragged you to death several times, yet you’ve never managed to make me submit once.”

Livia’s face hardened completely. Her reddened ears and cheeks looked quite wronged. To tell the truth, for an ordinary human not descended from divine blood, she was doing quite well, but Triton deliberately provoked her.

Strangely enough, even this wronged expression of Livia appealed to him. Perhaps because he had only seen her angry, flustered, or ashamed expressions until now, Livia’s other expressions felt interesting.

“You said you’d entertain me, but this is pathetic.”

The sound of Livia grinding her teeth could be heard as she caught her breath. What could she be thinking in that small head of hers? Taking heavy breaths and buying time, Livia whispered softly in a trembling voice.

“…Tell me.”

“What?”

“You, Triton, tell me your weakness.”

“You want me to tell you my weakness with my own mouth?”

“Yes, I’m, ha, ugh… just a worthless, human… so you, generously, give up your weakness.”

It seemed she had accepted that she was weak. And that it put her at an immense disadvantage in this bet.

If she couldn’t hide it, perhaps she decided to use it instead? Even in this state, her mind was working quite cunningly. In a way, it was quite remarkable. She seemed to have noticed that he was being generous to her in subtle ways.

It was absurd, but on the other hand, this was what made this human woman interesting.

Livia. Triton silently repeated the human woman’s name. Those three syllables that rolled smoothly off the tongue stuck to his mouth and wouldn’t leave. If only you would stick to me this long as well…

He smiled gladly and said,

“Alright. If you show me something interesting right now, I’ll consider it.”

Livia’s hazy eyes, struggling against the pleasure, twisted as if not understanding his words.

Triton skipped any further explanation and showed her directly. Lightly lifting her slim waist with both hands, he laid his organ under her private parts. Livia, now straddling the thick, long thing, stared at him with a flustered face.

“Move on your own, Livia.”

Livia twisted her face as if she’d heard something insane. Maintaining eye contact with Livia, Triton grabbed her waist and kindly rocked her himself. The plump flesh split in half rubbed back and forth against his rod-like hardness. Something burst forth from within Livia.

“Ahh! Hnng… ugh!”

Unable to endure the stimulation, Livia hurriedly covered her mouth with the back of her hand. It was amusing to see her biting her own hand, determined not to make a sound.

“You said you wanted to know my weakness… I’m willing to tell you my weakness, and I’m not even trying to thrust it in, is it so hard to shake your hips a few times?”

“Damn, you… ugh, hah!”

“It’s just a body that will rot and disappear when you die. Are you trying to preserve your chastity? Why, do you find some nobility in such things?”

“Y-yes…. Even if you, ahh, don’t understand, don’t, haah! Don’t, be-belittle, ngh, nngh… my feelings.”

“Belittle, is it. I just wanted to know you. You’re not belittling my feelings by failing to understand them, are you? Hmm, Livia?”

Whispering Livia’s name, Triton traced her earlobe with the tip of his tongue. Seeing the small shivers running down her back as he stroked it, it seemed that spot was one of her erogenous zones.

“Surely you don’t want to die again? I’ll only overlook such insolence once.”

Countless words dwelled in those reddened green eyes glaring at him. Most of them looked like curses.

How irreverent. How dare she look at a god with such eyes. It made him want to torment her…

“It’s just, being like this, haa… in front of you, is humili-humiliating.”

“That’s perfect, Livia. I want your humiliation.”

At her words, Triton whispered leisurely with a smile.

“I want to possess that shame of yours.”


Her bright red earlobes looked delectable. Triton didn’t hesitate to bite those tempting earlobes. As expected, it seemed to be an erogenous zone as Livia’s hips bounced dramatically. This caused her private parts to naturally rock against his organ. Her butocks quivered and trembled as if her sensitive bud had been touched.

“You, you lewd and filthy god of the sea…”

“So you don’t want to know my weakness?”

“…What a vile god you are.”

To think he wanted to suck those lips that cursed him. He couldn’t understand when his own tastes had become so peculiar.

Ah, at this rate he might not be able to hold back…

Just as he thought that.

Livia, who had only been biting her lips, ground her teeth and slowly rocked her hips.

“Hng, hu…ugh…”

A pained moan softly echoed. With a face like an ascetic walking on thorns, she tremblingly rubbed her slightly parted flesh against his organ. The slippery, quivering flesh slid back and forth as if dancing on top of his ferociously swollen cock.

…Ah, Livia. Livia, Livia.

Triton held his breath for a moment, swallowing the ecstasy given by her hot, soft flesh.

She had only rubbed against him a few times. Yet such simple movements brought an absurdly strong response. The head of Triton’s cock couldn’t contain itself and stretched. At this rate, it seemed ready to change shape immediately.

Around then, Livia, who had been clumsily rubbing her butocks, raised her reddened eyes. As he had wished, her face stained with shame was deliciously and appetizingly wet.

“…More, should I do more?”

Her trembling voice urged him. This woman who said she could endure anything for revenge was now enduring even shame, which was touching.

“Are you asking if you should move more?”

But this isn’t enough. Just, with this level of shyness…

Triton reached out and cupped Livia’s cheek. Kissing her trembling eyes, he embraced her shaking waist and parted his lips.

Her small, plump lips stiffened to receive him. Her tiny tongue, with no strength left to hide, was frozen in place. While wrapping around it and sucking hard, he raised his hand from her waist to grab her quite plump breast with one hand.

The woman sharply inhaled. Thanks to that, her fully swollen breast flesh filled his palm. He pinched and twisted her stiffly raised nipple with his fingertips while swallowing her sweet saliva and gently chewing the tip of her tongue.

Ahh…!

The moment an irritated moan burst between their connected lips, Triton grabbed Livia’s waist. And he quickly rocked her hips, which had been moving stealthily, back and forth.



He thrust his tongue into her surprised, parted lips and stirred it around. While greedily sucking her tongue that had stiffened as if forgetting to breathe, he thrust his hips upward. Her twitching entrance rubbed wildly against Triton’s organ. Her small pearl, sensitively swollen from the unfamiliar stimulation, was crushed against his groin and a scream-like moan burst from Livia’s mouth.

“Th-ha, ugh! St-stop…! W-wait! Uh, hah!”

Though she tried to push him away while shuddering, her hips staggered, unable to handle the rushing pleasure. Tears streamed down below her tightly closed eyes. Triton licked them up as if he had been waiting and kneaded her tense butocks, spreading them apart.

The feeling of the delicious flesh wrapping around his palms was quite nice. He felt he could touch this forever if asked. He quite liked how the small body sensitively responded wherever his hands touched.

His hardened organ rubbed frantically against her cunningly swollen bud until it grew hot. He could feel a liquid of completely different consistency than spring water leaking from between her split flesh.

“Ahh! Uh, ugh, nng! Hnng, hah!”

Livia’s breasts bounced up and down following his thrusting body.

Her clothes, worn with thin fabric layered over, were soaked and no longer functioned as clothing. The way they clung to her body lines was rather like appealing packaging. Was this what fish bait on a fishing rod was like? The deep pink flesh swayed up and down, tempting him.

Wouldn’t one have to be an absolute fool not to bite this?

“Hik!”

At that moment, strength entered Livia’s spread thighs and her waist began to tremble. With a reddened face, she opened her eyes wide and glared into space with an unbelieving expression. He could feel sweet fluid leaking in spurts from between her twitching, shaking legs.

Oh, such a Livia.

Triton laughed softly, kissed Livia’s earlobe, and whispered.

“You’ve dirtied the Spring of Rest, Livia.”

Her cheeks reddened shamefully at his words. Her face showed disbelief that she had climaxed in such a way. Triton kissed those pale cheeks and whispered in a voice meant only for her ears.

“Now then… who’s the lewd one here?”



Though her body still trembled with the aftershocks of climax, Livia ground her teeth.

He had taken what he wanted. Her shame, her humiliation had completely dissolved and flowed away in the water.

The first mistake was taking what the crazed Echidna offered without checking what it was. That the shame Triton spoke of was on a completely different level than what she had imagined was also outside her calculations.

But there was something unfair. Why would the wine of pleasure and lust be poison to this man? Rather, she was the only one who suffered from his counterattack. At that moment, Livia stiffened in sudden realization.

Could this be what Echidna wanted…?

“But child, perhaps you could convince him whether it’s real or not? If you could turn him into sea foam…. Yes, I’ll give you all my power.”

That absurd wandering legend about being able to turn the god of the sea into sea foam. Some said it was a mermaid that became foam, others said it was some sea spirit, and some said it was a sea god.

It was just such a rootless, unproven floating story. It appeared in children’s fairy tales, and mermaid hunters would chatter about it like a song….

The witch seemed to believe in that legend. But Livia thought it was nonsense. Even now, after rubbing private parts and mouths with Triton, that thought hadn’t changed.

Surely he couldn’t be turned to sea foam just by mixing bodies…. Why had she brought Dionysus’s wine?

At that moment, as if noticing she was lost in thought, Triton pinched and twisted Livia’s nipple.

“Hah…!”

“What are you thinking about, to not claim what you wanted?”

Livia, who had been trembling, covered her breast with her shaking hand and glared at him with murderous eyes. The effects of Dionysus’s wine were so strong that her body remained sensitive even after such rough treatment. Unsatisfied desire crawled up her waist like a snake, following her tingling nipples.

What she wanted….

Belatedly, she remembered why she had deliberately thrown herself at him. Livia hastily reached out to grab his neck and urged him.

“Hurry and tell me your weakness.”

“Be grateful for my mercy, Livia.”

Such nonsense from that finely shaped mouth.

Seeing her dumbfounded face, Triton chuckled and pulled down her hands that were weakly choking his neck. Then he placed them over his heart. It was the spot Livia always aimed for, but had never managed to pierce even once.

“Watch here carefully, Livia. Don’t look anywhere else.”

After saying that, Triton pulled Livia’s hand downward. Just as she wore a fearful expression wondering how far down he would go, something soft yet hard touched her palm. It was his organ.


“Ah…!”

Though she tried to pull her hand away in surprise, she couldn’t escape due to the large hand pressing down on the back of her hand. He moved his hand slowly while keeping it overlapped with Livia’s.

“What are you doing now…!”

“I told you to look properly.”

He commanded in a roughened voice that sounded like a growl. Simultaneously, Livia’s hand, caught in Triton’s grip, stroked up and down the pillar she was made to grasp. The thick thing that her hand could barely hold half of twitched and grew taut under her touch.

A soft moan escaped Triton’s lips. The sight was so obscene and erotic that she had to forcefully suppress her gaze from constantly trying to drift to his face. Just then, her eyes caught sight of a strange change in the very place Triton had told her not to look away from.

Why is it doing that…?

The skin underneath was red. Not just flushed from heat, but red as if a heart was burning with light under the thin membrane of skin. It was an unsettling sight. She was certain it had something to do with what he had called his weakness. At that moment, Livia brought her free hand to where the light was emanating.

As soon as Livia’s touch landed, Triton moaned and whispered.

“…A merman’s pleasure becomes his weakness. When the heart grows hot.”

It was just as he said. It was hot. Really hot.

Though he was a man whose entire body was cold like a cold-blooded beast, this place alone radiated heat. When her trembling hand caressed over his heart, Triton exhaled roughly, his throat rumbling like a beast.

“When it turns bright red as if it’s about to burst… That’s when you strike, Livia.”

Though she had asked for his weakness, she never imagined it would be something like this. While observing him with disbelieving eyes, Livia gently pressed her fingertip against where the red light showed near his heart. He smiled, gripping her hand as he whispered.

“That doesn’t mean you can burst it with just one finger though.”

“…”

“And this level of pleasure isn’t nearly enough.”

She felt Triton increase the pressure on her hand that he had been holding loosely. While maintaining eye contact with Livia, he stirred up excitement by moving that smooth pillar-like thing up and down. The more his aroused cock responded and twitched, the more vivid the red light near his heart became.

“So, Livia.”

He whispered, drawing her gaze from his reddened heart back to himself.

“If you want to break my heart, you’ll have to drown me in pleasure…”

She could feel his thing pulsing and expanding in her palm. In that state, he slowly tilted his head to whisper in her ear.

“…Can you do it?”

His voice was sweet enough to startle her every time she heard it. The hair on her arms stood up. To make such an irresistible proposal with such a sweet voice.

How could she refuse?

Glaring at him, Livia curved her wet eyes into a smile. Her first smile directed at Triton was rather fierce.

“When a god himself reveals his weakness, and even gets his cock hard for this primitive and lowly human, what reason do I have not to take the challenge?”

Livia roughly stripped off her wet, clinging clothes, tearing them away.

Whether you kill me or I harm you, this was a trial that could only end with one of us inevitably destroyed.

Hadn’t she sworn she would spread her legs even for the devil if it meant avenging her murdered family? Livia hadn’t forgotten that yet.

Looking at Livia through narrowed eyes, he suddenly let out a light laugh. It was a smile reminiscent of the calm before a storm.

“Indeed, how brave.”

“…You flatter me.”

“Then willingly devour it.”

As Triton moved his body, the once-still spring water crashed over their entangled bodies like a tidal wave. Livia squeezed her eyes shut and willingly spread her legs to the raging waves.



Triton sank his teeth into the slender neck that was letting out ragged breaths.

When he left teeth marks on the slim, clean neck, deeper furrows formed along the already elongated neckline that was straining with heavy breaths. He licked it with his tongue as he moved his body downward.

The breasts he had just been sucking and biting through wet fabric now lay exposed, tempting him. Despite her being thin, they were quite full and round, enticingly plump. He cupped them with both hands, slowly savoring them with his tongue and teeth as if tasting them.

“Ahh…!”

Livia’s warm flesh melted in Triton’s mouth. When he couldn’t resist and took a large bite of the supple flesh, a wet moan burst forth. He ran his tongue along the nipple that had hardened to a point in surprise. Harsh breaths escaped from Livia’s mouth, which she was covering with the back of her hand.

“…Hnn.”

He didn’t like either the mouth belatedly trying to stifle moans or the tightly clenched teeth. Did she think she could draw pleasure from him with such a passive attitude?

Damn it all, she was right though….

Triton sneered at himself as he suddenly bit down on the deep pink nipple.

“Ah!”

The cry-like moan was pleasant to hear. He kneaded her warm breasts with both hands while tasting them as he pleased. Beneath the trembling breasts, her rapidly breathing ribcage looked fragile.

Need to fatten her up.

Triton thought absently as he traced the protruding bone contours with his fingertips, not realizing how much more it made Livia’s skin crawl. She looked down at him with wary eyes, startled.

But her eyes were already wet and feverish with arousal. Triton maintained eye contact as he casually sucked her breast. His hand traveled down her squirming waistline and grabbed her plump butocks. And when he slowly slipped his fingertips between her spread butocks, Livia frantically grabbed his shoulders.

“Hnng…! J-just, hurry…!”

“Inexperienced, I see.”



“Looking at you, you seem to think it’s just about sticking it in and coming.”

Foolish and innocent Livia.

Triton licked Livia’s cheek and whispered against her reddened earlobe.

“Just fucking and coming won’t get you my heart, Livia.”

Livia’s movements stopped. He could see her suppressing that remarkable temperament of hers that usually showed its claws at any provocation. While admirable…

“You’ll have to try harder.”

That wouldn’t be nearly enough.

When he inserted his fingers between her plump folds, her soaking wet hole twitched and nibbled at his fingers. He felt a wetness different in consistency and temperature from the spring water. The tight hole pushed against his fingers, but Triton paid it no mind and pushed in deeper.

“Ah, ngh…!”

Livia, who had been letting out moans, opened her eyes wid, feeling uncomfortable. She had bitten her lip so hard it was bleeding.

Triton’s sensitive nose caught the scent of Livia’s blood. The raw scent this woman could produce. His mouth watered. A hunger resembling lust tightened his stomach. Just as his tongue was about to lick his lips, Livia, who had been moaning with a deeply furrowed brow, grabbed Triton’s cheek.

Just as he thought her humiliation-filled gaze was drawing closer, he tasted blood. A shiver ran through his body as if scales were sprouting all over. He felt her mouth, which had only known how to bite when invaded, now sucking deeply on his tongue. Just from that little thing, heat rose throughout Triton’s body.

The smoldering heat in his heart burst into flames.

Livia, who had drawn his tongue into her mouth, nibbled on it clumsily. She touched his teeth with her tongue tip, and lifted her hips that had been sitting on his center to rub her vagina against him. The soft flesh of her inner thighs pretended to swallow his sharply risen penis, inexpertly but eagerly.

Ah, Livia.

Curses rose in his mind as his vision turned red. The violent shark instinct he had kept surged up.

Triton lifted Livia out of the splashing water as if pulling her up by the roots, and laid her down outside the spring. While devouring the lips of Livia, who had frozen in surprise at the sudden change, he burrowed between her legs.

Though he wanted to thrust in right away, he gritted his teeth and held back.

Generally, a merman’s penis was longer and thicker than a human male’s genitalia. Moreover, a shark tribe’s sex organ differed in both shape and function from ordinary ones, so putting it in raw would destroy her womb.

Triton, with eyes reddened by passion, gazed down at Livia, reaching between her legs. As he pushed a finger in, the resistance of the opening seemed to latch onto him. However, when he inserted two fingers, it began to resist, and as three fingers entered, it trembled, trying to push him away.

“Stop, don’t, ah…!”

Ignoring her usual politeness, he blocked her mouth with his own, shoving his tongue deeply down her throat. With a shuddering gasp, the opening suddenly relaxed.

He took advantage of the moment, abruptly pushing three fingers in.

“…”

Her eyes, wide with surprise, filled with tears. The tongue that had been following him, now stiff and straight, had stopped.

Thick and sticky saliva streamed from the corners of her wide-open mouth. Without knowing its value, he lapped up the wayward drool and, as if reprimanding her, abruptly pulled his hand back.

“Ump…!”

Straining her chest, Livia gasped for air as if she couldn’t breathe. But she wasn’t there yet. There was no way with just this much. Her tight cervix had to expand a bit more to not be damaged.

Triton, who could feel his already splitting organ, continued to thrust his hand. The warm, sticky membrane, like a mother’s uterus, was warm and pleasant. He could do this for days without getting bored.

Suppressing his disturbing excitement, he thrust his hand again and again. Pressing down on her buried, tiny clitoral region with his palm, he massaged it. From her red, exposed inner labia, sweet, sticky fluid began to flow.

“Ah, ahh! Hmph!”

No longer able to hold it back, Triton grasped Livia’s quivering thighs and parted them. As her legs spread wide, the residual pleasure caused her rosy inner skin to slightly convulse.

Aligning his engorged organ with the narrow opening, Triton anticipated the impending impact. Livia, who had only been able to form a tight fist, suddenly raised her arms, hugging his neck and whispering.

“… Please, go slow.”

Please.

Her thin voice, as if it could pierce his heart, held him in place.

Livia was quite a remarkable woman. Despite her tough demeanor, she could suddenly show her vulnerability when needed. It seemed like a calculated move, but it was mischievous in its own way.

“Mm.”

As he nipped at Livia’s cheeks, he whispered against her tightly closed eyelids.

“Are you sure?”

At the sound of his words, Livia subtly opened her eyes, giving him a slightly reproachful look. In that very moment, with a twist of his mouth, Triton thrust his hips forward.

“Ow!…”

Even before half of him was in, she moaned as if she would die. Yet in reality, Triton wasn’t entirely comfortable either. He wanted to push in with total disregard for whether her uterus was tearing or not, but he displayed considerable patience.

This was something he couldn’t understand. It was odd to find himself acting this way just to be between this woman’s legs, almost as if he were a zombie. And yet he couldn’t stop, slowly pushing in, as if trying to soothe her.

“Ow, ow… sob, ow, it hurts…!”

As Livia sniveled, she held him tighter with her arms. This despicable man clung to her, trying to forget the pain by thrashing about. She should have laughed at him and pushed him away, but she couldn’t. Rather, she held onto him and gently patted his back with one hand.

Perhaps the reason was that the taste of the woman’s inner skin was so good, it could explain away any feeble excuses.

What’s this?

Livia’s inner walls held onto his organ tightly. The rough, plump pink membrane clamped onto him like a barbed hook. The sensation of tightening and loosening made the hairs stand up on his back. Even though only half of him was in, the overwhelming sensation covered his entire body.

But it’s too narrow. His organ was stuck, it was impossibly narrow.

Triton grumbled unsatisfactorily as he continuously pushed his hip forward. The hot, volcanic-like vagina, which felt as if it would engulf the cold organ, accepted it. At the same time, Livia gasped, nails raking across his shoulders as she pushed him away.

The more this happened, the more his excitement grew. The slow penetration of Triton’s hip gradually built strength. When he managed to insert more than halfway, he didn’t hesitate and thrust hard.

“…”

Livia couldn’t even gasp as her hips swayed and her body stiffened. However, it was impossible to retreat now that he was inside her completely. The tight, warm interior walls had enveloped him. In turn, it felt like he was being consumed, causing his internal organs and brain to become a paste.

Damn it.

He swallowed his swear and took a step backward, then slammed his hips forward again. The woman’s interior walls quivered with a ‘yerk’. Her bloodshot eyes glared at him reproachfully.

“Take it easy, it’ll be fine soon. Don’t look at me like that, okay?”

When he repeated the back-and-forth motion, the sound of flesh meeting echoed out. As he penetrated deeper into the tight, warm interior, the sharp smell of blood emanated from between Livia’s legs.

It’s been said that a human virgin’s body will bleed from the tear when she first receives a man.

Triton thought she was particularly naive, but it seems she truly was a pure virgin. A late sense of empathy arose, though it was only for a moment. Whether or not she was a virgin, he had been as gentle as he could make it. He was still moving gently, wasn’t he?

“Ow, ah! Triton…!”

Despite his concern, he couldn’t help but push further. Triton inserted the power radiating a pale blue light from his God into Livia’s body to alleviate her pain. The gentle, pure power filled Livia’s physical being, aiming to heal any internal injuries as soon as possible.

He waited for the inner wound to heal, gently lifting and lowering his hips.

“Aaah, aah…! Hic!”

In a moment, the deep inner wound of Livia was healing, and he gently lifted and lowered his hips. The sound of flesh meeting as Livia’s body met his continued. The light and gentle power provided relief from the outer pain, and the internal injuries were healing rapidly.

Thus, it seems she’s getting better. Triton, instinctively, moved to the spot where Livia’s reaction was just starting to change, and thrust deeply upwards.

“Aaah! Hic…!”

Startled, her body trembled. Her head tilted back as she exhaled a long, deep breath. The resonant sound of his voice matched the rhythm as he struck her interior walls, causing them to quiver and massage his organ. The sound of water, as if it were being absorbed, grew slightly deeper.

At this point, she seems to be fine. Triton, while gently biting Livia’s shoulder, inserted his organ fully into her.

“Ow, ah! No, stop, it’s tearing! Hic!”

The rhythm of his thrusts against her cervix caused Livia’s eyes to roll back. The boundary between pain and pleasure was crossed by massive stimulation, and Livia, with half her eyes blood-red, gasped and sobbed.

“You’re not ripped, Livia. You’re not ripped….”

“No, it’s ripped! It’s ripped! Stop!”

‘Be calm, calm down….’

He whispered tenderly into her ear, gently nipping at her ear lobe and neck, while gently moving his hip.

“Please don’t stop now, Livia. I’ve only just begun to taste it. Your body feels so sweet and comforting to me. I can’t stop now.'”

As he sucked and bit her trembling chest, the woman shuddered.

This perfect sensation was novel to him. Triton felt his neck tingle. At the same time, his heart glowed red. He held Livia’s hand, which was flailing about unsteadily, and kissed her, bringing her heart close to his own. “Livia, Livia… Look, you must see here.”

“Ah, yes! Oh…! Ooh!”

“My heart is here, you see? Do you see it?”

The tears blurred her gaze, but she looked briefly at his heart before clamping her eyes shut again, only tears streaming down her face as the thrusting continued.

Triton held Livia’s hips and thrust forward, driving his long, hard cock deeper into her. Each time it probed, her mouth emitted a sharp moan. The faster the pace, the more her body trembled like a sheet of paper. “Oh, Livia, Livia…!”

Livia, who had been holding on with all her might, fainted away when Triton finally released his load deep within her.

The climax of their encounter was reached when Livia’s eyes, filled with tears, looked at him, despite the overwhelming sensations. Her body was a mixture of pain and pleasure, and she whispered her final objection.

As she reached the peak and her body was enveloped in the sensations, she lost consciousness.

The viscous fluid that had erupted, had deeply entered her uterus, and Triton, while gently mixing it further into her, had completely filled her interior when he finally started to slowly withdraw his lower body.

“Livia.”

His face, brushing against Livia’s rounded belly, was filled with satisfaction.

To be honest, it was the most perfect encounter of his life.

Could Triton have broken my body again?

Livia vaguely thought in her hazy consciousness. If not for that, there was no way she could be this powerless. Her arms, legs, torso, and even her neck and face felt numb as if they weren’t her own.

The memory of repeatedly falling unconscious and waking up hazily emerged in her dulled mind. Each time she forced her closing eyes open, her vision would sway up and down. His cock thrusting into her numbed vagina with wet sounds was even frightening.

…Crazy lustful man.

He wouldn’t stop no matter how much Livia begged. Since a god wouldn’t have stamina issues, he probably took her until he was satisfied. The problem was that it took far too long until he was ‘unsatisfied.’ In her dim memories, Livia worried if her lower body might have worn away.

The problem was… that each time she regained consciousness from fainting, the pain grew dimmer while the excitement grew stronger.

Livia simply couldn’t accept that. Could Triton have done something to her body while she was unconscious? How could pleasure bloom amidst the pain that felt like it was tearing between her legs?

“Who’s the sea god now? With water flowing like this every time I thrust into you.”

When she reached her first climax completely exhausted, Triton mocked her with those shameful words. However, she didn’t have the presence of mind to refute. Only after being forcibly awakened several times did she realize that her body was no longer swaying.

Only then did Livia finally feel relieved enough to close her eyes. Though she could see Triton’s heart burning brighter than the blazing sun beneath her hazy eyelids, she didn’t have the strength to move a finger.

So tired… It seemed she would need to build up her stamina first to shatter that lustful sea god’s heart. Stamina first.

Grinding her teeth internally, Livia fell into yet another unconscious state from the overwhelming fatigue. Into her completely knocked-out dream came a giant eagle borrowing Morpheus’s wings.



There was a wild scent. She could faintly feel the wind. It was just the right coolness that Livia’s tired soul, which had been caught up in pleasure all along, had been craving. As Livia tossed and turned with a peaceful face, she suddenly felt a sense of déjà vu.

…Wind underwater? And what’s this wild scent, not even the smell of water?

The moment she opened her eyes in confusion, an unbelievable scene unfolded before her.

An endless blue sky, white clouds gathered like sheep beneath it, and herself flying between them.



She was so surprised that she became wide awake. As she suddenly sat up, giant wings stood like walls on either side of her as if to protect her.

You’re awake?

The humming voice that reached her distantly was familiar. When Livia looked down with surprised eyes, she saw that a giant eagle was carrying her on its back as it flew.

Could it be….

“Zagreus?”

Though her voice was barely more than a whisper, the eagle responded by greatly shaking its back. The beast that had been gliding through the sky like it was swimming in the sea excitedly twisted its body very quickly and soared into the sky.

Startled, Livia desperately clung to the eagle’s back, and she could feel his heart beating strongly underneath her pressed body.

Is it really Zagreus?

Livia blankly stared at the eagle carrying her on its back and the world beyond it with a strange feeling. A strange world with endless plains stretched out instead of the sea. And the blue sky….

Where is this? And how is Zagreus here?

She had surely fallen asleep just moments ago, exhausted from Triton’s torment, held in his arms like chains…?

It was an unexpected, very strange encounter.



“…So, you’re saying this is all a dream?”

“Yes.”

At Zagreus’s straightforward answer, Livia looked around with wide eyes.

The verdant hills, blue sky, pure white clouds, soft wind…. It was hard to believe that all these things stimulating her eyes, ears, and skin were a dream. But thinking about it, maybe that’s why she could walk around normally now. There was no way Livia’s body could be this fine in reality.

He must be some beast god, not a sea god.

Livia shuddered and curled up. Even though it was a dream, when the memory from just before falling asleep came to mind, her lower body felt unnecessarily hot. Her nipples seemed to be bleeding from how much they were sucked and bitten. No, with how persistently he had sucked them, they must be bleeding. As soon as she became conscious of it, her nipples tingled.

To erase the thought, she shook her head side to side, and Zagreus leaned his head forward and asked.

“What’s wrong? What are you thinking about?”

“Huh? Ah, nothing. Nothing at all. More importantly, did you find my sister? Is that why you came to find me?”

When Livia urgently grabbed both his arms and asked, Zagreus, who had been quietly looking down at her, suddenly pulled her into a tight embrace. His large frame carrying the scent of ashes hugged Livia as if to crush her. As if that wasn’t enough, he nuzzled his cheek against Livia’s hair like a child throwing a tantrum and whispered.

“I missed you. I missed this warmth so much.”

“Um, hey?”

“You’re warm even in dreams, Livia. I want to stay here forever.”

He hugged her so tightly that it was hard to breathe. When they first met he wanted to go hunting, the second time he tried to keep her in the underworld, and now he wants to stay in her dream forever. His attitude changing with each meeting was perplexing.

Though she hadn’t particularly done anything nice for him or done anything noteworthy, the man’s feelings grew visibly with each encounter like a Mumu growing in hell. Like a child starved for affection experiencing kindness for the first time….



That appearance wasn’t unfamiliar. It was similar to how she had been when she first started receiving unconditional love from Iason and Dad after taking Lete’s outstretched hand. Of course, she was a bit wary at first because of her abandoned memories, but….

“Livia.”

…Can gods have something like attachment issues too?

Livia awkwardly patted the back of the man who was hugging her and trembling with an uncertain look on her face.

Whenever she ran into Dad and Iason’s arms using the excuse of having a scary dream, they would pat her back just like this. Livia patted the man who reeked of loneliness as much as death in the same way she had received affection from them.

The man’s strong arms tightened even more at that. This time it really became hard to breathe, so Livia quickly pushed him away.

“That’s enough. I can’t breathe.”

“…But it’s a dream?”

“I still can’t breathe. Don’t hug so tight.”

“Then, can I hug you gently?”

“That’s….”

There wasn’t particularly any reason why not, but something felt unsettling in a corner of her mind. Perhaps it was because of the strange pain engraved in every corner of her body. Between her legs, she could still feel the foreign sensation as if it was holding that man’s penis. Even though she didn’t want to mind it, she couldn’t help but be conscious of that unfamiliar sensation.

“More importantly, Zagreus. I asked if you found my sister?”

When she urged him as if changing the subject, Zagreus looked at Livia regretfully and nodded.

“I found her, but….”

“But what?”

“Her condition is a bit strange. I think you need to see her.”

“What? What do you mean strange? What are you saying?”

When Livia grabbed Zagreus’s wrist and urged him in alarm, Zagreus quickly raised her hand to kiss her knuckles as he spoke.

“It seems she’s somewhat injured because someone forcibly took and dragged away her soul. I’ve helped her recover as much as I can, but she keeps calling your name without waking up.”

Her heart sank. Both the words that her soul couldn’t wake up and that she was looking for her settled as heavy lumps in Livia’s chest.

Livia felt her heart burning with anger.

Echidna, what exactly did you do to my brother? What did you do to cause Lete’s soul to be damaged!

She wouldn’t let this go. If Lete couldn’t reincarnate like this, or if he couldn’t fully enjoy a peaceful death…. She would destroy Echidna by any means necessary.

“Then can I go to the underworld? Will I be able to meet Lete right away if I go?”

“Are you saying you’d die right away if I tell you to?”

“Yes. If needed, even right now…!”

At Livia’s unhesitating words, Zagreus shook his head with an amused smile.

“No, Livia. Not yet. It’s not a good time right now…. The king’s mood won’t be good for a while, so if you happen to fall out of his favor, unmanageable things might happen.”

“Then how can I meet Lete’s soul?”

“Soon, the queen will return to the surface. I’ll follow her outside. The goddess of earth holds feasts whenever her daughter returns to the surface.”

Livia’s face flushed red as she understood what his words meant. Zagreus cupped her reddened cheeks with his cool hands and whispered secretly.

“Livia, can you come there?”

Spring will soon come to the surface. Spring is Persephone’s season…. Before being the queen of the underworld, Persephone is the daughter of earth. It seemed the goddess of earth would hold a festival for her daughter as spring arrived.

Though uncertain how to get there, Livia nodded without hesitation. She would find a way somehow. Somehow.

“I’ll go, I’ll definitely go. Will you bring Lete’s soul then?”

When Zagreus nodded, Livia, unable to contain her excitement, hugged him impulsively.

“Thank you, Zagreus. Thank you….”

She could never have found Lete’s soul hidden by Echidna on her own. If it weren’t for Zagreus, she would have been helplessly manipulated by Echidna who was holding Lete hostage….

Livia decided to completely forget the fact that Zagreus had tried to kill her at their first meeting. Though she would still be wary, if he just helped her meet Lete again, she could forgive him even if he killed her once and brought her back to life.

Zagreus, who had been stiff, gently embraced Livia’s back in return. Unlike before, perhaps remembering how Livia had said she couldn’t breathe, he wrapped her with a gentle force. Then, just as Livia had done, he softly patted her back. It was as if he had learned tenderness from Livia. Then, as if he couldn’t hold back anymore, he suddenly hugged her tightly again.

It was a bit hard to breathe, but she decided to endure it for a moment. Suddenly, he said.

“You know what, I’ll collect that kiss then.”

“…Huh?”

“You promised me. If I found your sister, you’d give me a kiss.”

Come to think of it, she had made such a promise…. Since a promise was a promise, Livia nodded saying okay. At that, Zagreus’s smile brightened.

That’s when it happened. Suddenly, she felt a pain as if one shoulder was being torn apart. Livia unknowingly screamed and collapsed, and Zagreus quickly grabbed her waist and pulled her into his arms.

“What’s wrong?”

“My, my shoulder suddenly….”

Livia’s eyes, which had been wincing in pain, suddenly went wide. That intense pain had suddenly vanished completely, as if washed away.

“Your shoulder…?”

“…It was killing me just a moment ago, but now it doesn’t hurt at all. What’s going on?”

Zagreus carefully turned Livia around as she touched her shoulder with a bewildered expression. Gathering her abundant red hair to one side and moving it to the front of her shoulder, he examined the area she had been covering with her hand.

“How is it? Is there something wrong with my shoulder?”

Zagreus silently looked up at the sky while holding Livia’s shoulder. His lips twisted into a sneer as he glared somewhere with narrowed eyes.

“They noticed.”

“What do you mean? Who noticed wha- ugh!”

As Livia tried to turn toward Zagreus, she was startled by a thunderous sound and crouched down. When she hurriedly looked around, everything was shaking. In the sky, gray storm clouds rapidly gathered among the white cumulus clouds.

“Wh-what? Why is the weather suddenly like this?”

However, unlike the confused Livia, Zagreus remained calm as he stared at one corner of the sky.

“Livia, I’m afraid I have to go back now, though it’s regrettable.”

After saying that, Zagreus suddenly pressed his lips to the spot below Livia’s shoulder. It was exactly where Livia had felt pain moments ago. As Livia turned around in surprise, black wings spread wide behind Zagreus’s back.

“…Zagreus?”

His black wings fluttered, stirring up a whirlwind. At the same time, the sky seemed to split as tremendous rain began to fall.

“My prey, see you then.”

It was a strange way to address her, but it was too late to object as Zagreus had already flown too high. Livia’s eyes, which had been blankly staring at the sky, suddenly grew wide.

A giant fish was flying across the sky.

No. Looking closely, it wasn’t a fish but….

“…A shark?”



Cool fingertips gently rubbed the scar on Livia’s shoulder blade as she slept face down. The more he touched it, the more the rough scar irritated Triton’s mood strangely.

…What is this unpleasant scar?

A dark and gloomy energy emanated from what appeared to be an arrow wound. Even when he poured in the power of regeneration and healing, the scar wouldn’t disappear. Should he just cut out this piece of skin entirely?

Just as he was about to apply pressure with his fingertips, black thread-like substance leaked out from the scar and swirled around it, releasing black smoke as if protecting it. Triton’s expression immediately hardened. He could sense the energy of death. Probably something from the underworld….

“…When exactly did you get marked with something like this, Livia?”

First she came back smelling of a young goat, and now with the energy of death.

She seems to be hovering around him all day, but when exactly did she meet such beings?

Perhaps she got this during her recent death? Just how busy was she during that brief time in the underworld? First Persephone, and now another god.

She was truly a remarkable woman. Especially talented at enticing gods, it seemed.

“That won’t do, Livia.”

I should be your only god….

Triton smiled frighteningly as he carved out the scar on Livia’s shoulder with his fingertip. Though it was flesh blessed by the Styx, it wasn’t strong enough to resist Triton’s power. It wasn’t Styx herself opposing him, just her mere blessing.

Triton’s fingertip dug into Livia’s flesh.

“Ah, uh…!”

Livia’s body trembled like it was having a seizure, seemingly feeling the pain. After he took measures to prevent her from feeling pain, Livia’s face, which had been grimacing and shuddering, finally relaxed.

What a merciful god he was…. But you wouldn’t know that, would you? Perhaps you don’t even want to know.

He gently rubbed Livia’s shoulder where the flesh had been carved out, looking quite regretful. The area where he had scraped away the flesh to reveal raw red meat healed with just one touch from him. The problem was….



That the ‘mark’ reappeared on the healed skin.

Triton’s eyes turned frighteningly cold. A scar that wouldn’t disappear even when the flesh was carved out meant it was evidence of a god’s power. He had suspected when the unpleasant energy flowed out, but another god had indeed carved their mark into Livia’s body.

…Who dares to place their mark on my human?

Triton stared at the black scar reappearing with a hardened face. The scar, growing darker, was much more distinct than before. For a moment, he thought he could see a pattern.

‘…A bull?’

Though it had short pointed horns on its head, it didn’t look like a goat.

Who could it be? A god who uses the bull as their symbol…. While there are countless gods in the world, those with symbols are rare. Various gods with similar patterns flashed through Triton’s mind, but none matched this exact shape.

A lesser-known god connected to the underworld. Among those, one who could place marks…. If he focused on those points, it shouldn’t be too difficult to find them.

Underworld, underworld….

Underground, death, darkness, sleep…. Dreams.

At that moment, Triton’s brow twitched. Could it be…

He reached out and placed his hand on Livia’s head. Though dreams were another god’s domain and difficult to intrude upon, Livia was an exception for Triton. The rules had exceptions for those who give ‘trials’ and those who undergo them.

He closed his eyes and infiltrated Livia’s unconscious mind.

Where are you, Livia?

He went deeper into her inner mind, searching for her. And finally discovered a suspicious space surrounded by a massive black barrier.

…Interesting.

Triton smiled fiercely and lightly kicked it with his foot. Though his action was light, its power was not, and the space ruled by the god of death shook completely.

Like well-fired pottery breaking, the black barrier began to crack and crumble bit by bit. When he kicked it one more time, he found her under a blue sky with rather cute white clouds. Though of course, there was no longer any blue sky or white clouds now.

Livia seemed to notice him too, as she opened her eyes wide and moved her luscious red lips.

Though he couldn’t hear what she was saying, it didn’t really matter.

Triton reached out toward Livia as she hesitated and tried to back away.



Livia opened her eyes with a start and gasped for breath. Gulp, cold sweat ran down her back as she swallowed dryly.

‘What was that just now?’

Tense, she slowly glanced around from the corner of her eye. Beyond her dim vision, she could see Triton’s bedroom scene. Though there was no light or even the sound of bubbles popping, Livia instinctively sensed that the world’s fiercest fish was nearby.

‘…What exactly happened?’

First Zagreus appeared in her dream, then after him came Triton. It seemed too vivid to be just a simple dream. However, everything was too sudden to say it was truly caused by divine power.

The memory of flying in the sky behind Zagreus transformed into an eagle, the green undulating fields, and the sky that collapsed along with the downpour that fell as if the world was crumbling.

A giant shark appeared above that broken sky. A beautiful shark with a silver body like sunlight reflecting off waves at noon, and eyes like blue jewels….

Livia recalled that image from her dream again. Such overwhelming beauty that she never thought she’d feel toward a massive predator. In the dream, Livia didn’t even want to blink.

Then, unable to bear the falling rain, she wiped the moisture from her face, and in that moment, the giant silver shark that had been covering her sky approached her with its huge mouth wide open. She was so mesmerized that even though she thought she was going to be eaten, she couldn’t run away.

Only after being trapped in its mouth did she belatedly realize she had been caught by the shark and struggled. Then the form of what was holding her changed.

The sharp teeth had disappeared and were replaced by an enormous hand. In that moment, the memory of being crushed in Triton’s hand came rushing back.

When Livia screamed and struggled as if having a seizure, the grip loosened. Through the slightly opened fingers, she could see the face of the one holding her tightly. It was Triton.

So, that beautiful shark that had taken her breath away was him all along.

Livia was confused about why she kept seeing him as a shark. Though his fierce and violent energy did perfectly match a shark’s….

While she was briefly lost in thought, a cool fingertip firmly pressed against the back of the silent Livia as he whispered.

“Who did this to you, Livia?”

Livia, taken aback, shuddered and tried to sit up, but Triton wouldn’t allow it. His fingers, inexplicably nervous, poked and prodded her delicate skin as if pointing to the arrow marks left by Zagreus. Before she could fully grasp the situation, Livia held her tongue.

“Perhaps it would be best if you answered.”

Triton’s hands caressed Livia’s shoulders, trailing down her tense back. Sliding between her sunken spinal muscles, his hand stopped at the curve of her butocks.

“Livia, quickly.”

“Death’s hand. I don’t know much either,” Livia exhaled sharply, blurting out the vague information.

“Is that so?”

His voice was skeptical, but he didn’t press further. Instead, he seemed to focus on Livia’s thin back and butocks. As he gently rubbed the deep crevices around her navel, his fingertips crept towards the space between her full butocks, splitting the soft flesh with a swipe of his fingers.

“Stop that…! Don’t do it!”

Biting her lower lip to stifle her increasing breathlessness, she couldn’t control the shivering in her lower body. Whether from just waking up or the aftereffects of their first time being overly aggressive in bed, her body lacked the strength to even move a finger. The reason might have been the excessively passionate sex they had just shared.

For whatever reason, Triton’s hand continued to play with Livia’s shivering butocks. He used his longest, thickest finger to swipe down between them.

“Hey, that’s enough. Stop it…!”

“Are you saying you can’t take it? Don’t you remember setting out to defeat me?” he whispered into her ear with a fierce tone, pressing his body against hers, causing her to shiver under his weight.

“Ow, it hurts! Don’t do that!”

The tender skin on her back prickled with cold chills as he grazed her with feather-light touches. Her pressed chest rose and fell rapidly, making her feel short of breath.

“Carrying such traces.”

When his lips reached Livia’s shoulder, his voice became darker, more sinister. A foreboding feeling, like something was about to happen, shot down her spine. In an instant, Triton’s mouth clamped onto her shoulder.

“Ow!”

His sharp teeth bit down, tearing into her flesh with a grating sound. The severe pain was almost like he was crushing her bone, prompting Livia to flail and push him away.

“Ow, it hurts! It hurts!”

Triton continued to bite her shoulder before slowly releasing his teeth. A distinct row of teeth marks was left on her small shoulder, much more prominent than the arrow marks left by others. Satisfied, he smiled and gently kissed the area where the skin was now flushed.

“Don’t cry, Livia. It’s your own fault. If you carry another god’s mark again, things won’t be as simple as this.”

He gently turned Livia onto her back, facing him. Her face twisted into a scowl as she glared at him, but he simply smiled serenely in response.

“Why do you keep handling my body at your own will…!”

“Nonsense. Livia, you’ve become mine since you challenged me. Your body, soul, thoughts, even your dreams—all are mine.”

Livia could barely believe her ears. No matter how much she tried to deny it, the words of the absolute god left her with a chilling premonition.

Triton affectionately brushed her pale cheeks. He held her lax hands, tapping the black wound on her wrist and whispered.

“Take out your golden dagger, Livia.”

His eyes, shimmering like sapphires, bore into Livia’s soul. He leaned in to kiss the rapid pulse at her neck, then allowed his tongue to dart to her tiny, cute nipple before speaking.

“As I’ve been lenient so far, I won’t be anymore.”

His words implied that this night was far from over.



Livia tried to escape.

Golden dagger and revenge aside, doing that act again right now was impossible.

As she realized while passing out, in this state, she could barely keep her senses during sex, let alone point a dagger at his heart. What good would it do if his heart turned bright red? She had no strength left to stab him!

Moreover, her body, already hypersensitive from the previous ordeal, responded excessively to Triton’s every touch. Livia never dreamed her body could be this vulnerable to stimulation. And while the Styx’s blessing protected her from pain, it proved useless against pleasure. How this could be was both confusing and bewildering.

And honestly, she was slightly worried whether last night had actually damaged her vagina.

And now he wanted to do it again? …Was he insane?

In her current state, even one penetration would surely lead to complete exhaustion. Though she had died and come back to life several times, sex was exhausting in a completely different way from death. Besides, hadn’t that lustful god continued thrusting even after she’d passed out!

Crazy god, crazy man!

She hastily tried to push him away and scoot backward on her butocks, but her ankle was caught, and she slid right back to him.

“Ah, no…! That brutally big thing again…! Hngh…!”

Her legs, caught by Triton, were forcibly spread apart. The intimate area between her legs was fully exposed to his gaze. Livia’s face burned with shame as she struggled to break free from him, but it was futile.

“Such a pretty color, Livia.”

He licked his lips while staring at the space between Livia’s spread legs like a predator eyeing its prey. Between the plump, delicate folds of her vagina, a pink opening pulsed. Though she didn’t want to react, her intimate area grew hot under his explicit gaze.

No, that can’t be.

Livia tensed her thighs, trying to ignore her body’s response. In response, Triton grabbed her ankles and pulled them closer, lifting them high. As her body was nearly folded in half, Livia let out a startled scream. But the surprises weren’t over.

“Ahh…! Wh-what…! Don’t!”

As if scolding her resistance, Triton bit the soft flesh of her inner thigh. Livia tensed her thighs in shock, but instead of closing, they spread even wider. The cursed Triton had already created water chains that were wrapped around both her ankles, pulling them apart.

“What are you, stop, hick, ugh! Ah, no…!”

As the panicking Livia tried desperately to cover her intimate parts with her hands, Triton, watching her, let out an amused chuckle. He lifted her waist and hips, then brought his mouth to the place she was desperately trying to hide.

“Hah…!”

Triton’s long, cool hair cascaded between Livia’s legs. The sight of his silver hair, shimmering like ocean waves, spilling over her most intimate place felt utterly surreal.

But even more dizzying was the feeling of Triton’s breath against a place she had never shown anyone. Livia desperately tried to keep her hands clasped together. Smirking at her futile efforts, he whispered in a secretive voice.

“Did you know? Sharks usually smell the female’s genitals before mating with them.”

How could he know such vulgar habits, like sharks smelling female genitals? Livia didn’t know. She didn’t want to find out either. But he, seemingly indifferent to Livia’s feelings, pushed his firmly pointed tongue between Livia’s tightly clenched fingers, gently biting and sucking while whispering.

“By scent, I can tell how aroused a female is.”

As if fingers covering weren’t any obstacle at all, his firm tongue kept plunging deep between the slender gaps of her fingers.

“Ahh… ugh! Hh… ah, uh…!”

Her toes, shooting up towards the sky, spread wide and started trembling uncontrollably. Her mind felt like it was being bleached by the ticklish sensation of the moist tongue delving into the deep crevices between her fingers. The plunging tongue found its way through her now weakened fingers and finally reached the wet opening.

“Ah, no…! Hahh!”

Livia’s hands trembled as if she might faint from shock. As moans escaped involuntarily like coughs, she quickly covered her mouth with one weakened, quivering hand.

Having succeeded in completely pushing away her trembling hands, he buried his nose between Livia’s private parts and took a deep breath.

“But you.”

Triton, who had gently touched Livia’s rosy inner skin, let out a soft chuckle and whispered.

“You have such a strong and sweet smell, don’t you?”

The mere mention of the word “smell” made Livia feel an intense sense of embarrassment unlike any other time. But for some reason, her body was getting even hotter. She could feel the lubricant gushing out between the slightly opened slits, wetting both inside and out.

“This… I haven’t even properly tasted it yet, and you’re already dripping like this. What should I do, Livia? Hm?”

The breath made Livia feel embarrassed, as Triton’s hot air ravaged her inner skin. Livia squirmed her butocks and sobbed softly. At this, he inserted his long tongue into her deeply and began to lap and suction the juices flowing from her.

Slurp, slurp. Smooch…

Vulgar and crude sounds burned fiercely into Livia’s ears. As he sucked, not only the lubricant but even her own soul seemed to be slipping away. A strange sense of pleasure muddled her brain, making her feel weak and powerless.

“The taste is quite good…”

Oh, goddess of revenge, goddess of wisdom! No, any god at all, please remove his gross tongue!

Livia desperately implored, but naturally, no one answered.

Livia wanted to seek more gods, but Triton’s firm tongue grasped her small clit, causing all thoughts to vaporize. The tiny, hidden pearl in the soft flesh was ground under the tip of Triton’s tongue.

“Mm! Uhh, um! Stop! Oh, no…! Haah!”

A bolt of lightning struck her mind. Switching between her hole and her clitoris, he sucked hard, making Livia moan as if she might suffocate. What was flowing downward didn’t feel like tears but like her own soul. Her hip, which had been trembling without her consent, suddenly imploded.

“Huff! Hngh, ah! Wha…! Uh, um!”

The squishy flesh, the tongue that pokes it, the negative pressure that suctions it, and the hot inner skin that reacts with him created a tangled mess. He didn’t leave even a drop; his lips came even closer. Leaning over as if to kiss, he opened wide and sucked, driving his thick tongue deep into Livia’s innermost flesh. At the same time, Livia reached another climax. But it wasn’t just a climax; it was an intense, overwhelming desire. The feeling was like an imminent explosion, scaring Livia.

“No, no, ah, no, I can’t, can’t…! Hnghh, stop! Hic, hic, um, um!”

The overwhelming pleasure was almost unbearable, turning into a sort of torment. All reason had fled, and animalistic pleasure made her hip convulse without restraint.

Once again, a gush of fluid flowed down past Livia’s groin and along her slim belly. Her mind, completely immersed in pleasure while hanging almost upside down, grew hot.

Livia stared with disbelieving eyes at the transparent liquid flowing between her breasts along her belly, her face pale.

‘Could I possibly be…’

She was even more confused because she couldn’t understand what had just come out of her body. The sensation when it burst forth was close to urination, and it was too much in quantity to be just regular fluid.

‘Could I, could I possibly…’

“You have a lot of fluid inside you, Livia.”

Triton whispered gently while lowering her waist. Then, with his fingertips, he softly spread the fluid pooled around Livia’s still-trembling womanhood. Though not sticky, it was so wet that her entrance was completely soaked.

“S-stop it! This… T-this is…”

Triton, reading the meaning behind Livia’s confused expression, burst into cheerful laughter.

“Innocent Livia Horn.”

He demonstratively sucked his fingers coated with her fluids. Then, before Livia could even react, he kissed her.



His tongue invaded her parted lips without hesitation, wildly stirring inside her small mouth. There was a faint but sharp scent. However, the sweetness of their mixed saliva from their tongues rubbing together quickly made the scent evaporate and disappear.

After toying with Livia’s lips for a while, Triton’s lips gently pulled away. The thread-like saliva connecting their lips suddenly broke.

“Did you think I would drink your urine?”

Struck right at her concern, Livia glared at him with a reddened face. Her unconcealed emotions surged forth.

“This is just evidence that you reached an intense climax, Livia.”

Triton, gazing at Livia with eyes like gentle waves, whispered while stroking her cheek with his fingertips.

“A very primal and honest proof that pleases me.”

As if to confirm his words about the pleasure, the area near his heart visibly glowed red. While Livia was distracted by that sight.

“I should reward you properly for pleasing me, shouldn’t I?”

Triton, who had already positioned himself between Livia’s legs again, gripped his firmly erect cock and rubbed it up and down. His hardened length was still terrifyingly large and thick even upon second glance.

“I am a god who knows proper etiquette, after all.”



His sweetly smiling face looked quite shameless, contrary to his words.



“Ahh!”

His deeply embedded penis thrust in and out rapidly. Though she tried to escape by crawling away on her knees desperately, Triton showed no mercy. After grabbing her ankle and pulling her back, he pressed his lower body against hers without any gap and forcefully thrust his rock-hard cock inside.

“Hng! Ugh…! Haah…!”

His strength was so overwhelming that Livia feared his penis might pierce through to her womb. Forced to stay on her stomach as punishment for trying to escape, suppressed moans continuously burst from her lips as she took in that frightening thing.

With trembling hands, she gripped the golden dagger and desperately swung it without looking back. However, before the blade could reach Triton, her wrist was caught.

“You should look carefully before striking, Livia.”

Triton whispered in his characteristically gentle voice while twisting her arm behind her back and thrusting his hips up forcefully. Livia’s eyes, which had been tightly shut, flew open. Her weakened tongue trembled between her slightly parted lips.

Watching this from behind, savage lust filled Triton’s eyes. Unable to contain his impulse, he grabbed Livia’s hair and yanked it back sharply.

“Ah!”

The moment her neck bent backward, his lips devoured hers. His body was large enough to cover Livia and more, so just by slightly lowering his head, he could easily steal her lips from behind.

Her head spun as her breath was taken away. As she gasped for air while her tongue was captured by his strong biting and sucking, the kiss turned gentle. The hand gripping Livia’s hair also loosened, and at some point, it moved down to wrap around her waist and cheek.

Simultaneously, she felt his manhood penetrating deeper into her flesh. His penis, pressed tightly against Livia, thrust into her while rubbing against her inner walls as if drawing circles. The gentler stimulation drew passionate moans from Livia’s lips.

“Ah…. uh, yes! Haah…”

Taking his already overwhelming size from behind seemed to double the sensation of fullness. White foam of thick fluid leaked out between the hole where his manhood was creating friction.

“My… you should eat well, Livia. You’re already so thin.”

He whispered lewdly while tightly embracing her waist from behind. Though there was no more room to enter, he kept thrusting his manhood as if wanting to go deeper inside Livia.

“St-stop…! My stomach, it’s going to burst, ugh! Mmnh…!”

Livia trembled slightly while lying face down from the intense pleasure rushing through her. The manhood prodding inside her felt like it would tear apart her inner walls completely. An overwhelming pleasure that couldn’t be compared to the faint pain washed over her.

“It’s okay, Livia. You can take more.”

His whispering voice was incomparably gentle, as if seducing her. His large hand gently caressed her swollen lower abdomen while embracing her whole body. His broad chest had plenty of room even after holding her.

The hand that was caressing her lower abdomen grabbed her swaying breasts as she lay prone. When he twisted and pinched her erect nipples, her startled waist arched and her hips raised higher.

Triton didn’t miss that moment and pushed his cock into the small gap that formed.

“Hnngh! Ah, no…! Ah, aah!”

As the act was repeated, Livia felt her sensations growing several times stronger. It was frightening not knowing how much this pleasure would swell.
At first, she thought Dionysus’s wine had reduced the pain and increased the pleasure when accepting him, but that wasn’t it. As he thrust in, waves of ecstasy overwhelmed her to the point where every nerve in her body screamed.

However, Livia couldn’t accept it. She didn’t want to accept it.

This kind of act was merely a means to expose his weakness. While he was probably just trying to mock and suppress her, it made no sense that she would feel pleasure from something like this.

“Yes, hah! Ah, ah! N-no… ugh, mmph.”

Though confused, she could feel her body frighteningly quickly becoming accustomed to Triton. Just as her body was helplessly consumed by him, would her soul be devoured as well?

Livia became afraid. Without knowing what she was afraid of, Livia ended up terrified. Targeting his heart became secondary, and she thought it would be better to just end this and escape from Triton’s embrace.

In a state of near madness, Livia instinctively tightened her lower body. As the hole enveloping Triton’s cock clenched tightly, a low moan escaped from Triton’s lips.

“…Ah, Livia.”

Triton, who was rubbing his nose against Livia’s prone nape, bit her reddened earlobe.

At that moment, Livia was startled almost to the point of fainting. She clearly felt his penis inside her grow even larger.

When she turned her head in surprise, he grabbed her chin as if he’d been waiting and pressed their lips together. Their tongues tangled frantically. Triton lifted her limp body with an easy touch and placed her on his knees, then dropped her down with a thud.

“Ahh…!”

As if soothing her distress, Triton held Livia’s waist and swirled it in circles. Her spine tingled at his movements that hit every sensitive spot along her inner walls without missing any. When her gushing fluids thoroughly soaked where she and Triton were joined, the wet sounds grew even louder.

“Seems like you’re planning to fill this entire sea with your fluids, Livia.”

“What, ahh! Nonsense… ngh, ah!”

As the wet sounds grew louder, the corners of Triton’s mouth curled deeper as he held Livia. He stroked her back while thrusting his hips upward, constantly kissing her nape as it arched backward in ecstasy. The heat grew in their friction points and the speed of his thrusts against her inner walls increased.

“Ah, Livia. Livia.”

Just as Livia’s vision flashed white while taking him in so deeply she could barely breathe, Triton’s movements stopped as he thrust his cock deeper than ever before. Just as goosebumps rose on Livia’s waist as if sensing something, Triton’s seed shot out forcefully, striking her cervix.

“See? I told you you could take more, Livia. So greedy…”

Triton whispered while gently caressing around where Livia’s entrance gripped his cock. Dark desire seeped into Triton’s voice by Livia’s ear as she breathed heavily. Like a beast driven purely by instinct, like a male determined to completely dominate Livia, it was an enormous and intense desire for conquest.

Livia trembled and tried to push him away at the feeling of his seed flowing deep inside her, but she couldn’t escape Triton’s grasp. His thick arms held her tightly and wouldn’t let go.

“Ah, no…! Not your seed, no…! Stop…!”

As she writhed with her hips, turning pale as if having a seizure, Triton asked with an amused smile:

“Why, surely you’re not worried about pregnancy now?”

“Of course I am, what if I end up carrying your child…!”

At her words, Triton’s eyes twitched and narrowed. Why did this feel so unpleasant? It irritated him that she would say such things while taking his penis and holding his seed inside her.

Looking at her with twisted eyes, he forcefully pulled down her slightly raised hips as if trying to stuff himself in deeper, and whispered:

“Nothing’s impossible, Livia.”

Though there was no room to go deeper, when strong force forcibly spread her insides even more taut, a sharp scream burst out. Suddenly, as if something had upset him, his voice noticeably roughened.

“I’m curious. If you were to carry my child, I wonder if you could still say you’d split my heart then?”

“What…? No, n-… ah! No. Never…! Let go! Don’t, don’t do this!”

Livia, who had been relatively compliant until now, violently pushed him away. Her face was desperate as she screamed and struggled that this couldn’t happen.

The arms holding Livia didn’t budge at all, as if amused by her resistance. Livia grabbed the golden dagger that had fallen away and hurriedly struck at his shoulder and heart.

However, his steel-like skin couldn’t be pierced by Livia’s trembling, weakened hands. Damn it! She cursed and grabbed Triton’s neck with both hands, shaking it. When his thick neck wouldn’t even fit in both her hands, she gave up on that too and frantically bit his ear.

But such attacks couldn’t possibly hurt him. Instead, Triton smiled gently while firmly grasping and caressing Livia’s bottom with both hands. Even tilting his neck as if inviting her to do more.

“Let… go…! Let me go!”

“Shh, Livia. Don’t get excited. You won’t get pregnant anyway.”

Livia, who had been hitting him frantically, stopped and looked down at him. Her green eyes, filled with intense emotion, glared at him as if demanding the truth. He smiled and kissed the swell of Livia’s chest, which was rising and falling rapidly from her violent struggles, and said:

“It’s empty seed, so naturally you won’t get pregnant.”

“Empty… seed…?”

“Whether to leave an heir or not is my decision. One couldn’t be called a god without even that much ability.”

In that moment, countless legends of demigods flashed through Livia’s mind. Stories of many beautiful women who were forced into relationships and made to bear children.

As if reading her mind, Triton chuckled.

“Of course, there are gods with strong reproductive urges. But not me. If I wanted more children, why would my mother have only one son?”

Well, there were the Tritones, but strictly speaking, they were ‘eggs’ born simultaneously with him. Triton, who was the strongest egg among them, became the leader of the remaining Tritones and was chosen as his mother’s heir apparent.

However, Livia didn’t need to know such stories.

“…Really?”

“Really.”

“Swear on the Styx?”

Well, bringing up the Styx for something like this.

When he frowned, Livia grabbed his neck with both hands and urged him to speak as if telling him to hurry up.

Though he was quite displeased by Livia saying she would absolutely never bear his child, thinking about it, Triton himself needed to be careful about such things happening. Unless they were of Amphitrite’s caliber, those born of his father’s seed were mostly treated as ‘monsters’ or died young. There was no guarantee it would be different with Triton’s seed.

Swallowing his unpleasant and dirty feelings, he magnanimously made the oath as if granting Livia’s desperate plea.

“I swear on the Styx that what I just said is true.”

Only then did the anxiety and unease deeply etched on Livia’s small face disappear.

Her body went limp as if drained of strength and collapsed onto his shoulder. The small weight leaning against him made him feel strange. Though she had merely collapsed from exhaustion, somehow it felt like this woman had willingly embraced him. When the woman who had been desperately trying to kill him until now weakly fell into his arms, it gave him an indescribably peculiar feeling.

“…No more.”

At that moment Livia muttered in a hoarse voice. As he pretentiously stroked her dry back as if not understanding what she meant, she gritted her teeth and muttered.

“No more, Triton. I can’t take anymore…. Are you trying to kill me?”

Triton’s hand stroking Livia’s back stopped. Livia, who had been growling, finally let out a long sigh of relief and went limp as if reassured.

Lazy breaths flowed regularly from her now quiet lips. Triton’s hand that had stopped in mid-air began slowly stroking Livia’s back again.

“Triton.”

His name coming from Livia’s lips sounded quite pleasant. His name flowing from the lips of the woman who had been calling him bastard, scoundrel, Damn god, and such felt almost affectionate, as if set to a melody.

With notably gentled eyes, Triton kept her seated on his thigh as if soothing a child, patting her while running his fingertips down her bony back.

“Mmm….”

Livia’s entrance tightened as her body trembled at the stimulation. Feeling her flesh tightly gripping his cock that was swollen almost to bursting, Triton let out a low sigh and tensed his hips.

Though he wanted to grab Livia’s waist while she was unconscious and rut against her like a dog just like last time, he had realized last time that it put too much strain on a human body.

Livia seemed unaware, but she had been asleep for three whole days. Even though he had used divine power to restore her body, Livia wouldn’t easily wake up. Of course, she would briefly open her eyes if forcibly awakened, but she wasn’t truly conscious. She would just blankly open her eyes for a moment before falling back asleep as if fainting.

To be this exhausted from just two days of sex…. He had heard about it, but human bodies were too weak. It was fortunate she had at least become outwardly sturdy thanks to the Styx’s blessing.

‘So I must hold back.’

Actually, he had planned to leave her alone for a few days after she woke up. He was genuinely concerned about straining her weak human body too much. Though he had intended to give her plenty of time to recover her fatigue, worried she might say she would never do it again because it was too hard. But then some furry beast had crept into Livia’s dream and…

“…The death god. I don’t know the details either.”

Death god. Death god. Death god….

Triton kissed Livia’s shoulder, then slowly laid her down on the bed.

Death god, death god. Death god….

As he kept muttering the same words repeatedly, a strange sigh suddenly escaped his lips. It was because he had pulled out his cock that had been stuffed inside her as he laid Livia down. Triton grabbed his penis, coated in a mixture of Livia’s fluids and his seed, and stroked it languidly. Just as the sensation felt strange inside, he belatedly noticed his cock had changed shape.

A small fissure was visible between the thick, swollen cock. His cock, which had been fused as one, had finished preparing to split into two from the tip.

“So that’s why she was having such a hard time….”

It meant his cock had finally swollen to double its size.

When his excitement reaches its peak, what seemed like a single organ splits from the tip into two. It was one of the remnants inherited from shark characteristics. Of course, the splitting into two is a rare occurrence. It only happens when he reaches the absolute peak, when the organ that releases ‘real semen’ appears, you could say.

Triton gently shook the split organs up and down with one hand. What had been stuck together like one completely separated piece, each taking its full form. Each was quite thick on its own, and having two made them difficult to grasp even with his large hand.

‘Livia, you’ll have to take these well….’

He had suppressed it again and again, knowing that she would be terrified and run away if he thrust both in from the start, but it was no longer possible to hold back. Perhaps next time….

He looked at the woman lying beneath him with eyes that had darkened to nearly black from their blue. Her red hair was scattered messily across the white bed, and the woman lying there was as beautiful as a single flower.

A red flower that bloomed on land and fell into the sea….

Her skin, which had been lightly tanned by Apollo’s light when she first came underwater, had now become as pale as the sea dwellers. Triton quite liked that.

A thing of the sea.

Was this woman also sinking into his waters now?

Into his palm, as his possession, completely….

His parched tongue swept across his lips. A burning thirst constricted his throat. His impatient hands increased their pace of their own accord.

“Livia, Livia….”

Which death god could be coveting you? Which bastard would dare to target ‘my human’….

His storm-filled blue eyes raged terribly. Yet his expression as he looked down at her remained as calm and arrogant as ever.



Livia regained consciousness in a completely softened state. Like something softened by water – no other description seemed more fitting. Her entire body felt heavy, as if swollen to bursting. Though she had clearly been awake for quite a while, she had no strength to raise her body.

“…This isn’t sex, it’s torture.”

Even her voice was hoarse.

She knew sex was his weakness, but in this state, she obviously couldn’t attack even if he showed his reddened heart in excitement. Wielding a knife with hands devoid of strength would barely scratch his skin.

Should she build up strength? Or perhaps get some special training somewhere? Like how to exert strength during sex, something like that….

A deep sigh escaped past Livia’s lips as she entertained these absurd thoughts. She irritably brushed back her disheveled hair, wanting to tear at her dizzy mind.

First, she needed to get up. No matter how difficult, she wanted to move while Triton was away. If she got caught up with him, it felt like she’d never be able to leave the bed.

But to regain strength, she needed to eat something….



Livia, who had groggily risen from bed, looked down at her bare body. Suspiciously, she wasn’t hungry at all. Rather, she felt uncomfortably full. When she rubbed her empty stomach, it felt filled with something.

No way. Surely not…?

Though she had joined with him again shortly after waking, he had only released once while she was conscious. Of course, she had felt it gushing inside tremendously, enough to feel like it was hitting her stomach…. But surely one time wouldn’t be enough to make her feel full. Right? No. Surely not.

‘Could he have done it again while I was asleep?’

It wasn’t an unreasonable speculation, considering how many times he had taken her while she was unconscious during their first encounter. However, for that to be the case, she felt too well-rested.

“Ah, I don’t know anymore. Really. If he did that again, he truly has no conscience…. I should eat something first and then think about it.”

Come on, gather your strength.

Just as Livia was forcing herself to rise and get off the bed, footsteps were heard beyond the pearl-footed arch-shaped passage. As she hesitated and looked up, her eyes met directly with those of a golden-haired nymph carrying two large plates through the passage.

The nymph’s face wrinkled immediately upon making eye contact with Livia. Though she quickly lowered her eyes, she didn’t bother to mask her expression. The blonde nymph, with an undisguised look of displeasure, roughly set down the plates she was carrying on the table by the window. Naturally, one plate wobbled up and down before falling and shattering with a crash.

“Oh my, what a mistake!”

The loud exclamation carried no trace of apology or embarrassment. Her expression was so blatant it appeared almost proud.

Glancing repeatedly at Livia while frowning, the nymph clicked her tongue and went outside to fetch cleaning supplies. Her boisterous behavior clearly showed her dislike for Livia.

‘Who is she…?’

Throughout her stay in the golden palace, Livia had been treated almost like an inanimate object. Whether by Triton’s orders or not, no one except Audike paid any attention to her, never spoke to her carelessly, and she could even feel them trying not to look at her.

It felt awkward at first, but she adapted quickly. After adjusting, she found it rather comfortable that no one bothered her. But this nymph was not only highly conscious of Livia’s existence but openly showed her dislike, which felt somewhat refreshing.

‘Seems like quite a dramatic personality.’

Livia didn’t bother thinking about why the nymph disliked her. There were too many obvious reasons without having to contemplate it. Besides, her neck and shoulders were currently decorated with Triton’s bite marks, so….

Instead, she asked the nymph who was pretending to clean the floor diligently while covering herself with the sheet.

“Do you have any clothes I could wear?”

The nymph, who had paused, sharply turned her head and looked Livia up and down. After seeming to contemplate for a moment, she put down the pieces she was cleaning and got up to go somewhere without saying a word about clothes.

Meanwhile, Livia went to the table where the nymph had set down the food. In the large bowl sitting alone on the table was food familiar to Livia. A bewildered expression spread across her clear face.

“…It’s meat stew?”

Stew was food made using fire. Which meant it was land food unnecessary for Triton, nymphs, and other lesser sea gods.

The presence of land food here meant someone had brought it from outside. Livia suddenly remembered her first meal here. Back then, Triton had said he had gone through the trouble of bringing the food from outside.

…Then could this also be something he brought? Why…? Perhaps, specifically for her?

Livia’s mind became confused by his actions that felt like kindness. Despite driving her to death multiple times, why would he go out of his way to get food? Was this some new form of mockery? Could there be poison in this food? Or perhaps some dark ulterior motive or scheme behind this action.

However, part of her felt he wouldn’t torment her in such a petty way. Then was this truly his genuine kindness? Surely he hadn’t grown soft just because they’d rolled around in bed a few times? Impossible. Such tender feelings from him….

“Foolish thoughts. Livia, you’re mine now.”

Livia froze at his voice suddenly echoing in her mind. If she wasn’t mistaken, what colored that arrogant god’s voice was clearly possessiveness. The unfamiliar word that invaded her mind startled her.

‘Possessiveness, towards me…?’

But thinking about it again, Triton had shown interest in her from the beginning. From when he first killed her at the feast on the waves and brought her back to land, he had shown clear curiosity about her. Livia knew this too, which was why she had seized the opportunity to win the 100-day chance.

Perhaps his interest had been piqued by how tenaciously she had come back to life from the trials he had given her. And now, they had even rolled around in bed together….

‘…He probably just sees me as an interesting toy he’s taken a liking to.’

How easy were humans to the gods? Killing them, bringing them back to life, making them special—it was all done according to their whims. The word ‘amusement’ that they used toward humans must have stemmed from such attitudes. So Livia too must be just another form of ‘amusement’ to Triton.

Moreover, he had a lover named ‘Selene.’ A noble goddess of the moon who couldn’t be compared to a mere human woman to play with for 100 days.

Her mouth turned bitter as she realized her position as nothing more than a god’s plaything. Though he played rough with her, he didn’t want her completely broken until he got bored…. That must be the extent of his feelings.

As Livia stood still in front of the food, lost in thought, suddenly a huge shadow fell over her feet. Looking up with a disbelieving expression, she found a large shark looking down at her, though she hadn’t noticed when it arrived.

“G-goodness! What are you doing here?”

Sympho, who seemed to have grown even bigger, circled around Livia before tapping her back with the tip of its tail as it passed by. Livia looked up at the shark with an incredulous expression at this familiar gesture.

Does it have no shame?

This shark had certainly seemed furious when Livia pulled out its tooth. It had been so angry that it had flipped onto its back and repeatedly banged its head against the castle walls. But both during the last trial when it helped her, and today too, somehow this shark didn’t seem to dislike her that much.

…Is it a shark thing? Do they like those who challenge them?

As she was shaking her head in disbelief, she heard the rough sound of pearl feet colliding again.

The blonde nymph who had disappeared at the mention of needing clothes returned. She hesitated upon seeing the shark at the headboard but soon approached Livia as if nothing was wrong. Then, with a seemingly apologetic face, she handed Livia a rough piece of cloth.

“This is all I could find at the moment, is that… alright?”

Though it was a rag made of patched-up old cloth that was almost embarrassing to call clothing, Livia accepted it without much concern. Without this, she would have to wear clothes roughly made from curtains or sheet fragments like last time, and this seemed better since it at least had the form of proper clothing.

“Thank you.”

The nymph seemed rather flustered by Livia’s straightforward thanks. Livia left the hesitating nymph and went behind the bed. Just as she removed the sheet wrapped around her body and was about to put on the clothes—

“Ahhh! H-help me!”

Startled by the urgent scream, she rushed out to find the blonde nymph running away screaming, with Sympho chasing after her.

Karrrrr!

The shark’s wide-split mouth released bubbles that sounded like a roar. The nymph’s terrified screams echoed sharply through the corridor. When Livia rushed outside in surprise, she could see the fleeing nymph’s tail with Sympho pursuing behind. She briefly considered whether to chase after them but it was already awkward as they had disappeared far away.

“…Surely that shark wouldn’t eat a nymph who works in the palace?”

After staring for a while in the direction they had disappeared, Livia shook her head in resignation. Moving made her suddenly feel very hungry. Turning back, Livia glanced at the table where the food was placed. It seemed a waste to throw away food that had obviously been brought from land with much effort. And it wasn’t like the food itself had done anything wrong.

Livia picked up the spoon that had fallen to the floor and approached the table. The tomato stew with chicken looked quite appetizing. Without hesitation, she scooped up a large spoonful and brought it to her mouth. The moment she swallowed it, Livia’s expression contorted.

“Hng…!”

It felt like swallowing blades rather than food. A stinging pain spread throughout her narrow throat. Livia urgently clutched her throat while coughing, but there was nothing she could spit out. With her face twisted in pain, Livia quickly stirred the stew with her spoon to examine it. Now she could see things that had been hidden under other ingredients settled at the bottom.

‘…Broken porcelain fragments?’

Startled, Livia looked down at the floor where the bowl had fallen earlier. Though the blonde nymph had cleaned the floor, tiny fragments could still be seen scattered about. As Livia picked up one of them, another scream came from outside, and the black shark suddenly leaped up past the window.

Grrrr….

Tiny water droplets burst from both sides of the shark’s angrily stretched mouth. Livia’s eyes widened urgently as she looked up at the shark.

“Are you, what are you holding in your mouth—ack!”

Every time she spoke, the pain felt like it would tear her throat, as if there was a wound inside. While clutching her aching neck with a grimaced face as she looked at Sympho, the shark spat out the nymph it had been holding in its mouth.

“Ahhh!”

The nymph who fell to the floor with a thud shrieked and curled up her body. Her trembling limbs were covered in wounds from the shark’s teeth. The nymph sobbed and clung to Livia’s feet, begging.

“P-please save me! Save me! Please save me! The sh-shark is trying to eat me…!”

“That shark… doesn’t eat nymphs or humans…”

At least not in front of Livia.

Pain shot through her throat with every word she spoke. Livia explained with difficulty through her pain-contorted face, but the blonde nymph seemed to pay no attention to Livia’s expression as she burst out shouting.

“Lies! Th-that thing was about to swallow me whole…!”

“It just… caught you, ugh! And brought you… here…”

“No! No! That thing was definitely trying to eat me! That’s why I got scared and r-ran away!”

Isn’t that even stranger?

If it had really meant to eat her, it could have swallowed her in one gulp by now and still had room for more. The fact that it brought her here without killing her suggested there must be another reason….

As Livia looked at Sympho as if asking for the reason, the shark that had been baring its teeth angrily suddenly struck the plate on the table with its tail. With a crash, the bowl fell to the floor and shattered into pieces. The red stew that had been in the bowl splattered across the floor like bloodstains.

“Eek…!”

The nymph who had been glancing at the sharp sound and the mess on the floor started hiccupping while staying curled up. Her face, filled with fear, showed traces of both faint terror and dim anger.

‘Fear…. Fear indeed.’

Livia rubbed her painful neck and slowly lowered herself to meet the nymph’s eyes. The startled nymph glared at Livia with wary eyes. Her wet eyes still held deep hostility. Meeting those fierce eyes, Livia could roughly guess what had happened.

“…Did you put porcelain fragments in the food?”

“No! I mean, it wasn’t on purpose, I just accidentally spilled some while cleaning, but… I didn’t mean to…”

So, it wasn’t intentional, but she knew the fragments had fallen in and didn’t remove them…?

The black shark that had been circling above their heads suddenly thrust its huge head forward from behind Livia. The nymph burst into tears with a piercing scream as she fell backward.

“I-it’s true! It’s true! Why aren’t you stopping that ferocious shark anyway? What are you doing! Stop it!”

The nymph’s gills trembled as she panted for breath. Seeing that reminded Livia naturally of Audike. Livia spat out the blood rising in her throat before asking.

“By the way, where’s Audike and why did you come instead? Usually Audike comes.”

“A-Audike had an upset stomach and didn’t come today. The main palace needs a high-ranking nymph, so I c-came instead of Audike.”

Livia quietly looked down at the nymph sprawled on the floor. Though she was still trembling all over because of the black shark standing behind Livia, the hostility in her eyes as she looked at Livia remained unchanged.

She seemed to really dislike her. Given what she did to the food, that much was clear. Livia rubbed her still-stinging throat once more.

She wasn’t sure whether to be thankful she only took one bite, or whether even one bite was too much, but she felt disgusted.

This was the enemy’s cradle, and she had entered it defenseless. Though there were nymphs who showed her kindness, there would be many more who disliked her, like this nymph before her. If she let this blatant attack slide, they would likely continue to look down on her. However, Livia had neither the right nor the power to punish this nymph. But she did have spite and venom.

“What’s your name?”

“…Pardon?”

“I asked what your name is.”

The nymph stared at Livia with uneasy eyes at her question. When she just stared without answering as if wondering why she would ask such a thing, Sympho slowly thrust its head forward again from behind Livia’s shoulder. Recognizing the implicit threat, the nymph reluctantly opened her mouth with a sour expression.

“…It’s Letis.”

“Letis. Yes, Letis. Tell me how this shark came to attack you.”

“I-I don’t know. It just suddenly…!”

Karrr!

As the shark opened its mouth wide in anger, Letis shut her mouth tight and turned her head away sharply. This was entirely expected. Livia let out a dry laugh and said to Letis.

“You didn’t accidentally spill bowl fragments into the food, you put them in deliberately, didn’t you?”

The startled nymph immediately shook her head, but shut her mouth tight at the shark’s threat. An unexpected witness was threatening her from close by. After gnawing on her lips for a while, Letis finally bowed her head and said,

“…I told you earlier! I just spilled a little!”

Considering that what had felt rough under the spoon wasn’t beans or nuts but all bowl fragments, it was certainly not just a little spill. Livia smirked and picked up the spoon from the floor. She gathered a spoonful of the scattered stew and held it out to Letis, saying,

“Let’s end this fairly with one bite each.”

“…What did you say?”

“I took a much bigger bite than this. This spoonful isn’t even much since it fell, so just eat it without arguing.”

Letis glared at Livia with wide eyes, her body trembling. It was amusing how she looked at her as if staring at something horrific.

“Are you crazy? I-I never thought you’d actually eat it! Who would be stupid enough to just eat that right away…!”

Livia shoved the spoon right into Letis’s mouth as she was spouting nonsense. Just as Letis’s eyes bulged and she was about to struggle, Livia grabbed her hair and twisted her head.

Reflexively, her throat bobbed heavily as Letis’s face contorted in pain.

“Urgh! Kuhh…! Cough!”

The nymph’s pale face turned bright red. As she continued coughing repeatedly, she seemed to realize that coughing only made her throat hurt more, and she glared at Livia while clearing her throat.

“You, crazy! H-how dare you…!”

“When someone does something horrible to me, I always pay them back in kind.”

The woman maintained her dignity despite wearing rags. She calmly gazed at Letis with green eyes that gleamed coldly through her disheveled red hair as she spoke. Her voice, neither too cold nor filled with boiling anger but utterly serene, rather pierced the nymph’s ears sharply.

“I hope you remember that well, Letis.”

Letis jumped to her feet, grinding her teeth with a pale face.

“You filthy human…”

As she was spitting out curses that had little impact, the black shark approached with its jaws wide open above her. Letis screamed in shock and rushed outside hurriedly, while the black shark turned to look at Livia and gently swished its tail. As if asking to be praised….

“….What?”

What do you want me to do?

Krr!

Facing Livia who was being obtuse, the black shark thrust its head forward. Livia, who had been staring at the shark in disbelief, couldn’t help but burst out laughing.

“You’re quite the funny one, aren’t you?”

Finally, when she pretended not to notice and rubbed the forehead marked with the conch seal, the shark stretched its mouth wide and released water bubbles.

Garrr, the bursting bubble sounds seemed just like laughter.

“Kack! Keck! Urgh…!”

Letis ran frantically, escaping from the golden palace. She was terrified that the shark might chase after her and bite her again.

No, perhaps what she truly feared was that human woman whom she had considered insignificant. The woman’s cold gaze as she opened Letis’s mouth without a moment’s hesitation clung to her like the afterimage of the shark.

“Huff! Kuh!”

After running mindlessly like that, Letis stopped when she was nearly out of breath and broke into rough coughing. Her throat felt like it would tear apart with each cough. Staggering, she grabbed the wall for support and suffered for a while before sharply turning around.

Her vertically split pupils were now filled with anger and resentment rather than fear.

‘How dare she, that thing?’

She never thought the woman would forcefully open her mouth and shove in stew scooped from the floor. When she had quietly accepted the rags Letis had given her, she had thought the woman was docile, but that wasn’t the case at all.

Well… if she had been as innocent and gentle as she appeared, she probably couldn’t have stayed by the sea god’s side. Her judgment had been shallow. She should have taken more time to approach… should have wormed her way in gradually like Audike….

‘No, that would have been impossible anyway. How could I pretend to be friendly with a smile when I hate her so much?’

Letis shook her head while grinding her teeth. The feeling of porcelain fragments that she had ground and added herself scratching and sticking to her throat was truly horrible. Ah, what a vicious human woman….

What did Audike find so good about taking this human woman’s side? And what was Triton thinking, keeping a human woman by his side when he had so despised them? Though she was pretty enough, she wasn’t such a beauty to compare to Lady Selene.

‘Lady Selene…’

Thinking of Selene made Letis’s heart ache even more. The only goddess who could stand beside the sea god, the noble light that brightly illuminated the dark night, a great deity who stood shoulder to shoulder with the sun…. She couldn’t understand her master who rejected such a deity’s love. Moreover, because of this, her lifelong wish had vanished like bubbles, making her hate her master.



“Serve Triton well. When your devotion shines, I shall one day call you to be my moonlight attendant.”

“Re-really? You mean I could really become one of Lady Selene’s moonlight attendants?”

When the goddess smiled benevolently and stroked her golden hair, Letis felt as happy as if she owned the whole world. To think she could become a spirit that could travel all worlds draped in night’s curtain, following the moon goddess…!

‘I thought I could finally rise upward…’

Letis buried her distorted face of despair in her hands. Though people knew that Letis’s father was of lesser divine lineage, no one knew which deity it was. This was because Letis never told anyone. She couldn’t tell. It was too shameful and embarrassing; she simply couldn’t tell anyone.

The god of the Brine Pool, a lake of death in the sea…. No, could such a being even be called a god? It was merely darkness that simply ‘existed.’

The Brine Pool was called a lake, but it was no different from a death pit filled with poison. Even sea creatures would die from the intense salinity if they accidentally fell in.

Decades ago, Letis’s mother had nearly died after accidentally falling in there. Ironically, it was the master of that death lake who saved the young nymph struggling to survive.

The lesser god sowed his seed in the nymph’s womb in exchange for saving her life. The nymph carried the child of a lesser god who could neither see nor speak, and that child was born and given the name Letis.

Letis’s origin was the darkest and quietest place in all the sea. She found this fact horrifying. She detested the unpleasant lake smell that came from him whenever he would visit her occasionally, pretending to be a father.

Letis wanted to go up above the surface, not down below. She wanted to become light rising to heights, not darkness sinking down. This had been her one and only wish since childhood, and as if by fate, someone appeared who could grant that wish.

Selene, the beautiful moon goddess….

However, the moon goddess who had been Letis’s light and hope departed. All because of that damned red-haired human woman!

“Lady Selene, why did you leave like that? Please come back and drive out that ugly human. That human is ruining Lord Triton. Please drive out that wicked human and become the mistress of the sea…!”

“How noisy. I don’t want to hear anything more about Triton. So stop bothering me now. If you approach me like this again, I will punish you then!”

“La-Lady Selene? How could you say such things! It’s me! Letis of the sea palace! The very nymph you said you would accept as your moonlight attendant!”

“…I did? Tsk, nonsense. Something like you isn’t worthy of being among the moonlight attendants. I’ll say it once more – if you bother me again, I’ll gouge out your eyes so you’ll never see moonlight again.”

It was like a bolt from the blue. Where had the kind moon goddess gone, replaced by such harsh and cold words? To even say that the promise to make her a moonlight attendant had never existed….

At first, Letis denied this terrible situation. She couldn’t accept Selene’s suddenly changed attitude. She wanted to call out to the goddess again. She wanted to beg to know if she was really abandoning her, but the threat to gouge out her eyes made her hesitate to act.

Then she became sad about her suddenly abandoned state. Letis had considered her true master to be Selene, not Triton. From the moment he took that disgusting human woman to his side, Triton’s nobility was tainted, and even her desire to worship him disappeared. She was also disappointed in his poor judgment in keeping a human woman by his side despite having Lady Selene.

Finally, anger arose. That misplaced anger was all directed at the red-haired human woman.

She felt that human woman had ruined everything.

Letis’s future, Triton’s nobility, Selene’s benevolence. They all disappeared because of that human woman!

Letis wanted to grab the human woman’s hair right away, but approaching her wasn’t easy. Since Audike practically took care of all matters related to this human woman, there was no chance to get close.

So Letis had no choice but to make Audike sick. Well, it was just enough to give her an upset stomach. At worst, she would be rolling around on the floor for a few days before returning, so Letis didn’t feel much guilt.

The original plan was to hover around the human woman and take out her frustrations bit by bit. But that incident just now had changed her mind. Letis now wanted to drive that woman out of this sea somehow.

‘What should I do? Is there a way to eliminate that human woman without revealing myself?’

While irritably rubbing her stinging throat and pondering deeply, Letis first went to remove the fragments stuck in her throat.

Throughout the deep sea, there were “colonies” similar to what humans called “markets.” The largest among them was the “Sea Hare Colony” near the seaweed forest. It had everything needed and not needed for sea life, as well as various treasures that humans had lost to the sea.

As such, there were even those who could remove things like small branches stuck in throats. Since fish was their staple food, getting bones stuck was a daily occurrence.

Letis went to see an old man who had long been called “Teacher.”

The man with large gills on the sides of his face specialized in treating sea creatures using small fish. Though there were many suspicious rumors about whether the man’s medicine had saved or killed people, nymphs often sought him out as he was the only one who performed “treatment.”

The man’s cave was located in a very deep place. Though Letis, who detested darkness, hesitated to enter, the pain in her throat was getting worse, so she had no choice but to go in.

“….Excuse me?”

There were no customers visible in the dim cave. If there was any consolation, it was that it wasn’t too dark thanks to bioluminescent organisms of unknown origin lighting up various parts of the cave.

Letis waited a bit and then called out again loudly.

“Excuse me!”

Raising her voice made her throat hurt more. Just as an extremely irritated Letis was about to venture deeper into the cave, someone suddenly rushed out from the depths and bumped past her.

“Ah!”

Just as she was about to grab the woman who was trying to pass by without apologizing for hitting her shoulder, the man called “Teacher” came out.

“What’s the matter?”

“Something’s stuck in my throat and I came to remove it… No, but who was that person?”

“That’s none of your business. Come here and I’ll remove the bone for you.”

The old man sat Letis down and whistled softly through pursed lips. As the strange vacuum sound spread widely like a dolphin’s call, a school of small fish that looked like anchovies swarmed to the old man from somewhere.

“Open your mouth, so these ones can get in!”

At the old man’s bark, she opened her mouth wide and the small fish rushed into Letis’s mouth. There was a stinging sensation for a moment, and then the treatment was over instantly. The fish that came out of Letis’s mouth spat out what they had retrieved into the old man’s hand.

“Were you so hungry that you ate something like this?”

The old man clicked his tongue while shaking off the sharp, tiny fragments the fish had spat out. Though his scolding attitude was irritating, she didn’t argue since he had solved the problem quickly.

Besides, Letis actually had something else she wanted to ask the old man. While pretending to look around, she carefully opened her mouth.

“Mister, do you happen to have something like anglerfish liver here?”

At Letis’s question, the old man raised one eyebrow and looked at her. Feeling like he was seeing right through her intentions, Letis hurriedly blurted out an excuse that wasn’t really an excuse.

“Ah, no! You see, someone in high places said they wanted to eat food made with anglerfish liver. It’s known to be very delicious, as toxic as it is, right?”

The old man’s mouth twisted as he stared at Letis through narrowed eyes, and a mocking voice flowed out.

“You’re telling me the golden palace couldn’t get anglerfish liver, so you came all the way here?”

“H-how did you know?”

When a startled Letis froze with her eyes wide open, the old man burst into rough laughter.

“A pretty young lady with fine clothes, a gold cord around her waist, and pearl pins in her hair says she serves someone high up – where else could it be but the golden palace?”

This old man was unusually perceptive. Letis quickly hardened her expression and took a step back. Even if she got poison from a place like this, there was a high chance of being discovered when things went wrong later. Moreover, it seemed better to look elsewhere since she couldn’t predict what that shrewd-looking old man might say later.

“Oh please! I-I asked because I wanted to eat it myself! Never mind if you don’t know!”

“Hahah! You want to eat anglerfish liver? That thing so toxic people only eat it before dying? Get out of here! Strong poison is used in strong places. Poison is used where poison is needed. You’re looking for poison now, aren’t you?”

“N-no, I’m not! How dare you say such things when you don’t even know…!”

“I’ve seen plenty like you ruining their own lives trying to ruin others’. Get out now! I treated you this time, but don’t ever show your face here again!”

When the old man shouted, the fish that had been playfully circling around him all rushed at Letis at once, bumping into her. Some fish even bit at her hair and skin with their tiny teeth, forcing Letis to run out of the cave screaming.

Crazy old man!

No, how did he know? He was unusually perceptive. Letis, who had been fuming, let out a deep sigh.

The anglerfish liver was a lost cause, and what remained were blue octopus poison or black shrimp eggs. Both were not easy to obtain.

Should she try to get pufferfish poison then? Though that was the easiest to obtain, the problem was that it was also easy to treat. She wanted something that would cause prolonged suffering…

“Hey.”

“Eek!”

Perhaps because she was having wicked thoughts. Letis screamed and fell backward when someone suddenly grabbed her shoulder. A long black shadow loomed over Letis, who had landed on her bottom.

“W-what do you want?!”

Letis angrily looked up at the old woman covered in black cloth.

She seemed familiar for a moment, and then she realized – it was the same black shadow that had bumped past her earlier in the cave of the one called “Teacher.”

“I have something very good for you.”

The old woman, with red-painted lips stretched into a smile under her black hood, whispered in an alluring voice.

“Something much better than anglerfish liver…. What do you say, want to hear about it?”



Clang! Clang! Clang!

The sharp sound of a blade striking hard rock echoed repeatedly from a corner of the quiet coral garden. Each time the rock was struck, strong vibrations traveled up through the wrist. It had been hours since she started striking the unbreakable rock with the knife. The palm gripping the knife was red, and sweat drenched her flushed face.

Clang! Clang!

Could she become even a little stronger this way? When she couldn’t even break one rock now, could she strike down that man’s chest with this kind of strength, when it would surely be harder than rock?

Though doubt outweighed certainty, she thought it was better than doing nothing. In truth, her mind was complicated, and if she didn’t do something, stray thoughts would keep dominating her head.

Clang! Clang! Clang!

Had Persephone gone up to the surface? Where was Echidna? How many days had passed out of the 100 days promised to Triton? There had been so many days when she was unconscious that it was hard to count the exact dates. The last time she counted was around 40 days… would it be around 50 days now?

…Clang, Clang! CLANG!!!

“Huff, hah, huff…!”

Taking shallow breaths, Livia collapsed onto the ground and clutched her stinging throat.

Drops of sweat fell at her feet. Glancing at the rock, she had struck it over 100 times, but far from breaking, it didn’t even have a single crack and remained perfectly intact. Only Livia, who had been challenging the rock, had fallen apart.

Suddenly, she wondered how her current direct challenge to Triton was any different from striking this raw rock now.

“…Really now.”

The moment those words slipped out, Livia’s brow contorted in pain. The pain that felt like it was stabbing her throat, which hadn’t been so noticeable while she was abusing her body striking the rock, intensified as soon as her body relaxed a bit.

“Cough! Ugh….”

She had thought it would get better with time, but it wasn’t at all. Whether the porcelain fragments had been digested or not, the pain rather spread from her throat to her stomach. She clutched her trembling stomach with shaking hands.

Though she had become outwardly tough thanks to the blessing of the Styx, her inner core was no different from before. Rather, through various trials and hardships, it seemed she had become weaker if anything, certainly not stronger. Suddenly, she became newly conscious of the lingering foreign sensation between her legs. Her ears instantly turned red at that raw and messy sensation.

“Damn… it…”

After wiping her cold sweat-covered forehead with the back of her hand, Livia remained collapsed there, waiting for the pain to subside. She felt utterly lost about how to treat her injured throat.

‘Just how many porcelain fragments did that nymph put in?’

She suppressed the harsh words that were about to spill out. Seeing how it hurt more the more she spoke, it seemed better to not say anything at all if possible.

As she kept letting out deep sighs, she suddenly thought how truly absurd her life was.

Though she had tried to live as ordinarily as possible, her life had become more extraordinary than anyone else’s. She felt like going to the goddess of fate and demanding answers if she ever got the chance. To ask if this was really the life she had woven for her… to shout and ask by what right she had embroidered someone else’s life in such a way.

‘I just… really just wanted to live an ordinary life.’

That was the only thing she had wanted since birth.

She just wanted to be at peace.

She wanted to live quietly without great ambition beside her family who had unhesitatingly taken her abandoned hand. A life where she would force herself up in the morning while rubbing sleepy eyes, and worry together about what to eat for dinner and how to prepare it.

She had wanted to support Iason, who dreamed of becoming a captain steering a large ship someday, and help Lete, who had wanted to study.

Just one step behind, being a small help in the lives of the family who had accepted her – that was the extent of Livia’s ambition.

How did it end up like this…?

Why did you kill innocent people like us and make things turn out this way? Why…!

Terrible depression and anger shook her simultaneously. Even thinking about it again, her revenge was justified. She had tried to live an ordinary life without greed, but they were the ones who ruined it. Wasn’t it said that greed brings disaster? Livia would gladly become their disaster.

Thanks to that, Livia was now striking an unbreakable rock with a witch’s knife in these deep waters. She had even rolled around with a god on this wet ground – what an eventful life this was.

It would be no exaggeration to say that from the moment her family died, Livia had moved at full speed away from the peaceful and ordinary life she had wanted.

‘How absurd.’

If this was really the fate allocated to her from the beginning, she couldn’t understand why such a fate had been handed to her of all people. The world was full of people who wanted to live special lives. There were probably more people who wanted to fall in love with beautiful gods than there were flowers blooming in the fields. But not her.

Losing the family she wanted to protect and living a life opposing the sea god – fate had moved in the direction Livia least wanted.

She even began to wonder if perhaps the god of fate hated her. No, maybe all the gods in this world hated her? Perhaps she… was a fate that should never have been born.

“Livia.”

At that moment, ironically, the voice of the god who had tormented her the most until now came to mind.

“From the moment you challenged me, you became mine, Livia.”

The feeling of being cruelly deeply penetrated by that massive organ that was no different from a weapon, that absurd voice whispering that I was his.

“Take out the golden dagger now, Livia.”

“I’ll let my guard down as much as you want.”

That body that held her close while giving her the knife saying he would let his guard down as much as she wanted, and even that cool body temperature….

Though he had been crueler to Livia than anyone else in the world, in bed he held her close while whispering her name in the most tender tone in the world.

He was full of such contradictions.

Wasn’t he the man who said humans were weak and detestable beings, yet casually buried his face between the legs of her, a human? He who took away her voice and acted as if he would gouge out her eyes, yet how persistently he sucked and licked her in bed.

That touch and sensation felt as vivid as if it had happened just moments ago. Perhaps because it came back too vividly, fluid suddenly gushed out between her tightly closed narrow gap. Just as a startled Livia opened her eyes wide-

“What are you thinking about so deeply?”



Of all times, the very man from her thoughts appeared behind her shoulder.

Startled, Livia tried to turn around, but Triton was faster in lifting her body. He gently picked up the sitting Livia and muttered while looking down at her with furrowed brows.

“Where did you get such trashy clothes…?”

At his displeased words, Livia examined her attire once again. Though the colors were faded and there were some holes, it wasn’t that trashy of an outfit….

Well, to someone who only sees and wears the finest things, it might indeed look quite trashy.

She briefly considered snapping back that his nymph had brought these clothes, but her throat stung too painfully to bother. In her state where even coughing hurt, she didn’t want to say anything. More bothersome was how her heart was pounding as if she’d been caught having improper thoughts just moments ago.

‘Of all times to appear….’

Knowing that gods had the ability to read human minds if they wished made her even more nervous. She had merely been recalling what happened, so why did it feel so awkward?

It must be because she was nervous…? But nervous about what? Surely she hadn’t developed any other feelings for him just from one intimate encounter and joining of bodies….

That intimacy was merely a means to an end. So it should have meant nothing, and indeed it meant nothing.

That on that rough night, she felt warmth in his cool embrace, that his voice whispering her name incessantly still clung to her ears like a curse – these were nothing significant.

sexual intimacy was inherently the closest form of contact, and Livia had never felt someone’s body heat so closely before.

Even with her beloved family, hugs and cheek kisses were all there was, so having embraced and accepted someone with her entire body until fainting must have just shocked her physically. The pleasure that felt like her body was being split apart and joined back together multiple times was also quite intense….

Yes, that’s all it was. Livia pressed her lips firmly together, settling on the conclusion that was most convenient for her.

“Why are you so quiet today?”

A hint of suspicion colored his gentle tone. Livia tried to maintain a neutral expression while belatedly struggling and resisting, telling him to put her down. Triton, who had been holding Livia tightly like a noose, suddenly changed his position to embrace her face to face.

While earlier he had been supporting her back and under her knees, now he had turned her body straight and lifted her higher than his own body.

The view of looking down at him from above felt somehow familiar, and then she remembered it was a position he favored during their intimate moments.

Triton liked the position of placing her on his knees or thighs and thrusting up into her as he pleased, and each time Livia feared his manhood might push all the way into her womb.

However, no matter how much she struggled and pushed back, he wouldn’t budge at all, making it a position that always ended in tears.

Looking down at Triton in this position without tears and pleasure felt strange to Livia. As much as she was looking down at him, he was looking up at her, and it was surprising that someone with such an arrogant personality seemed unbothered by this position…. He even appeared quite pleased as he looked up at her.

However, regardless of whatever emotions she was feeling, Triton’s smile grew deeper.

“This docile appearance is quite novel.”

In that moment, Livia’s heart sank. It shouldn’t be possible, but there wasn’t a trace of hostility in Triton’s smile as he looked at her.

Embracing and lifting her thighs with both arms, he buried his face somewhere between her chest and stomach. A face too beautiful to be pressed against such rough and worn clothes was felt against Livia’s stomach. Triton took a deep breath. As if he was trying to smell her scent.

“How strange….”

After taking in her scent to his satisfaction, he lifted his head to look at Livia. Just as a mischievous glint appeared in his deepening gaze, he spoke words that would surprise her.

“You… smell aroused.”

Though she tried not to show her bewilderment, there was nothing she could do about her stiffened face. At some point, the hands that had been wrapped around Livia’s thighs were now cupping her butocks. Unfortunately, because she was wearing thin and short clothes, his hands very easily slipped inside her clothing. His large hands instantly grabbed the plump flesh of her bottom.

“W-what are you…!”

She jerked her hips, jumping in surprise. Though she struggled to escape his touch, it was futile. Rather, the more she moved her hips, the deeper his hands delved.

One hand that had been kneading her butocks until flesh bulged between his fingers suddenly pushed its fingers into her wet womanhood.

With a squelching sound, the tightly closed gap was spread open. Livia froze with a face that looked like she might scream, while a satisfied smile bloomed on Triton’s face.

“Wet all by yourself…. Your body has become quite lewd.”

“Stop! L-let go…! cough!”

Livia, who had been shouting and having a fit, finally burst into coughs. Though she had forgotten about the pain due to tension, sure enough, as soon as she opened her mouth and made a sound, her throat hurt and felt like it was being stabbed with an iron rod.

The sudden coughing fit wouldn’t stop for quite a while. Finally, when her face had turned bright red and her throat started making metallic sounds, the coughing eventually subsided.

Triton’s face, which had been smiling with slight arousal, changed to a cold expression as if it had never happened.

“What’s wrong with your throat?”

“It’s a bit injured, uh….”

“How did that happen? Ah, no. Sympho.”

He, who was about to press Livia for answers, called for the shark that always circled around her. The black shark that had been playing what looked like wrestling with the white shark high above descended rapidly.

Triton adjusted his hold on Livia with one hand, while extending his other hand toward the shark’s forehead. A deep blue light flowing from Triton’s hand enveloped the shark. Instantly, the shark’s memories were imprinted in Triton’s pupils. His expressionless face turned cold as ice. Livia felt a chill from his gaze, completely different from when he had been touching her and bantering moments ago.

“Bring them, Sympho.”

After giving a brief command to the black shark, he looked at Livia with an irritated face.

“Why did you eat that?”

After being sent to eat it and eating it, now being scolded for eating it….

Livia responded, dumbfounded.

“Didn’t you send it for me to eat?”

At Triton’s loss for words, Livia became even more bewildered. They stared at each other with irritated expressions. Triton was the first to change his expression. Sighing as if there was no helping it, he grabbed Livia’s chin and commanded.

“Open your mouth.”

A startled Livia shook her head. It seemed like he wanted to look inside her mouth, but she wasn’t particularly keen on the idea. When Livia refused, the irritation in Triton’s eyes intensified.

“Do you have the ability to heal internal injuries by yourself?”

“…”

“It will fester if left alone, you know? Instead of suffering alone in pain until you die, just obediently open your mouth and stick out your tongue.”

Why the tongue….

Though puzzled, she was tempted by the offer of treatment. Her throat had been hurting too much to speak properly, and now her stomach was starting to hurt as well.

After hesitating while nibbling her lips, Livia slightly opened her mouth and stuck out her tongue a little. Though her eyes were full of wariness and she felt frightened, Triton’s stiff lips curved slightly at her obedient action of sticking out her tongue.

“That’s right.”

He stroked Livia’s back, praising her while pulling her closer. His lips moved slowly toward Livia’s lips. That slow approach felt like a kiss between lovers, making Livia feel awkward. Because of his terribly leisurely movement, Livia’s heartbeat seemed to speed up even more.

His breath touched the trembling tip of her tongue, unable to overcome the awkwardness. The teasing approach that almost touched but didn’t quite made her lips tingle. Just as Livia, unable to bear this strange tension any longer, tried to pull her head back, Triton quickly pressed his lips against hers.

‘Ah….’

As soon as she felt her tongue being sucked, it suddenly occurred to her that someone like him could heal her without having to attach his tongue.

However, the realization came too late.

He, who had been sucking her tongue painfully, entered Livia’s mouth unrestrainedly as if entering his own territory. His deeply thrust tongue stopped at the deep part of Livia’s tender flesh where blood was seeping out.

“Hnng…!”

A moan escaped involuntarily as his tongue tip brushed against the wound. When she looked up at him with a furrowed face, Livia’s heart sank.

Triton was looking at her. Making her assumption that he would naturally have his eyes closed seem foolish, his pupils shone persistently as if they had never once left Livia.

As she stiffened like being caught in a snare, she saw Triton’s eyes curve slightly. It was a bewitching smile.

He gently bit and licked Livia’s lower lip. It was like a kiss meant to soothe her, telling her there was nothing to be so wary about.

Her insides felt at ease as she sensed a subtle coolness, like having ice in her mouth. She could feel the wounds on her inflamed inner flesh healing as though they were being washed away. As her painfully sore throat suddenly became comfortable, Livia’s wariness melted away like snow.

As if waiting for that moment, his stiffened tongue deeply thrust into her narrow throat.

“Ah, nnh…!”

When his tongue touched the wound deep in Livia’s throat, a pained moan leaked out involuntarily. Though she wished he would quickly heal that part too, Triton’s treatment proceeded much more sluggishly than before. No, rather than treatment, his tongue kept poking at the painful spots, making her even more frustrated.

When she unconsciously wrapped her arms around his neck and pressed her body close, urging him, she heard laughter. Only then did Livia realize he had been deliberately taking his time, wanting this reaction.

Just as she was about to pull away in anger, sweet and refreshing water flowed into her connected mouth. As soon as she swallowed it, the pain that had been scratching at her stomach instantly disappeared.

As her lower lip parted in surprise with a gasp, Triton gently licked and sucked it before slowly letting go.

“You’re just too weak, Livia.”

The hand that had been caressing her waist grabbed her butocks forcefully once again. His kneading was so strong that her crushed flesh felt numb.

“Getting internal bleeding from swallowing just a few pieces of that…. What a pathetic body.”

His scolding words were bewildering, but even more ridiculous was how his hands wouldn’t leave her butocks despite those words. The way he rubbed, caressed, and kneaded made him seem more like a thug than a god.

Moreover, she couldn’t understand why he was touching her so much while calling her pathetic.

“I don’t see… what my weak body has to do with my butocks?”

Triton smiled, curling his lips upward, then bit her swollen lower lip hard as he spoke.

“How could there not be a connection? You can’t even properly take it in, making me uncomfortable like this….”

…It was outrageous to say she couldn’t take it properly.

For Livia, who had fainted and awakened multiple times trying to accommodate his desires, it was enough to make her want to jump in indignation.

Though she couldn’t gauge the exact time, the fact that she could still feel the foreign sensation in her womanhood meant she had undoubtedly been under Triton for a very long time. Yet being criticized for not taking it properly made her feel wronged.

However, hearing that even that torturous night hadn’t fully satisfied Triton made her quite fearful of what it would be like if he truly unleashed his desires completely.

She hadn’t wanted to believe it, but that such intense lovemaking had been him holding back….

Though she didn’t want to believe it, suspicious circumstances came to mind.

His body that would pause briefly whenever she writhed in discomfort, his clear and refreshing divine power that would subtly spread whenever tears leaked out despite her gritting her teeth….

“I don’t like you running around everywhere with this kind of body…. How do you expect to aim for my heart with something like this.”

A sigh mixed into his voice that had lowered in disapproval.

“When you can’t even properly handle being under me.”

Muttering mockingly, he used both hands to spread Livia’s butocks apart. As she felt her quietly closed womanhood spreading open along with it, Livia’s cheeks reddened with shame.

“I don’t plan to do that properly anyway! And put me down already, why won’t you let go?”

“Well. Because your expressions are entertaining?”

Triton pleasurably observed Livia’s face that changed moment by moment with each word he spoke.

When the hand that had been touching her butocks moved to approach somewhere deeper, her face flushed as she opened her eyes wide, worried about what might happen.

Well then, he should meet those expectations.

Triton, keeping Livia’s gaze fixed on him, pushed his finger in without hesitation.

“Hah…!”

Admirably, even in this situation, the woman’s inner flesh was still moistly wet. Having already experienced how sweet the scent from her narrow opening was when thoroughly wet, saliva kept pooling in his mouth.

Every time Triton touched Livia, he wanted to lick, suck, and devour this small body.

Of course, the urge to thrust his cock toward that deep, hot place was intense, but even stronger was the appetite that made his stomach tingle.

Why did he want to devour the woman before him so badly… What would she taste like? Would there be an even more intense taste than splitting and eating this narrow, hot flesh?

Hunger shook him so much that he wanted to chew and swallow every bit of her – every piece of flesh, every nail, every small bone.

Triton didn’t hold back and licked up Livia’s flushed cheek and earlobe. As a small scream burst from the woman’s mouth, laughter spilled from his as well.

“S-stop! We’re outside!”

The woman rejected him, crying out uselessly.

Triton created water spray behind Livia’s back to lay her down, then tore off the rags of clothing that had been bothering him. Though the small body hurriedly curled up trying to cover herself, it was futile.

“What does it matter if we’re outside? No one can enter this area without my permission anyway….”

“Still, don’t. I said I don’t want to. Not yet, I’m not ready yet!”

“Why are you refusing? Are you still in pain? I healed all your wounds…. Is it because you’re swollen?”

Triton pushed his finger into Livia’s narrow private parts as she struggled. Contrary to her words of refusal, Livia’s womanhood was moist as if ready to accept Triton.

With a squelching sound, Triton’s hand pulled out. When Triton sucked the sweet fluid that had coated his fingertips, Livia stared at him with a shocked face.

“W-why, why… no, w-why would you…”

Instead of explaining why he ate it, Triton kissed Livia with lips still carrying her scent.

When he sucked and wrapped around her stiffened tongue, it easily followed along. After rubbing and grinding with his tongue tip for a while, he slowly pulled away his head and whispered.

“It’s sweet.”

“…”

“It’s tantalizing. I need to drink more….”

“How can you be so obscene….”

Your words lose their persuasiveness when you say that with a face flushed and panting with heat, Livia….

He let out a small laugh before kissing Livia again. As he sucked her sweet saliva and caressed between her unguarded legs, her honest pussy welcomed him with wet squelching sounds, unlike her mouth.

“Ah, hn… I said stop….”

“You’re more of a drama queen than you look.”

At the words “drama queen,” Livia’s expression changed fiercely. Seeming to feel that words were no longer enough, the struggling Livia pulled Triton’s shoulder close and bit down hard.

“…”

“St… op… hnn…!”

Though her nibbling didn’t hurt much, it felt like genuine rejection, which somehow made him lose interest.

His fingertips, reluctant to leave her wet inner walls, stirred around inside the narrow flesh a few more times. Livia’s biting became more intense as she panted as though she were having a seizure. At this rate, she seemed determined to stay like that until her teeth were damaged.

Triton clicked his tongue and pulled out his hand, and only then did Livia release his shoulder from her mouth. She must have been biting mindlessly in her own way, as her mouth was drenched with saliva.

Even that somehow looked appetizing, and Triton unconsciously licked Livia’s lips. Seeing her wary gaze as if asking if he was starting again, he smiled and whispered mischievously.

“If you don’t like being outside, shall we go inside?”

It was strange how he was trying to accommodate her this much, but his heated body left him no choice. Yet the woman shook her head defiantly, not realizing how much he was holding back.

“You don’t want to do it inside or outside…. How picky.”

Though he could have forced her at any time, he deliberately held back. There was no guarantee she could endure if he forcefully spread her legs and thrust in while she whined about pain. Even if she could somehow endure it, he hadn’t revealed his weakness just to forcefully take her when she complained about pain.

“Perhaps the real problem is that you’re too weak.”

Muttering in dissatisfaction, Triton suddenly lifted Livia’s reddened palm. The small palm, which could never be called beautiful even as a lie, was covered in calluses. Curious about how it would taste, he rolled it in his mouth, but there wasn’t much flavor. Though that didn’t mean it was unpleasant to have in his mouth.

A pathetic body that gets wounded when it falls, develops calluses or wears down when used frequently…

Triton bit Livia’s calluses with his teeth while giving her a disapproving look.

“No matter how much you strike rocks with these measly hands, it’s useless, Livia.”

Livia, who had been staring at him blankly, stiffened her face at his reproachful words and pulled her hand away, saying:

“It’s better than doing nothing.”

“I don’t think I told you to do nothing? When you’re leaving aside the most effective method.”

He subtly pushed his thigh between Livia’s legs. Though the hot, moist feeling against his bare skin was pleasant to him, the woman didn’t seem to feel the same.

“Just embrace my thing and excite me, Livia.”

“I-I know. I’m not saying I won’t do it, just that not today…”

Does that mean it’s not possible today, but tomorrow would be fine? Even if not tomorrow, it would be possible once her strength recovers.

After brief consideration, Triton decided to show mercy. Well, what’s a few days…. Though he didn’t like it, it wasn’t an unreasonable amount of time.

“You’re quite leisurely, Livia. You probably don’t have that much time…. Well, I’ll respect that.”

He clicked his tongue as if regretful and pulled away his body that had been clinging to her. The woman, who seemed to have remembered something at his words, rolled her eyes and carefully asked:

“How much time exactly is left? I can’t keep track precisely because I keep fainting and waking up…. You can at least tell me that much, right?”

Time….

Though he had threatened Livia with it, time wasn’t really that important to Triton.

From the start, this bet didn’t need to follow the terms set with Livia. Though he was playing along appropriately to build excitement, he could manipulate it however he wanted if he wished.

Breaking the contract would have some consequences since contracts are sacred, but he was willing to pay certain prices if it meant satisfactory entertainment.

‘But… if she fails to successfully attack within 100 days, doesn’t Livia become mine?’

Thinking of it that way, the 100-day deadline suddenly felt quite important. Since Livia’s attacks would fail anyway, she would inevitably fall into his hands just by counting down the remaining time.

In that case, he might as well happily wait until that day….

Suddenly in a good mood, Triton grabbed Livia’s ankle. Blue power wrapped around her ankle, and in the blink of an eye, an anklet made of pearls was fastened.

“W-what’s this suddenly?”

“Each day that passes, one pearl will change color.”

Triton flicked one pearl with his fingertip. The brightly shining white pearl instantly turned a deep gray.

“You haven’t forgotten, have you, Livia? If you fail to split my heart within 100 days, on the 101st day.”

Triton gently rubbed Livia’s ankle where the anklet was wrapped with his fingertip. He could feel the woman’s pulse beating strongly behind her Achilles tendon.

“You won’t be safe either.”

Livia’s pupils trembled faintly as if she understood what Triton’s words meant. Triton happily gazed at the green eyes that would someday become his. Had he ever been so eager to wait for just a few dozen days? Thinking about it that way, she was quite an admirable woman.

Soon to be completely mine, pathetic and useless but lovely thing….



Actius nervously examined his attire. The completely dry hem of his clothes felt awkwardly light without any moisture. The small wrinkles that rarely appeared when wet also bothered him greatly. However, he couldn’t dare soil the goddess’s land with wet feet, so he had to maintain his appearance despite the awkwardness.

Though the goddess was rumored to be generous and merciful, she was as difficult to read as she was serene, and he had heard she was quite shy with strangers. Getting a flower from such a goddess’s garden would certainly not be an easy task.

Still, his situation was better than Dugong’s, who had to find Oceanus’s pearl hidden in the deep sea. The deep sea was a place even sea gods avoided, and having to search for something without physical form in such a place was quite a difficult mission.

Well, he should have done better at the coin toss.

Actius thought with a shrug. He was truly fortunate that the goddess of luck had taken his side. Feeling relieved anew, Actius took a short deep breath before leaping over the fence that marked the entrance to the goddess’s land.

Though he had only crossed a single fence, a world completely unfamiliar to the man from the sea unfolded before him.

Golden grains beautiful enough to dazzle the eyes waved at him gently, and between fields of wheat, barley, and various other crops, he could see the peaceful sight of nymphs gathering the harvest.

They seemed curious about the visitor from the sea and stood up to look at Actius. When Actius awkwardly waved his hand with an embarrassed smile, the nymphs squealed and hid themselves among the wheat fields.

It was a peaceful scene.

The bright and warm world filled with dazzling green leaves, brilliant golden crops, and sun-warmed soil looked almost glorious, as if only abundance and prosperity could exist there.

The golden fields stretching to the horizon were similar to the sea at sunset, yet the feeling they evoked was completely different.

How could they be so different, despite both being earth?

There was land under the sea too. More life took root and lived on the seabed in shallower areas, but the deep sea was entirely different. It wasn’t for nothing that they said the bottom of the deep sea bordered the underworld. The deep sea floor was closer to death than life.

Yet Actius preferred the cool seabed to these glorious-looking golden fields. Perhaps it was the instinct of living beings to long for their birthplace no matter how harsh it might be, making it seem like an inevitable truth.

Come to think of it, the seabed must be quite harsh for that human woman. Though he felt somewhat sorry seeing her struggle in various ways under Lord Triton’s grasp, there was nothing to be done about it.

Well, why did she have to show up with Echidna’s dagger….

Echidna’s golden dagger. No, Chrysaor’s golden dagger…. That was where everything began. But thinking about it again, he wondered if his master would have shown this much interest even if another human woman had appeared with that dagger.

‘It seems they’ve even shared a bed recently….’

In fact, that was what surprised Actius the most. Sharing a bed? Lord Triton having intercourse with someone!

How many gorgeous goddesses and impudent nymphs had tried to seduce him over the years? Even Echidna had failed to secure a place by his master’s side and met that tragic fate, yet this unremarkable human had succeeded.

Even Actius, who served closest to Triton, couldn’t grasp his master’s mind at all. Killing her then reviving her, tormenting her with trials, and now suddenly sharing a bed with her?

Hah… indeed, the saying was true – you can see through ten fathoms of river water, but not one fathom of sea water.

He was lost in such thoughts while walking through the fields when a hunched old man greeted him in front of a massive temple.

“Are you Lord Actius? The goddess is waiting for you.”

The old man led him inside the temple with slow steps. Actius gathered his nervousness once more as he entered the garden in the innermost part of the temple. In the massive garden that seemed impossible to be inside a temple, Demeter, the goddess of earth, welcomed Actius.

“Welcome, warrior from the sea. You need a flower I’ve grown?”

“This sea servant greets the goddess of earth.”

When Actius knelt at the goddess’s feet to show reverence, the goddess smiled and patted his shoulder.

“That’s enough. Too much courtesy is also tiring for an old goddess…. Rather, to take a flower I’ve grown, you’ll need to do me a favor….”

Here it comes.

At Demeter’s words, Actius pressed his forehead to the ground with a rather tense face and said:

“My master commanded me to perform whatever task necessary to obtain the goddess’s flower. Please tell me what you desire.”

“That’s fortunate. My nymphs know how to sow and harvest seeds, but they don’t know much about fighting and killing, so I’ve been troubled. I heard Triton’s servants are quite skilled at killing vermin…. If you don’t mind, could you kill some insects that have hatched in my back garden? I left them alone because it was bothersome, but they’ve grown too large….”

At the unexpectedly simple request, Actius had to bite his lip to hold back a smile that almost broke out.

“It’s an honor to be given the chance to clean the goddess’s garden. I will gladly help with all my strength.”

“Thank you… As it happens, a warrior from another god is here to help me too, so I’ll ask you both to clean the back garden together.”

“A warrior from another god….”

The moment he saw goddess Demeter’s smile, Actius felt an inexplicable chill on the back of his neck. He had a bad feeling. As if proving his premonition right, he sensed someone entering the goddess’s back garden. Actius’s face turned pale as he turned around nervously.

“Hello, Acti.”

A woman with scars running down her cheek and neck, purple hair tied up high, and a large spear strapped to her back smiled at him.

“…Sion.

This damned woman.

It was a dramatic reunion with the fiancée he had so desperately wanted to avoid.

The insects that had hatched in Demeter’s garden were disgustingly large.

The insects with dozens of legs like centipedes were so fast, skillfully evading Actius’s arrows as they fled.

The densely packed trees that stood like a forest served as cover for the insects, making them difficult to catch. Still, after drawing his bowstring hundreds of times, the insect corpses had piled up like a mountain.

“Phew. I think this area is cleared out now.”

When Actius stretched his hand over the pile of insect corpses, they suddenly swelled up as if they were absorbing water. Actius waved his hand toward the swollen corpses once more. Then all the moisture drained from the bodies, and they instantly crumbled into wet soil.

After finishing the cleanup, Actius looked around with wary eyes. Knowing Sion was somewhere in this forest made him feel uneasy.

His heart was pounding, and Actius felt weak, as if he had become prey rather than hunter.

‘Damn woman….’

Her temperament was so vicious and brutal that she never let go of prey once it caught her eye. Yet after spending however long it took – ten days or a month – to catch her prey, she showed neither affection nor attachment.

So Sion’s desire to catch him was probably just competitive spirit or obsession with uncaught prey. Though he couldn’t understand why she viewed her fiancé as prey…. Actius shook his head to clear away the unsettling anxiety rising within him. The silence and stillness was unbearable.

‘This won’t do. I need to clear out these insects and get out of here.’

Actius left the eastern garden and headed south. Though his arms were numb from drawing the bow so much, he didn’t want to delay for even a moment.

And so until the dusky evening, he repeatedly drew his bow dozens of times and cut off insects’ heads with his sword.

Each time an insect corpse piled up, Actius looked around with heightened vigilance. But it was all useless. Even after quite some time had passed, Sion’s absence was strange. The day was growing dark and he had cleared out all the insects in the east and south, so surely she must have made some progress on her assigned north and west areas….

‘This is really strange…. Why is it so quiet?’

Surely she couldn’t be struggling with mere insects like these….

Sion was an excellent warrior. Her spearmanship was admirable even to Actius, and her fighting skills were second to none. Moreover, her persistent nature meant she would keep charging in until victory, earning her the name of the undefeated warrior.

So while she wasn’t the type to be defeated by mere insects, the unusual silence made him worry needlessly.

‘That’s ridiculous. Worry? More like anxiety…. Wondering if she’s causing trouble somewhere….’

Though Actius tried to deny his feelings by keeping even busier, his steps kept halting. And so, unable to move forward, he stood frozen in place looking back at the quiet northern garden.

‘Maybe… I should go check?’

Just to observe the situation. Since they received the mission jointly from the goddess, the task wouldn’t be complete even if he finished his part alone.

‘…Right, I have no choice if we want to finish the goddess’s task quickly. I’ll just keep an eye on things.’

Having made his decision, Actius’s footsteps turned north.

Not knowing he was walking straight into a trap.



Actius’s expression went stiff as he surveyed the deep part of the garden. From a certain point, the insect corpses disappeared. And from there, suspicious bloodstains stretched out long….

While insect blood was murky and sticky with sap mixed in, the blood spattered on the ground was clear and bright red without any viscosity.

‘N-no way….’

Actius’s heart throbbed hotly with needless suspicion. Though thinking it couldn’t be, that it was an impossible assumption, he couldn’t stop his feet from following the bloodstains deeper inside.

Stars rose one by one in the increasingly dark sky. The forest, having lost its daytime bustle, was as silent as if it had swallowed everything. Walking with heavy steps, probing that silence, and heading toward darker places, Actius stopped with a start.

“…Sion?”

He saw a bloody mass collapsed between rocks. Since it appeared roughly the size of one woman, Actius’s heart plummeted. He rushed to the rocks in one breath to examine the bloody figure. Though not clearly visible from afar, up close the identity of the collapsed form became clear.

…A ram? Why is this here….

At that moment, just as he felt an eerie sense of déjà vu, he heard something cutting through the air. Simultaneously, a massive spear pierced into Actius’s ankle.

“Ugh!”

A scream burst out involuntarily at the searing pain. As he staggered and looked down at the spear stuck in his ankle, Sion jumped down in front of Actius.

“Don’t pull it out carelessly, Acti. What if your ankle really gets cut off?”

With an expression too excited and joyful for someone who had just speared her fiancé’s ankle with her own hands.

Actius shouted with a pale face:

“Sion! What are you doing!”

“I didn’t think you’d really fall for it either. I never thought you’d worry about me.”

Sion sat down on one knee in front of Actius, smiling shyly with a flushed face. Looking at Actius’s contorted face, she reached out and wrapped her hands around his neck. His lips were devoured in an instant.



A heated tongue invaded without hesitation between his lips that had parted in shock. As if savoring the cool man’s body temperature, she stroked and caressed every corner of Actius’s mouth with her small tongue. Actius, belatedly coming to his senses, pushed Sion away and shouted:

“Crazy woman! You’ve completely lost it! You stab someone with a spear and then kiss them?”

Actius’s voice echoed thunderously through the dark forest. Though he glared at Sion with fierce eyes, she merely ran her tongue over her lips as if regretting that his lips had pulled away.

Unperturbed by his fierce voice, Sion leaned her body closer toward Actius.

Actius wanted to back away but couldn’t move easily with the spear piercing his ankle firmly into the ground. As she drew closer, her purple hair swayed in the moonlight.

Approaching unhurriedly and slowly, Sion looked both creepy like a witch who devours people and enchanting like a fairy said to completely bewitch men.

Because he didn’t want to acknowledge this, Actius put more force in his eyes to hide his emotional turmoil. Fortunately, his face pale from pain concealed his embarrassing emotions, but Sion seemed to see something else.

Stopping in front of Actius’s face contorted with pain, Sion pulled up the corners of her mouth in a smile and put her hand between his collapsed legs.

“You call me crazy, but are you normal for getting hard when that crazy woman stabbed you?”

The witch with a fairy’s face whispered against Actius’s pale lips with an amused smile, her hand gripping his cock that stood fully erect and stiff.

“Finally caught you. My lover who’s been running away so skillfully.”

“…I’m not your lover.”

“We’re engaged and I’ve had your cock, but still not lovers?”

“That time was a mistake…!”

Sion bit down hard with her teeth on Actius’s lips as he tried to spout more nonsense. It was time to tell her lovely fiancé, who was looking at her in shock with a groan, the truth he was avoiding.

“Look, Actius. You came looking for me because you couldn’t see me. You run away from me, but when I’m not in front of you, you come to find me.”

“…Stop it.”

“Most importantly… you get hard for me even with a broken ankle.”

She smiled mischievously while gently rubbing her fiancé’s cock that couldn’t even fit in one hand. Actius grabbed Sion’s wrist in a hurry and growled:

“Don’t. Don’t touch me.”

“Just admit it already. You and I are perfect for each other. Why do you keep denying it?”



“I want you. You want me too. So why do you keep saying no?”

Sion whispered softly while planting kisses on Actius’s tightly closed lips. With each brush of her lips, she could feel his cool lips twitching and parting slightly.

And what about his cock standing so stiff in this state? Far from shrinking, it was getting more taut and hard as time passed – clearly showing that Actius wanted her too.

“Today I must get your surrender.”

“…Damn woman. You even involved the goddess?”

“You didn’t know? She’s been quite fond of me since I was young.”

Smiling mischievously as she whispered, Sion took Actius’s hand and brought it to her breast. His stiff touch froze without even properly grasping her round breast. Sion overlapped her hand on top of his and began kneading her breast herself.

“Ah… Acti….”

Moaning softly, she slipped her hand between her skirts. She moved her hand while keeping her gaze fixed on Actius. Actius too couldn’t take his eyes off Sion. When wet sounds started coming from between her slightly trembling legs, Actius couldn’t hold back anymore and pulled Sion’s neck in for a kiss.

Their aggressive tongues moved freely against each other. Even while stabbing, licking, and biting, Sion didn’t stop moving her hand and moaning. Finally, when her abundant love juices were flowing down her thighs, their lips parted briefly.

“Crazy woman…. Being with you makes me feel like I’m going crazy too. That’s why I hate it, it’s strange.”

“You think you’re normal for getting hard like this? Really?”

“That’s why I said I hate it. I’m confused enough already but you make me feel like I’m going insane. Becoming a madman because of a woman, it’s really not what I wanted.”

At Actius’s words, Sion felt chills run down her spine. Her groin grew intensely hot with an unexpected thrill.

An enormous excitement she had never felt in her life overwhelmed Sion. Unable to hold back, she grabbed Actius’s face and rubbed her lips against his frantically while speaking:

“That’s the best confession ever.”

“…Is something wrong with your head? How is this a confession?”

“Why? It’s totally sweet….”

Giggling, Sion pulled out the spear stuck in Actius’s ankle with one hand. She blocked his lips that were about to cry out in pain with her own lips, then straddled Actius’s body while frantically throwing off her clothes.

“Let’s have a baby, Acti.”

“W-wait, Sion…. Wait! This is Goddess Demeter’s…!”

Sion pulled out his fully erect cock from between Actius’s frantically moving clothes and aligned it with her wet entrance. When the head met that slippery place, Actius’s struggling movements stopped.

“Mmm…. We….”

When he met Sion’s eyes with a bright red face, not knowing what to do.

“We’re going to have lots of babies….”

Sion flashed a smile and slammed her hips down in one go.



Sion and Actius only left the garden the next day. Demeter, who had been taking a nap, smiled seeing the two emerge in complete disarray.

“Someone seems to have achieved quite a wicked victory.”

At the goddess’s words, Sion smiled brightly while Actius held his forehead with a resigned face. The goddess pretended not to see Actius’s expression and handed him the flower pot she had prepared.

“As it happens, I have one in full bloom. Take it, Actius. You earned it through quite a struggle.”

“Surely this wasn’t planned from the start, Lady Demeter?”

“Of course not. I just gratefully accepted Sion’s offer to help.”

The goddess spoke as if she knew nothing, and Actius didn’t press further. As he accepted the goddess’s flower pot with words of thanks, Demeter held out one more small red fruit to Actius.

“Take this too, Actius.”

“What is this?”

“An invitation. Please deliver it to your master.”

Demeter’s gaze reached the blue sky beyond the temple. Beyond the world of eternal abundant autumn, the true face of the seasons was revealed.

The season when harsh winter ends and fresh green sprouts emerge.

“The spring banquet will be held soon.”

It was time for Demeter’s daughter, Persephone, to return.

At dawn, Livia woke up and stared blankly at the ceiling before slowly turning around.

She saw Triton’s face, sleeping with his arm wrapped around her waist. The light from the luminous beings wandering throughout the castle slid down the face of this breathtakingly beautiful man.

‘Why on earth…’

Livia stared at the man’s face, which glowed as smoothly as if carved from porcelain, then slumped back against her pillow with a confused expression.

Though she wasn’t sure what had captured this being’s heart, she could feel him increasingly keeping her close lately.

Things like bringing meals from land and finding her wherever she was to take her to his chambers made her feel this way.

She wondered if it was because of their intimacy, but thinking about it carefully, he had shown such signs before.

Like when he insisted on kissing her to help recover her voice, or how she would always wake up in his bed after collapsing upon returning from trials. At this point, she couldn’t help but have absurd suspicions.

‘…Could it be that he’s taken a liking to me?’

With all those beautiful goddesses and nymphs around, he chose her, who had been struggling and fighting to kill him…?

Even imagining it made her embarrassed, but his actions truly left Livia confused.

Like how he insisted on making her sleep in his bed, saying she shouldn’t leave his sight, or how he brought her gossamer nightgowns fit for goddesses, claiming her shabby clothes bothered him.

Moreover, the way he casually referred to Livia as ‘his human.’ She wondered if this was what they called the whims of gods.

‘I really can’t understand…’

An inexplicable confusion rolled in and out like gentle waves in the depths of Livia’s heart. The desire to step into the water to understand it clashed with the urge to run away.

However, she had a feeling that if she entered these waters, the result would be too overwhelming for her to handle.

After this internal struggle, Livia stopped there. Just this far…

She was afraid to explore further. While she could still manage at this depth, she felt that if she went just a bit deeper, she wouldn’t be able to escape the waters.

Quietly swallowing a sigh, Livia removed the heavy arm wrapped around her waist and slowly rose. As she put her feet on the floor, she noticed the pearl anklet fastened to her ankle.

There were 46 pearls, each smaller than her pinky nail. The string of pearls wrapped around her ankle twice due to their abundance. Two of them had turned dark gray, meaning there were 44 days remaining.

Though it felt like so much had happened, only 56 days had passed… It seemed the time spent in the underworld and during the trials had been distorted.

‘When I was wandering through the desert trial, it felt like 10 years had passed…’

It felt strange and awkward, but in a way, it was fortunate. Now that she had found a weakness to target Triton’s heart, if she could just pierce through that tough exterior and stab his heart with the golden dagger…



Suddenly, Livia’s expression hardened. A strange feeling that suddenly arose stopped her thoughts. She clenched and unclenched her fist at the eerie emotion creeping up from her feet.

…An unnecessary feeling. This uneasiness.

‘He’s a god. They said gods don’t die. So… I don’t need to feel guilty. Besides, he’s driven me to death several times too. And quite cruelly at that.’

As Livia tried to rationalize with herself, she startled and looked down at her waist. His hand that she had pushed away was once again holding her waist. As she stiffened, a strong force pulled her back deep into the bed.

“I told you to lie still today, promising I wouldn’t touch you.”

Triton lightly pulled the awkwardly stiff Livia to face him. He held her so tightly that his thick chest pressed against her cheeks and forehead.

She felt his cool temperature against her skin, which was warmer than that of ordinary people. Though he hadn’t embraced her tightly enough to suffocate her, her breathing grew slightly rapid with tension.

It felt as if this firm and massive embrace had washed over her like a wave and completely engulfed her. Feeling that struggling would only pull her in deeper, Livia carefully drew her head back while remaining tense. At this, Triton’s closed eyelids slowly lifted.

Despite the surrounding darkness, every strand of his silver eyelashes moving slowly up and down was clearly visible.

And what of the eyes hidden beneath? Like the luminous beings that glowed without light, a light also shimmered in his blue eyes. That cool gleam was more mysterious and enchanting than frightening, enough to momentarily entrance even the tension-frozen Livia.

Triton, who had been quietly gazing at her, suddenly let out a laugh.

Just suddenly, as if it were nothing… That languid and quiet laugh seeped coolly into the depths of Livia’s heart.

“Are you a stone? So stiff…”

Though it wasn’t particularly insulting, Livia, who had belatedly come to her senses, awkwardly widened her eyes. She was afraid he might detect her weak wavering. For some reason, she didn’t want him to discover anything about her.

Whether aware of this or not, Triton, facing Livia, pulled her closer without much concern.

The two bodies pressed completely together. Livia reflexively pushed him away with both hands. This naturally led to her hands touching his chest. Because of this, she could feel Triton’s strongly beating heart through the thin skin of her palms.

“You should sleep a bit more, Livia. You might not be able to sleep tomorrow.”

Triton whispered in Livia’s ear and closed his eyes again. She briefly felt his hands caressing her shoulders and back.

…In her life, had there ever been someone who held her this tightly and touched her all day long?

Even her family, whom Livia so loved and missed, had never embraced her in this way.

They were not a blood-related family, and her father and brothers had been extremely careful about touching Livia.

That’s why this closely pressed warmth was very unfamiliar and awkward to her. Although his cool skin wasn’t warm, the smooth and soft feeling of his skin was addictive. Moreover, since Livia had always had an unusually high body temperature and was sensitive to heat, this cool sensation actually felt quite pleasant.

Suddenly, she felt an urge to caress this skin beneath her hands. The urge soon became a longing, and the longing began to dominate and shake Livia. Her fingertips resting on his thick chest began to tremble slightly, as if wanting to move right away.

It was amusing. Unlike him, who freely embraced, caressed, licked, and tasted her body as he pleased, she found it difficult and awkward to even touch his body.

Why was that? Because she had never done it before? Because she felt that once she touched him, she would want to keep touching? What exactly was she afraid of…

Livia felt as if she heard drum sounds floating in her head. Whether it was a warning drum or her rapidly beating heart was unclear, but one thing was certain.

That this arrogant god’s tenderness, bestowed as mere amusement, would surely affect her.

Though Triton told her to sleep a bit more, she couldn’t easily fall asleep. Through her trembling palm, the very heart she had sworn to shatter someday continued to beat strongly, making its presence known.

However, as the warmth of their overlapping bodies gradually increased, her wide-open eyelids began to grow heavy. At some point, as she unconsciously buried her face seeking a deeper, more comfortable place, she thought she heard gentle laughter near her head. But since she was already caught in slumber, she didn’t raise her head.

When Livia, who had dozed off, opened her eyes again, it was when Triton’s subordinate Actius appeared in Triton’s chambers with some flowers and fruits, looking quite disheveled.



“I’ve brought the flowers from Lady Demeter that you mentioned.”

Actius, with dark circles under his eyes, staggered towards Triton’s feet and carefully set down the flowerpot. While stepping back, he tried his best not to look at the bed, but his passing glance caught sight of a woman’s bare legs.

‘Did he keep her by his side while sleeping today too?’

Though he surely wasn’t really sleeping, it bothered him that his lord kept that human woman constantly by his side.

The woman seemed to have just woken up, rising groggily. Her bright red hair, so unsuited to the sea, could be seen flowing down her bare shoulders and chest visible above the loosely draped clothes.

For Actius, who had never seen any woman other than Sion as a woman, he watched this without much interest until he suddenly remembered the message delivered by the moon goddess.

Please, beware of the red, my Triton.

Could that red the goddess spoke of possibly be this?

Though he wanted to laugh at himself for thinking how such a lowly human could possibly threaten the god of the sea, wasn’t it always humans who killed merpeople? While it was disgraceful to regard Lord Triton as a mere merperson, either way, there was no harm in being careful.

As his fairly reasonable suspicion arose, his eyes narrowed slightly. As he glared at the woman with sharp eyes, water bubbles suddenly rose before him.



When Actius startled and turned his head, he saw Triton staring at him with a twisted smile.

“Did I say anyone could look?”

“…I apologize.”

Though he quickly bowed his head deeply, his back felt chilled. Unable to breathe from the pressure squeezing his neck, he pressed his head down deeply.

His master was generally merciful, but made no exceptions when it came to touching what was his. This was both the most important thing to be careful of as his servant, and the most reassuring thing as an ally.

Wait, then… Does this mean the master has now included that woman in the category of ‘his’?

This strange realization surprised Actius, but he didn’t dare raise his head to look at the woman again, as that would be too bold. The tension lingered briefly before dissipating.

Triton reached for the flowerpot Actius had placed on the floor. The red flower that had been holding its head high on the stem fell off and floated over to land on his palm.

“She said it was a precious flower, but she gave it up more easily than I expected.”

“…Easily?”

At Actius’s words that burst out as if grieved, Triton laughed. He had thought it was obtained easily since it was brought in just one night, but it seemed he had struggled quite a bit in the process.

It was said that if humans chewed Demeter’s flowers raw, their bodies would transform to be able to purify most poisons. While the flower wasn’t particularly useful to gods, it was apparently a precious treasure that humans desperately wanted to obtain.

He held the flower and pulled Livia into his embrace. Her small body nestled into him as they were made to fit together. Of course, she was staring at him stiffly as always, but it was a gaze that didn’t bother him at all.

“Ah, open up.”

She wasn’t the type to obey readily. As expected, she first shook her head in refusal and kept her lips tightly closed. Since he had anticipated all these reactions, her prickliness only seemed cute.

“It doesn’t matter if you don’t open up. There’s fun in forcing it open.”

At his words whispered in her ear, Livia’s face instantly contorted. Triton restrained her as she tried to struggle and forcefully opened her mouth to push in the flower. He covered her mouth as she tried to spit it out and quietly whispered.

“It would be better to chew and swallow it quietly if you don’t want something else in your mouth. It’s good for you.”

Her eyes showed fear that he might have fed her something strange. She probably thought of something like Dionysus’s wine that excites the body. However, Triton had no intention of feeding such things to Livia in front of Actius.

While enjoying watching Livia chew the flower with an obviously forced expression, Triton belatedly noticed that Actius was still there.

“Why aren’t you leaving? Go rest now.”

“Actually, Lady Demeter had one more thing to convey to Lord Triton.”

Actius gently placed Demeter’s fruit on the floor while keeping his eyes fixed downward. Triton glanced at the fruit on the floor and asked.

“What is this?”

“The spring banquet will be held soon. Lady Demeter has sent an invitation to the banquet.”

At that moment, Livia, who had been diligently chewing the flower, sharply turned her head.

Livia stared at Actius’s fingertips so intently that she stopped her laborious chewing of the flower.

‘That fruit….’

That small, round, purple fruit barely the size of a fingernail was Demeter’s invitation?

If so, that meant having that fruit would allow one to attend her banquet.

Demeter’s banquet that was being held for Persephone…

After swallowing the terribly-tasting flower, Livia’s eyes fixated intensely on Demeter’s fruit.

She didn’t even notice Triton watching her with a curious gaze.



After finishing his report, Actius withdrew unsteadily with his haggard face. While following his departing figure with her eyes, Livia pondered.

The spring banquet.

It was exactly where Zagreus had mentioned. Since he said he would bring Lete’s soul, Livia absolutely had to go there.

But how…?

As she contemplated, she looked up at the man who held the quickest and surest way, only to startle. Their gazes had locked immediately as if he had been watching her from the start.

As their eyes met, Triton’s eyes, which held a strange smile, narrowed. Livia quickly lowered her gaze from his eyes that shone so sharply as if they could expose all her inner thoughts. Though she hadn’t done anything wrong, her heart inexplicably dropped.

“You look like you have something to say?”

Trying not to show her startled reaction, she lowered her gaze further, only to see his hand holding Demeter’s fruit. Watching him slowly roll the fruit between his fingers, she couldn’t help but swallow hard.

‘I need to get that….’

Blind and desperate longing filled Livia’s eyes as she stared at Triton’s fingertips. However, wracking her insufficient wisdom didn’t yield any plausible strategies at the moment. Her mind only grew more urgent at the thought that the banquet invitation was right before her eyes yet she couldn’t obtain it.

Then… when you have neither possessions nor time, but are desperate, the fastest way was to confront it directly.

“Um….”

When Livia, who had been frozen stiff, opened her mouth and looked at him again, Triton tilted his head with an apparently interested expression. His dazzlingly beautiful silver-blue hair cascaded toward Livia.

For a moment, she blanked out at the sudden desire to touch it. The fact that he was the most beautiful god of the sea struck her anew. No wonder stories circulated about people being helplessly enchanted.

But beauty and dignity were different matters, weren’t they? Triton, who had been looking down at Livia with a face that seemed capable of enchanting all creation, suddenly grabbed her breast like a thug.

Startled out of her wits, she hurriedly grabbed his wrist and shouted.

“W-what are you doing so suddenly!”

“Just… because I wanted to touch?”

“You can’t just suddenly grab someone’s breast just because you want to…!”

“So if it’s not sudden, if I give warning, it’s okay?”

“Of course not!”

“See? That’s why from my perspective, it’s better to touch without warning.”

How outrageous.

Either way, she meant don’t touch at all, but this shameless man continued kneading her breast, paying no mind to Livia’s restraining hands.

As he massaged her round breast with his large hand, at some point he began gently pinching her perked nipple with his fingertips while whispering.

“So what did you want to say, Livia?”

The tingling sensation momentarily wiped her mind blank of all thoughts before they slowly returned.

Livia squirmed, trying to control her hips that wanted to arch up, but this only resulted in burrowing deeper into his embrace. Barely suppressing her rapidly rising arousal, she spoke urgently.

“I want to go to Demeter’s banquet. Take me with you.”

Triton’s hands, which had been roaming all over Livia’s skin, stopped. His head tilted slightly as he looked down at Livia quietly.

“Demeter’s banquet? Why there?”

“…I want to go too. Take me with you.”

“How brazen.”

At his reproachful voice, Livia’s cheeks reddened.

She knew he had absolutely no reason to take her there, but right now, this man was the only one who had the means to go there immediately. So she had no choice but to beg…

“Y-you received an invitation, so aren’t you going? Then just take me along too. Please, I’m begging you.”

Triton’s Adam’s apple bobbed suspiciously, and simultaneously his stopped fingers began moving again. As he lightly scratched the pink nipple that had hardened into a peak with his index finger, he suddenly twisted it hard.

Livia grabbed his forearm in alarm, but it was useless.

“Stop. Stop touching, please…!”

“If you feel wronged, you can touch me too. I’ll be generous and understand.”

“I-I don’t particularly want to touch you!”

“Oh? That’s different from what your explicit gaze says.”

She wanted to refute immediately, but hesitated as his face was too close.

“You tend to be quite honest with your expressions, Livia.”

Could it be… had her earlier thoughts about wanting to touch his hair shown on her face? Having something to feel guilty about made her throat go dry.

“Even now you say you don’t like it, but your face says otherwise.”

As she turned her head away with a deeply flushed face, his lips captured her earlobe while simultaneously twisting her nipple hard.

“Ahh…!”

As the suppressed moan burst out, Triton let out a low laugh. Livia, who was particularly weak to ear stimulation, couldn’t think straight when Triton took her earlobe into his mouth and rolled it around.

Moreover, his touches caressing various parts of her body were so gentle and delicate that it was harder to resist with disgust like before.

His touch, as if caressing something precious, felt more affectionate than lewd. Without any sense of dislike, thoughts of wanting him to touch more welled up. Such touches were unfair.

“Seems you like being touched like this. Gentle, soft…. Right?”

As he licked her ear shell and whispered quietly, her hips twisted involuntarily. Livia’s body stiffened as she belatedly realized this wasn’t an action to push him away, but rather to press herself against his touch.

…No. This isn’t right. This really wasn’t right.

Had she gotten used to Triton’s touch? Livia was greatly shocked to realize she had unconsciously tried to move her body seeking pleasure.

She urgently pushed him away. Then, rolling off his lap, she hurriedly backed away.

Triton raised his eyebrow crookedly at her sudden escape from his embrace. His voice deepened as if to show his displeasure.

“Come here, Livia.”

“…Do you think I’m your toy? That you can just touch me however you want…!”

“Why not? Me getting excited because of you should be good for you too, right?”

While not wrong, it wasn’t something she could simply accept. After all, even if his heart turned red from excitement now, Livia couldn’t properly attack with her strength.

Livia glared at him with a somewhat wronged expression as she backed away.

She didn’t like how her body was becoming increasingly accustomed to Triton’s touch. It was frightening and uncomfortable. Trying to hide her frightened inner thoughts, she forced out a cold voice and said.

“What good is it to excite you now when I can’t even properly stab you with my current strength?”

Triton’s mouth corner twisted up sharply. He replied in an equally cold voice.

“But do you have any other options?”

Triton’s words silenced her.

Other options…

There couldn’t be any other options. Even knowing his heart could turn red was a weakness she had barely discovered by clinging to him. Hadn’t she said she would do anything for revenge…

Then why was she stopping now, afraid of something?

Confusion overwhelmed her. A faint sense of defeat spread across Livia’s face.

Livia stood still, glaring at Triton. Though irritation welled up at her own ambivalent state of being unable to move either way, she couldn’t act rashly.

He was a predator, and she was merely a weak prey not even worth a single bite to this man…. The vigilance and fear needed to avoid being devoured was always the prey’s burden.

As she stood neither approaching nor retreating, just glaring at him, Triton, who had been observing her, suddenly spoke.

“Earlier, you asked me to take you if I was going to Demeter’s banquet.”

A faint hope bloomed on Livia’s face at this welcome change of topic. Triton’s mouth opened and closed as he stared at this.

He seemed to be thinking something as his gaze moved downward, then suddenly he slowly pulled up the corners of his mouth in a smile and said.

“Aren’t you curious about my answer, Livia?”

It didn’t take long to realize what his smile meant. Livia’s face paled as she glared fiercely, but soon her eyes drooped.

What she wanted was ultimately in Triton’s hands. From the small matter of Demeter’s invitation to the greater power to shake destiny without being swayed by mere witches…

Unlike her who had sacrificed everything for revenge, Triton could majestically control everything at will. Even her desperate feelings were mere entertainment to him.

So, she was ultimately just a pathetic weakling before Triton. While that was the natural position of humans before gods, for some reason, that feeling was particularly humiliating when it came to Triton.

…But that didn’t give her any other choices, so she had to do as he wanted.

Livia moved her feet slowly with a crumbling expression. As she stood before him with reluctant steps, Triton’s expression also sank coldly as he quietly gazed at her.

“…I only asked you to come closer, yet what an expression you made.”



“If I asked you to suck my cock in this state, you’d act like the world was ending.”

Livia tensed her body to keep from shivering at the chill that permeated his voice as she barely moved her lips to ask.

“…If I do that, will you give me what I want?”

With Livia’s words, the current changed. The seawater that had been swirling coolly around them suddenly turned rough. Triton’s expression changed likewise. The coldness remained, but the smile that had been hanging at the corners of his mouth disappeared.

Triton, who had been quietly staring at her, twisted his lips and said.

“You must really hate me, don’t you?”

…What kind of answer was he looking for? Surely he wasn’t hoping for her to deny it?

After all the times he had mocked and toyed with her, pushing her to death….

Livia’s heart pounded violently. Triton was right.

She hated him. The sea god who claimed to deeply despise humans, whom she had only used as a means of revenge. She couldn’t confront him without harboring animosity. So she had to hate him, it was only right to be hostile and loathe him.

However… if asked whether hatred was all she felt, that wasn’t quite true.

While her hostility toward him remained, beyond that, a kind of emotion she didn’t recognize was beginning to sprout.

Livia bit down hard on her trembling lips. Her face suddenly turned pale as if she had encountered something shocking. Her fingertips even started trembling as if all the blood was draining from her body.

‘Not just hatred. Not only hate…? What kind of emotion is this?’

Her heart grew cold, as if she had only now realized that the waters she had dipped her feet into out of curiosity were far deeper than she had thought.

As if trying to deny her own mistake, she unconsciously took a step back. Suddenly, the being before her felt overwhelmingly distant and frightening. Reading something in Livia’s expression, Triton’s face noticeably hardened.

“You have an excellent talent for fouling my mood.”

He swept back his falling hair with an irritated gesture and twisted his lips into a smile. Even with that twisted smile on his wet lips, he was unrealistically beautiful.

She stared blankly at how he could produce such a rough and barbaric voice with that elegant and sparkling face.

“Even if you hate it, you wouldn’t mind sucking cock if it serves your purpose, right? That’s the kind of human you are, Livia.”

His mocking voice pierced Livia’s ears. At the same time, she saw him casually pull aside his disheveled pallium to expose his penis as he sat askew on the bed.



As she glared at him with a pale face, Triton met her gaze with an incomparably elegant expression. Tossing his head as if ordering a subordinate.

“What are you doing? Kneel, Livia.”

With that sweet voice that deceived people.

“Suck it until I’m satisfied. Then I’ll give you an answer that will satisfy you.”

Livia glared at the exposed penis with trembling eyes.

Whether it was half-erect, or half-dead from being erect, the moderately swollen cock twitched provocatively at Livia. Triton leisurely gripped and stroked his half-erect penis with his large, pale hand.

“Why are you just standing there? Can’t do it?”

At his mocking voice, Livia promptly replied.

“…No, I can do it.”

His demand was almost welcome, she thought.

This was the only kind of relationship between him and her. Without expecting or wanting anything, just searching for each other’s weaknesses and provoking as they pleased until they got what they needed….

That was all. That was it.

Thinking that way made Livia’s mind easier, even if it left a foul taste.

Livia knelt before him, positioning herself under those ice-blue eyes that coldly stared down at her.

An awkward hand approached his cock, gripping it as if to take hold before temporarily stopping. After a small intake of breath, the woman hesitated before finally grasping Triton’s cock. The man’s body felt chilly, even his penis was slightly cold. As he touched it tentatively, a stifling sigh came from above.

…Haah.

It felt as if the breath had settled on the back of his neck, causing his hairs to stand on end. Livia, hearing the thumping of her heart anew, slowly lowered her body. The enormous organ touched her lips.

She gradually pushed it into her mouth, but only the tip entered. If she were to take it all in, her jaw would surely dislocate or her lips tear; therefore, Livia had no choice but to be cautious.

Instead, Livia maximized her use of her tongue. She gently ran her tongue tip over the rounded glans and sucked the blood vessels that stood out on the column with her lip, which made her feel an unpleasant sensation in her throat.

“Ah, Livia….”

Upon hearing his name, she glanced upward. With his eyes half-closed, he gazed at Livia while biting his lip. The heat of the dishevelled god was overly obscene.

‘Is he…satisfied…?’

With tears forming in her eyes, she continuously gauged his expression. He closed his eyes, savoring the pleasure she gave, and then looked at Livia, curving his lip.

“You haven’t even inserted it halfway, Livia.”

All of a sudden, he grasped her nape. Simultaneously, he forced her head to move.

“Heuk!”

Startled, she tried to pull back, but it was futile. As the organ pushed up to her throat, she felt her breathing cut off and tears streamed down her eyes. Livia, struggling against Triton, whispered to her.

“You don’t want to just listen to half of my answer, do you?”

Her attempt to pull back stopped abruptly. Her face, unable to catch its breath, looked fiercely at Triton, then held onto his thigh. She moved her widely opened mouth by herself.

“Ah….”

Her small mouth desperately moved his organ.

Satisfaction, buried deep within, surged through Triton’s entire body. He moaned in a low voice as he looked down at Livia’s small head that was bobbing up and down.

It was absurd enough that she actually did as told, yet she was even going to the trouble of doing it attentively.

‘Damn you, Livia….’

Triton was not at all pleased with Livia’s actions.

What thoughts could possibly be contained in that small head of hers? When he told her to come closer, the sight of the woman backing away with terrified eyes turned his insides pitch black with rage.

Every time Triton held her in his hands and tried to be a little nicer to her, thinking it would bring satisfaction, this woman was filled with thoughts of escape rather than accepting his kindness.

Just as he told her to come with fire in her eyes, she only thinks about getting further away, really.

This fragile thing that would die from a slight squeeze constantly grated on his nerves. He wanted to just kill her, but then he’d see those ridiculously innocent green eyes and his anger would subside, leaving him bewildered at himself.

However, just because his anger was suppressed didn’t mean the stimulation disappeared, and his arousal steadily grew. He was overwhelmingly turned on by that little tongue struggling to lick and suck his cock with that tiny mouth.

Not that she was skillful or anything. Sharply pointed teeth scraped all over his cock. As if she was frustrated with sucking, she even tried to bite down. She was clumsy and ill-tempered, it was hard to tell if she was sucking or gnawing on his cock.

“Haah…Ugh…Uhh…”

Straining and baring her teeth, Livia glared at Triton’s frowning face, then as if nothing had happened, gently moved her tongue.

It was so absurd that he almost laughed.

After all, she was a clever girl. Only she could tolerate such awkward and aggressive biting. No ordinary man could withstand this girl.

Triton could accept even if Livia were to bite and swallow his manhood. Therefore, he must be the only one who could accept this woman.

A woman who needs to be at least a deity’s level to match with, despite being human…. Her stubbornness and difficult temperament, which never let anything pass easily, weren’t entirely bad traits.

Thinking about it that way, even these inexperienced movements weren’t so bad. Though it would cause him pain too, the thought of Livia biting and swallowing a part of him….

“Hng…. ugh, ngh!”

As if sensing his penis swelling once again, Livia’s eyes went wide with surprise as her body jerked. Triton kept his eyes closed as he held her head. As his manhood pushed in deeply as if to block her throat completely, Livia urgently grabbed his thighs and tensed her body.

No, you don’t. You must swallow it all, Livia.

Triton gripped her head to prevent her from backing away any further and thrust his hips upward.

“Hnng…ngh…!”

Though he could hear her choking sounds as she struggled to breathe, he couldn’t stop pushing his cock in. Livia moaned but appeared to be crying.

“Why are you so desperate to go to Demeter’s feast that you’d even do this? To meet Persephone? To ask her for something again?”

Triton asked while caressing Livia’s soft earlobe. Of course, he knew she couldn’t answer with her mouth full, so this was closer to him talking to himself.

Livia, Livia Horn….

Though she was irritating, the more he looked at her, the more enticing she became. While she was clearly far from what one would call sensual, she was strangely erotic. He had never been particularly interested in the pleasures of intimacy before, but it was different with Livia. His body would heat up just from her reaching out to touch him.

‘To a mere human like you, I….’

Though he had treated her kindly, calling her pretty even when she wasn’t being pretty at all, she kept acting up without knowing her place, so what should he do with her?

Since she would become his eventually anyway, should he just wait and watch, or… should he teach her a lesson to make her realize her place sooner rather than later?

“What should I do, Livia…. Actually, I wasn’t planning to go to that feast, but seeing you work so hard, even pleasuring me like this, I’m starting to think maybe I should go….”

For his gentle tone of words, the speed at which he thrust into her mouth hardly decreased. With each thrust, her muffled crying grew louder.

While part of him felt sorry for this small, fragile being in pain, he had no intention of stopping. The image of her daring to refuse him and backing away lingered in his mind. Just how could he make her submit completely…. This coiled thought dominated Triton’s mind.

“You need to open your jaw wider, Livia. Your lips will tear at this rate.”

“Ugh, ngh…. ngh!”

Glancing down, he could already see blood showing at her widely stretched lips. When Triton reached out to gently rub her lips, the bleeding stopped and the wounds disappeared.

Looking down at Livia with satisfaction, he could see her green eyes trembling in disbelief as she realized what he had done.

“Of course, even if you break, I’ll just fix you and use you again.”

He liked those eyes that glared at him so fiercely. His hand, which had been playing with her earlobe and cheek, reached out to stroke her eyes as he whispered.

“Don’t take your eyes off me, Livia. Keep looking at me, continuously….”

Livia, who had been sobbing, bared her teeth again. He could feel her biting down strongly as if to actually bite it off, but she couldn’t stop Triton. Holding her cheeks with both hands, he pushed his cock deep into her narrow throat.

The tightening and releasing hole wrapped around him snugly, just like Livia’s lower opening. As an intense pleasure rushed to his head, his penis that was pressed against her throat began to twitch and split open.

Livia too seemed to sense something was wrong as her body stiffened. As if primal fear had risen, her resistance grew fiercer. She pulled her hips back and repeatedly hit Triton’s thighs that held her, struggling to move backward.

“Ngh, nngh…! Huu…! Nngh!”

With tears streaming down her face, she scratched and pinched his legs. He could feel her throat vibrating finely with her sobs.

At the same time, his cock, swollen rock-hard, began to split completely with a squelching sound. He could feel her trembling tongue tracing the changing shape of his penis.

“Ah, Livia….”

Triton looked down at her with a smile that was like a sigh between his teeth.

As if sensing something fearful, she desperately pushed him away with a face like she might die at any moment. Despite having endured until the tip touched her throat, Triton withdrew obediently.

Then his dick, thoroughly soaked with Livia’s saliva, emerged outside with a pop, like being pushed out of her mouth.

The only difference from before was,



That the grotesquely large and thick thing had become two.

Triton held his two slick, glistening members and stroked them languidly back and forth.

Livia’s eyes, filled with fear and shock, traced over the two menacingly erect organs following his hand’s movement.

Her lips, swollen nearly to bursting, quivered briefly before stopping. Her trembling eyes slowly looked up at him, then down again.

‘How could… those be… two….’

Her thoughts kept starting and stopping. Then suddenly, when the situation fully registered, she unconsciously covered her mouth with her hand.

“Why are you so surprised, Livia?”

He looked down at Livia who had fallen backwards, with a chilling smile.

It didn’t seem real – this impossibly beautiful man whose beauty surpassed even the word dazzling under his scattered silver hair, holding two fearsome members while looking down at her.

The terrifying sight created by this man who looked like he belonged in a masterpiece painting numbed her senses. Livia’s dazed gaze slipped down to his reddened chest area.

Her heated gaze stared blankly at his bright red heart, alternating between that and the two members that were too perfectly shaped and lovely to be called monstrous despite being swollen.

Livia’s jaw trembled as she looked back and forth between them. As she froze, not knowing how to react, Triton guided her hand that was covering her mouth to grip his members.

“Touch them. You made them like this after all.”

…I made them? This happened because of me?

Livia stared with shocked eyes at the manhood before her that had perfectly split into two. The members had swollen even more after splitting in two, doubling in thickness, yet somehow didn’t feel grotesque or bizarre at all.

Though this was Livia’s first time seeing a man’s penis up close, she felt certain that this kind of shape… must be unique to Triton alone.

How could something that was one become two?

As she held them still where Triton had placed them, staring blankly, Livia’s hand moved unconsciously. The shock and curiosity that made her forget even the soreness in her mouth and his humiliating words completely dominated her.

…Gulp.

After swallowing dryly past her raw throat, Livia gently stroked the two pulsing pillars, which twitched and responded as if competing with each other. When the startled Livia tried to pull her hand back, Triton’s hand firmly covered hers to hold her in place.

When she looked up at him with trembling eyes, he moved her hand with his eyes closed languidly. Pressing down on her palm as if it were his own hand, he moved it up and down, making the two rock-hard members slip and rub against each other inside Livia’s palm.

Squelch, slick, squish….

The lewdest sounds leaked from within Livia’s trembling palm. Just the tactile sensation and sounds made Livia feel her very soul becoming defiled.

“Ah….”

Triton exhaled languorously as he looked down at her with his eyes. When those blue eyes that seemed to contain a turbulent ocean gazed down at her, she felt overwhelmed by an unspoken force.

Her hips unconsciously shifted at the obscene sight and sensation that threatened to make her eyes pop out. At that moment, the two rubbing members poked at her lips.



When she jerked back in surprise, he showed his teeth in a smile.

“What? Can’t suck them anymore?”

It wasn’t a matter of whether she could or couldn’t. Those, or rather those things, would physically not fit in her mouth. But if it was just one….

Livia silently glared at his members with confused eyes before looking up at him as if having made some decision.

“I, I can do it. No, I’ll try. But in exchange… if you’re not going to the banquet, give me Demeter’s seed.”

At that moment, Triton’s brows drew together. His gaze coiled and bore down on her piercingly. A gasp-like sigh escaped between his parted lips before his expression hardened completely. His languid touch suddenly turned sharp as he grabbed Livia’s hair.



As she gasped in surprise, Livia’s head was yanked upward by his hand. Triton’s face suddenly came very close.

However, his expression that had been smiling beautifully and arrogantly was now cold and stern as it pressed down on her severely.

“You insolent human…. You think I’m a joke because I’ve been nice to you, is that it?”

“Wh-what…?”

“Because I personally told you my weakness with my own mouth, you think I’m pathetic?”

He grabbed and lifted Livia’s throat as if to strangle her, his face twisting into a smile. Though her breath was cut off, what was more frightening was the killing intent in his eyes. Though she didn’t know what had upset his mood, Triton’s aura had turned as sharp as a blade.

“Echidna or whatever, if my mood turns foul I can kill someone like you on the spot anytime, Livia.”

“Why, why are you doing this…!”

“Do I look like a god who’ll lay anything at a worthless human’s feet just for sucking my cock? Or did you think you could manipulate me however you wanted?”

“That’s not… ack!”

“Not knowing your place….”

Livia struggled but couldn’t escape his grasp.

Her breath was getting completely cut off, and her vision kept blurring in and out. Her throat, already raw and swollen, constricted painfully as if countless blades were slicing into it.

However, more than his threat that he could kill her at any moment, his suddenly transformed gaze frightened her more.

The gentle light that had remained lukewarm no matter what impudence she showed had now burned black to ash before her eyes.

Instantly, terror welled up. Like sinking into a bottomless ocean depth, black terror pressed down on her.

“Why are you, hng… why are you doing this! I… I just…. I only said exactly what you said…!”

Triton’s violent actions stopped suddenly at Livia’s words.

‘Exactly what you said.’

Just as Livia said, it was exactly what Triton had said. He was the one who first said he would give her a satisfying answer if she sucked his cock satisfyingly.

However, he hadn’t expected those words to be thrown back at him. Even if he had known, he hadn’t anticipated that having his words returned would make him feel this violently disgusted.

Glaring at Livia with fierce eyes, he ground his teeth and threw her down from where he was holding her.

At the same time, the flow of water surrounding them changed drastically. Like a rough wind blowing, water spray whirled and shook the golden palace.

“Kyaa!”

“Wh-what’s happening!”

“Eek! Be careful!”

The nymphs’ screams could be heard from outside the chamber.

Triton sighed as he covered his forehead with the hand that had been gripping Livia’s nape. Curses mixed with his rough breathing could be heard faintly.

After breathing heavily alone for a while, he slowly brushed up his forehead. His face was as calm as usual, as if nothing had happened, having subdued his excitement.

The turbulent waves shaking the golden palace subsided instantly. Though voices could be heard from outside the window wondering what had happened, when Triton lightly waved his hand, even those sounds were blocked out.

The surroundings became quiet as if Livia and Triton’s space had been lifted and moved somewhere else. Livia, who had been lying helplessly on the floor, got up gripping the floor with clenched fists.

It felt like her whole body was shaking from her heart beating too hard. Her head spun as if dizzy, so she took a deep breath before opening her trembling lips.

“If you won’t give it, fine. I’ll find another way.”

Just as she muttered in a barely audible voice and tried to turn away sharply, Triton asked.

“Another way? What way?”

“…That’s none of your business.”

“Why, going to beg another god? Pleading to take you to Demeter’s banquet? What god’s scent are you trying to get on you this time? Beast, death, and next is… the sun? What, planning to suck Phoebus’ cock too?”

Livia’s expression hardened at the vulgar words that didn’t match his noble face. Glaring at him with a reddened face, she bit down hard and said:

“What does it matter to you? I sucked the cock of a man who said he’d kill me, what cock couldn’t I suck?”

“Ha.”

A sharp laugh shot out between Triton’s twisted lips.

“Damn you Livia… talking like a dog. You’ll suck another man’s with the same mouth that sucked mine?”

He who had been laughing fiercely suddenly grabbed the wrist of her who had stepped back one step and yanked her close.

“Hah…!”

As she was pulled in by his powerful strength, his lips twisted with malice greedily sucked in Livia’s swollen lips. He bit down hard as if he wanted to tear at her lips. Between her lips that parted in a moan, his sharpened tongue thrust in to lick up her raw throat.

Livia pushed at his shoulders while letting out a pain-filled moan. When that didn’t budge him at all, she pulled his hair, kicked his solid shin hard, and struck at him.

“Hnng! Uugh… uuugh!!!”

When she pushed him away with her whole body while crying like a beast, the man who seemed unmovable fell away. Livia, who had pointedly wiped her lips roughly with the back of her hand, spat on the ground while glaring at him with reddened eyes.

She stared at his hardened face for a long while before slowly backing away from him. Then at some point she whirled around and ran away quickly as if trying to escape from him.

Triton’s lips moved as he watched Livia’s back with gloomy eyes.

“…But now you can’t escape my waters anymore, Livia.”

His hand brushed his forehead as he let out those curse-like words.

Not realizing his face, like a sculpture carved from ice, had twisted miserably.

She couldn’t remember how she escaped the palace.

Livia just swam with all her might and burst up above the sea. Though she didn’t feel out of breath, when she emerged from the water, she habitually took a breath. Seawater entered between her gasping lips, but perhaps she had grown used to it as she didn’t even think it tasted salty.

“Haa, haa…”

The hastily drawn breaths repeatedly inflated and deflated Livia’s lungs. Having popped out above the surface, Livia unconsciously looked around at the vast ocean. The afternoon sunlight, broken into fine particles like golden sand across the calm blue waters, painfully pierced her retinas.

“Not knowing your place…”

“Echidna or whatever, if my mood turns foul I can kill someone like you on the spot anytime, Livia.”

Unlike the tempest raging in her heart, the ocean scene was nothing but peaceful.

The man who resembled the sea, no, who was the sea itself, must be the same. He choked her throat, played with her casually, but she alone was the one being shaken.

Was this the fate of a weak human facing a god? Thinking that way, her heart that had been swaying like a small boat on rough seas slowly settled.

Like an afterglow, the sorrow that made her nose sting wetted her eyes, but she tried to ignore it by squeezing them shut. But inevitably, a few lukewarm drops rolled down her cheeks. They fell from her chin, catching the sunlight before mixing into the seawater, but Livia paid no attention.

She had long ago thrown all her emotions into the fire that burned down her home.

From the moment the witch’s golden dagger was placed in her hand and she pointed it at Triton, there was no future in her life. Her soul was already dead, leaving only an empty shell for revenge.

So small sorrows don’t matter. After all, this is all just the process of heading toward eternal death as punishment for deceiving a god. She must bundle up these useless sentiments and bury them deep in her heart to carry away.

‘These feelings are nothing. Nothing at all…’

She wiped her eyes firmly with the back of her cold hand. Though she had erased the sorrow, right now she didn’t want to be in the sea. Just as she was about to move her body in search of land to stand on, something brushed past her feet and burst out of the water. Squinting as she looked, she saw a pair of pointed shark dorsal fins.

“…Sympho? Could it be Neo too?”

A black shark and a white shark circled around Livia as if drawing a circle. Though she was used to Sympho who had been following behind her for some time now, the white shark was unfamiliar.

As if responding to being called, the white shark approached Livia and politely offered its back. Then the black shark pushed the white one aside and presented its own back to Livia.

Grrrr!

With foam, no, shark foam at the corners of its mouth…



Not sure how to take this, she stared incredulously as the white shark and black shark began fighting, ramming their bodies against each other.

‘I know Sympho has that kind of personality, but I thought Neo was more dignified…’

Looking carefully, the white shark was just as formidable as the black one. When the black shark charged, it bared its teeth without hesitation and rammed back with its body, showing it wasn’t the type to back down.

After pushing away the charging black shark with its body, the white shark spun around once in place and struck the black shark’s head with a powerful tail swipe.

Splash!

With tremendous spray, Livia’s body was suddenly pushed deep under the surface.

“Gasp! Blub!”

Perhaps because they were such large and powerful creatures, the waves kept creating small ripples endlessly. Like a shrimp caught in a shark fight, Livia’s small body repeatedly plunged under and emerged from the waves.

“Stop!”

Unable to take it anymore, Livia shouted, and both sharks’ movements stopped at once. Pushing back her wet hair, she climbed onto Neo’s back while panting.

“Neo for going, Sympho for returning! Got it?”

At Livia’s firm words, the sharks wagged their tails as if nodding. Whether they understood human speech as divine messengers or were just randomly wagging their tails was unclear, but either way, the commotion settled down. Thanks to these rowdy sharks, her welling tears had also retreated.

“Take me to land. I want to feel ground beneath my feet.”

At Livia’s whisper, the white shark undulated its body greatly and powerfully cut across the sea. The speed was amazing every time she experienced it.



“This is…”

Livia stared blankly at the island before her. She already knew this island. It was because she had been here before.

The place she had arrived after saving the children who were being taken by pirates. The island said to have Triton’s temple…

She wanted to leave the sea to get away from Triton’s domain, but the place she arrived at was his island.

Livia, who had been staring at the coastal cliff where she had encountered him, shook her head.

“I don’t like it here. Let’s go somewhere else.”

At her words, Sympho and Neo looked at each other before carrying Livia on their backs again and headed somewhere. She thought they were leaving this island to go somewhere far, but where the sharks arrived was just the opposite side of the island.

“No, I said I don’t like this island. Ugh, never mind. I’ll just swim myself.”

The moment Livia tried to get off Neo’s back, the shark cut through the water again.

Because it moved so fast, she couldn’t easily jump off its back. With no choice but to hold tightly onto the shark’s fin, the sharks swam up a river connected to the sea on the island. It seemed they were determined to put her on that island.

Well, even if they circled around her, they were Triton’s sharks after all, so they wouldn’t listen to her. But.

‘…Even though you acted like you were on my side. You’re just like your master.’

Feeling an inexplicable sense of betrayal rising up, Livia kicked the side of the black shark swimming beside her. It was possible because they had been gradually slowing down. The shark just shook its fin as if her kick merely tickled, but at some point it stopped.

“Where is this? Why did you come all the way here?”

The river continued upward, but the sharks stopped moving and just circled around. When she licked the water droplets on her lips, she noticed the salt content had significantly decreased. It seemed they couldn’t move easily further up as it was purely river territory rather than an estuary (where river meets sea).

After pondering briefly, Livia jumped off Neo’s back and swam out of the river. Since she had come this far anyway, it didn’t make sense to go somewhere else right now. It could have been quick if the sharks took her, but they didn’t seem likely to take her anywhere else.

‘I’ll kill some time here and then go somewhere else.’

When she stepped out of the water onto land, the cold she hadn’t felt while in the water hit her. As she was wringing out the water from her hair and clothes while looking around for a place to make fire, that’s when it happened.

“Myamya…?”

Startled by a child’s voice coming out of nowhere, she whirled around to see a small child swimming toward her from upstream. And also two beautiful women following that child.

“Doris!”

The women who were hurriedly swimming after the baby while calling “Doris” stopped when they spotted the sharks and Livia. Only when they got closer did Livia realize these women were river nymphs. And the face of the baby they called Doris was familiar too.

‘…Where have I seen that child before?’

The small baby swam hard toward Livia, ignoring the restraining nymphs. As the baby came closer, suddenly as if struck by a hammer, a light flashed in her mind and the memory came back.

“You…!”

As she pointed at the baby in surprise, the baby who had come right up to the water’s edge reached out both hands toward Livia and called out:

“Myamya!”

The small fish tail below the baby’s navel, the cute ears with gill-like membranes, the maple leaf-like hands that still couldn’t hide the webbing between fingers…

It was the baby siren that Triton had saved when it was being kidnapped by the pirate ship before.



“You’re taking care of it here?”

“Yes, the siren race needs to expand their respiratory organs by going in and out of water. They need to know how to breathe air to sing outside water too.”

The nymphs saw Triton’s sharks and welcomed Livia.

It seemed they thought of Livia as one of Triton’s attendants. She was about to explain that wasn’t the case, but thinking about it, she didn’t really have any way to explain herself, so she gave up.

Triton’s plaything? A human challenging Triton? A toy for Triton to play with as he pleased? Bitter self-mockery welled up.

Instead of thinking more about it, Livia asked about the baby clinging to her and acting spoiled.

The nymphs taking care of Doris were estuary nymphs, and they said they had been looking after the child for several days now.

They said during the day they play near this riverbank, and at night they sleep in the shallow sea near the island’s rocks. The nearby sirens had died out, so the estuary nymphs were taking care of it instead, they said.

The river nymph looked warmly at Doris clinging to Livia’s arms, then added:

“You were there when Doris was saved, weren’t you? It seems Doris recognized Livia from remembering that time. Sirens remember their surroundings from birth. They grow quickly too.”

Livia was startled for a moment. Her heart stung unnecessarily at hearing that babies remember their surroundings from birth.

However, besides that part, she had nothing else in common with sirens. All sirens were said to be excellent musicians, while Livia was so tone-deaf she couldn’t even sing.

Being an orphan, she didn’t know who her parents were, but without any webbed fingers or gills, there were too many differences to compare herself to sirens based on just one memory. So there was absolutely no reason for her to feel confused.

“Myamya! Mamma!”

The baby siren called Doris, who had been playing with a shell in her hand for a while, took out the shellfish meat and struggled to put it in Livia’s mouth.

Though the intention was sweet, Livia couldn’t eat raw clams or fish.

When she pushed what was meant for her mouth back into the baby’s mouth instead, the baby ate it well with a “nom nom.” The way she played with a bright smile was so innocent, unlike a baby who had lost its parents.

‘I had been wondering about this… Seems like they’re doing well.’

That was a relief.

This small life that had lost its parents so tragically to human selfishness…

When Triton first placed this baby in her arms, she had been so confused she just held it blankly. Yet even then, the baby had opened its eyes and remembered her appearance – it made her feel strange.

Doris, who had been munching on the shellfish meat, hummed a song while splashing water. Though there were only sounds without words as they were unable to speak yet, the baby’s voice resonated smoothly, like it was riding a melody. They say sirens can enchant people with their voices, and already the child’s voice touched Livia’s heartstrings.

“It seems Doris wants to play with you, Livia. The child looks very excited.”

“Is that so…”

“If you don’t mind, could you play with them until sunset? This is the first time we’ve seen Doris sing. We were worried because their voice hadn’t developed, but seeing this now, it seems they’re growing well enough.”

Livia couldn’t bring herself to refuse the nymphs’ request.

Hadn’t she too once been abandoned and desperately needed someone’s care? After being abandoned again and again, she had come this far for the family that finally took her hand.

Though it was when she was too young to know anything, Livia knew well enough how much that deprivation affected one’s life.

“Myamya, together, together…!”

“…Alright. Let’s go, let’s.”

Splash-!

The baby grabbed Livia’s hand and went into the water.

Livia spent time swimming underwater with the baby and playing hide-and-seek. The baby wasn’t even afraid of the huge sharks, even playing with them too.

Father used to say all babies in the world are beautiful, and the same was true for sirens. Even with a fish tail, webbed fingers, and gills, a baby was just a baby.

Meeting those small hands holding her tightly and those eyes looking straight at her, it felt as if the worries that had been weighing so heavily on Livia became lighter, if only for a moment.

After playing in the water for a while, Livia climbed up on a rock to dry off and take a short rest. Then Doris, who was lying beside her and rolling around together, started humming a song.

When Livia, who had been keeping time with her feet, unconsciously tried to imitate and sing along with the same tune, the baby’s eyes went round and said tearfully:

“Myamya. Can’t, sing…”

…Is it shocking enough to cry about?

As Livia, whose ears had turned red, pressed her lips shut, the baby suddenly sat up and hugged her tightly. The maple leaf-like small hands patted Livia’s shoulders.

“It’s okay, it’s okay…”

Though the pronunciation was imprecise, she could understand it was meant to be words of comfort. As she sat there blankly, not knowing how to react, the baby’s cool body temperature hugged Livia even tighter.

“It’s okay!”

Perhaps thinking Livia couldn’t understand? The child put strength into their small tongue and spoke in a louder, clearer voice.

‘They only look about two years old…’

Even though sirens were said to grow faster than human babies, it was amazing that they could speak so clearly already.

However, on the other hand, thinking about this smart child experiencing that tragedy made her heart heavy. The one who needed comforting with “it’s okay” wasn’t the grown adult like herself, but this small baby.

“Thank you, I’m okay. And you’ll be okay too, Doris.”

Livia hugged the small siren back tightly. Age, gender, length of life lived… Two beings with nothing in common smiled at each other.

The warm red sunset embraced the small woman and child like wings.



“You go ahead first. I’m going to sleep here tonight.”

Night had fallen before they knew it. The nymphs took Doris back to the rocky island, while Livia remained on the island.

When the sharks urged her to return, Livia stood firmly on the sand and refused. The black shark showed its displeasure by writhing its whole body, then flicked its tail hard to splash water on Livia.

“Ah, cold! Sympho!”

Grrr!

When Livia shouted, the shark spat out bubbles as if it was trying to talk back.

The shark in the water and the human outside faced off for a while, but this was clearly a disadvantageous fight for one side. Unless Livia entered the water herself, the shark that couldn’t come out couldn’t take her away.

Time passed idly.

The white shark that had been calmly observing the situation nudged the black shark to back off.

The black shark twisted its whole body and made a fuss as if throwing a tantrum, but that didn’t last long. The sharks swam in circles where Livia could see them, drawing a large circle.

‘Is that meant to say they understand? Are they going to leave?’

As she watched quietly, the two sharks slowly rode the current down toward the sea. Just as she was feeling relieved thinking they had given up and were returning, the black shark cut across the current, charged forward, and leaped high in front of Livia.



As she looked up startled, a wave of water crashed down with a splash, completely soaking Livia.

“You…!”

Just as she was about to shout angrily at looking like a completely drenched mouse, the black shark swam away swiftly and disappeared.

“That, that ill-tempered fish…!”

Though she wanted to yell something, it was futile with no one there. After huffing and puffing in place for a while, Livia wrung out the water from her clothes and looked around.

She hadn’t noticed while in the water, but after coming out, her body kept getting chilly. Looking around for shelter from the wind, she saw a wide shadow in the rock crevice right next to the waterfall connected to the river upstream.

Hurrying to take shelter there for the night, Livia immediately called forth Mumu. When she rubbed Persephone’s seal, the hell hound that had grown much larger than Livia appeared with a “woof-.”

“Mumu!”

At Livia’s call, all three heads rushed to lick her. The fluffy fur clung warmly to her cold skin.

“I missed you too. Sorry I couldn’t call you out often. Being underwater all the time…”

Though Mumu shook their head as if it was fine, she felt concerned about calling out a fire-using beast underwater.

Last time, she had seen firsthand how much Mumu struggled when fighting off the leech-worms, which made her feel even worse.

Making Livia’s worries seem unnecessary, Mumu, who had already recovered their health, clung to her acting spoiled.

Livia gathered dry branches and had Mumu breathe on them to make a small campfire.

Originally, making a fire was a very time-consuming and difficult task, but with Mumu it was done in an instant.

“Thank you, Mumu.”

Woof! Woof woof! Woof!

When all three barked at once, birds sleeping in the forest beyond the gorge were startled and flew up fluttering their wings.

Livia brought her finger to her lips in a gesture to be quiet to calm Mumu, then lay down leaning against the large dog’s body.

The touching body temperature was especially warm and the night was leisurely. Though the night’s stillness approached as if caressing Livia’s heart, strangely it didn’t feel very reassuring.

The majestic sound of falling waterfall, the crackling of burning firewood, the warm warmth of the puppy guarding her side…

Though it was a comfortable and peaceful time, somehow it felt awkward and uncomfortable. Even while blankly staring at the campfire, her gaze would occasionally go to the roughly flowing water.

Though not as wide and deep as the sea, that stream clearly heading toward the sea seemed to be tempting Livia.

Water droplets jumping up small as if calling her to come, the waterfall sound as if whispering her name… All of it seemed to be calling Livia to come quickly.

“…Hot.”

Livia, who had been rubbing her nape, felt her body getting hot as if wondering when she had felt cold. Moreover, the thirst that made her throat feel scratchy had been making her uncomfortable for a while now.

‘Water… I want to drink water.’

Once she recognized the thirst, her body burned with immediate desire to drink water. Could it be an aftereffect of staying only in water? But even when she had stopped by the village before, she had been out all day and had been fine then…

As Livia lost herself in the waterfall sound beating her ears, she finally got up and approached the riverside. Instead of submerging herself, she scooped up a little water with her hands and brought it to her mouth.

Gulp.

The few drops going down her throat were tantalizing. She wanted to drink more deeply than this.

Getting completely soaked… yes, going right into the water and drinking as much as she wanted. As if pouring it fully into her lungs.

Whine-

Mumu, who had followed Livia without her noticing, worriedly tugged at the hem of her clothes with their teeth. Livia smiled softly and patted each of the three heads in turn.

“Your body temperature must have been too warm. I’m just a bit hot, that’s all. I’ll just dip in briefly and come back.”

After reassuring Mumu, she slowly entered the water. Though she felt a chill as soon as her heated body touched it, it didn’t last long.

When the water reached her chest, far from being cold, she instantly felt better with a thrilling freshness from head to toe. Though she poured water over her shoulders and chest, it wasn’t enough.

‘Completely… I want to get completely soaked.’

Livia walked further into deeper water. Though the river water captured by darkness should have been frightening, strangely she felt nothing. She just wanted to get wet from head to toe soon…

Her neck submerged, her chin submerged, and finally her head completely submerged.

Mumu’s barking “woof” grew distantly far away.

Then, like someone who hadn’t known they were having trouble breathing, her nose cleared and her chest rose and fell busily.

Livia swam hard with arms and legs stretched out in the black water. Just as she thought she should drink a bit more water and get out…

Shiver-

Suddenly bubbles began swirling around Livia’s feet, and cold water chains wrapped around her ankles.

‘…!’

At the edge of her startled, hastily distorted gaze, a shadow of silver hair flashed coldly as if sharpened by moonlight.

Yes. He came to catch me…!

‘Livia.’

A chilling voice whispering her name came through the water bubbles.

Livia frantically escaped through the exploding streams of water and got out.

She had to get away from the water. She ran to the shallow water’s edge where it only reached around her calves, but the water chains mercilessly caught her ankles.

“No, I don’t want to…!”

Even as she fell with a splash, she clawed at the ground with her fingertips to move forward. She was so desperate she didn’t even notice her nails being torn off. Mumu, who had been guarding the waterfront, rushed over urgently and pulled her out while holding her wrist in its mouth.

Grrrr!

“Mumu, Mumu!”

Livia barely moved forward with Mumu’s help. But at that moment, a sharply honed water spear stretched out toward the Cerberus, and Livia, who was shocked, ended up letting go of its grip.

Yelp! Yip yip!

The formed water was fiercer than any weapon. Livia watched with a pale face as the water spear completely pierced through the huge Cerberus’s body.

“Mumu!”

Livia, who screamed in shock, urgently crawled toward Mumu.

Meanwhile, dozens of water droplets rose into the air. It didn’t take long to realize what they meant.

He was going to shoot them like arrows. Livia’s face turned pale.

The transparent water droplets containing moonlight looked beautiful at first glance, but they surely possessed terrifying power.

If those hundreds of water droplets floating in the air pierced Mumu’s body, even a hell hound wouldn’t survive unscathed. The frightened Livia shouted urgently.

“Don’t! Please!!! Stop!!!”

Before the water droplets could descend on Mumu, Livia’s body first covered the fallen Mumu. She trembled weakly while tightly hugging the beast’s body that her small frame couldn’t even fully cover.

However, making her tightly closed eyes meaningless, she felt no pain.

Whine-

Mumu licked Livia’s hand as if to say it was okay. Only then did Livia slowly open her eyes. Though pierced by the spear, Mumu looked better than expected.

The spear that had lost its form by now thoroughly soaked the ground beneath Livia and Mumu. Though mixed with the wounded beast’s blood, perhaps because it was a fire-using beast, it burned away and purified its own wounds.

…Still, it’s fortunate to be safe from this level of attack.

Livia, who breathed a sigh of relief, slowly turned around with a hardened face. Then she saw that man standing on the river with numerous water streams raised like a barrier.

The beautiful sea god, Triton…

“So that hell pup was the source of the burning smell I’ve been sensing.”

A voice as cold and damp as if containing moisture resonated softly under the waterfall’s noise. In contrast, his bone-dry eyes were directed at the Cerberus fallen behind Livia. At the eerie feeling, Livia spread her arms protectively in front of Mumu.

A chill ran down her spine as all those water droplets floating around him felt like weapons. Unlike Sympho who couldn’t leave the water, he was a man who could be plenty strong without necessarily dragging enemies into the water.

Come to think of it, though called the king of the sea, wasn’t it said he could control all water…

Though rivers and lakes weren’t his domain, it seemed he could use his power and control water wherever water existed. When she thought about how the world’s water area was much larger than land, his power suddenly felt quite frightening.

However, Livia hid her fear and met his gaze with eyes as calm as possible. Misty water vapor rose behind the man floating on the river with the moonlight at his back.

The man glowing with a soft light indeed looked divine enough to be called and revered as a god. His overwhelming power along with his mesmerizing beauty took Livia’s breath away.

His presence, so vastly different from her own, weighed down on Livia.

“Come here, Livia.”



“If you come quietly, I’ll spare that beast.”

Water droplets circled around Livia. Certainly, if Triton wished it, those arrow-like water droplets would pierce Mumu with perfect accuracy.

Though defiance welled up at his intimidation, that was only possible when one could resist to some degree. Livia glanced down at the water streams wrapped around her ankles and Mumu’s ankles.

Though he could drag her away forcefully anytime, he was disgustingly pretending to be generous by giving her a choice.

It wasn’t hard to notice that this was his small show of mercy toward her. What mattered here wasn’t pride. Sending the injured Mumu back was far more important.

After all, Mumu was now her only remaining family.

“…Mumu, go back.”

Whine-

“Don’t worry about me. I’ll be fine… But you’re different. I can’t lose you again, Mumu.”

Livia met each of the three pairs of worried eyes and hugged all three heads at once while patting them. Mumu whimpered and licked Livia’s cheek, then fearlessly bared its teeth at the presence behind her shoulder. As if making a declaration that it wouldn’t stay still if she was harmed.

As if mocking it, a water droplet shot toward the foolish puppy. Though it seemed meant only as a threat as the droplet burrowed into the ground, Livia became urgent.

“Go! Hurry!”

When she shouted harshly, Mumu disappeared with faint gray smoke. After forcefully sending back the puppy that had refused to leave, a heavy silence fell.

The waterfall’s noise remained, but all other sounds were erased at once. No, they seemed to have been forcibly erased by someone’s presence.

…It’s okay.

She took a small deep breath and slowly got up, dusting herself off. It had been just half a day since she woke up in Triton’s arms, after having her throat choked while sucking his manhood.

It was torturous having to face him again before the pain in her throat and tongue from being violated by him had even faded.

She wanted to run away.

Her breath caught at the thought of facing that nasty, fierce man less than a day later. The desire to escape from this moment boiled up.

Triton had rendered Livia, who was struggling for her goal, powerless.

As if her desire for revenge meant nothing, he had shaken Livia’s soul and mocked her purpose while toying with her.

Everything she was desperately holding together seemed to break so easily in his grasp.

Was this also punishment for deceiving a god? Was this her due for her presumptuous audacity?

Livia steadied her faltering steps and approached him. As she took a step toward the water she had so desperately tried to escape from, the water didn’t absorb her but lifted her up. As if leading her to Triton.

Livia walked slowly toward Triton while stepping on the river water as if it were ground.

One step, two steps.

As if unable to bear her slow steps toward him, Triton reached out. The water stream that roughly climbed up Livia’s body pulled her tightly into Triton’s arms.

While firmly embracing her roughly resisting body with one hand, he grabbed her wrist that was pushing him away and whispered harshly.

“Foolish woman. You seem clever yet you’re so stupid.”

At the sudden criticism, Livia distorted her eyes and glared at him as if dumbfounded.

“Well, have you found other gods to beg to?”

“…That’s none of your business. Don’t interfere.”

At her venomous muttering, Triton let out a chilling laugh. His parted lips brushed against Livia’s ear. Goosebumps rose on her back as her breathing started to quicken.

Though she had only received him a few times, her body remembering the pleasure Triton gave unconsciously trembled in anticipation of the coming stimulation.

“None of my business? When you’re my human…”

There was that phrase again. The words declaring so confidently that she belonged to him.

While treating her like a mere toy… While only thinking of using her…

But was he the only one trying to use others?

In truth, she was no different from that man. That’s why her lips remained tightly sealed like a clam, unable to say it was unfair, only biting her trembling tongue.

“Stupid Livia.”

His sigh wet Livia’s nape.

While holding her, much smaller than him, tightly against him, he was busy insulting her while biting her earlobe, grabbing her nape, and gently stroking down with his fingertips.

“Frustrating, stupid, lazy…”

His lips that traced up her cheek hovered right above Livia’s lips.

Each time he spoke, his lips almost-but-not-quite touched hers. Every time his sweet breath seeped into Livia’s lips like waves wetting the sand before disappearing, she felt burning inside.

Her mind kept going blank, wanting to demand answers about him insulting her and hurting her dog, only to be replaced by thoughts of just wanting to bury her lips against his.

Was he a god of seduction rather than the sea? Or was his word “stupid” making her head dull like a spell?

Livia bit her trembling lips. She felt like she might fall for this evil and lustful spell that Triton was whispering.

She had to push him away.

This man was the target she had to kill,

“Why do you seek other gods at all?”

A god who treated her as mere entertainment and tried to toy with her, and who tempted her,

“The god you should beg to is right here.”

…he was a man.

Some emotion that shouldn’t be acknowledged welled up suddenly.

It should have been a relationship between a god and human meant to kill and be killed. She had been telling herself that’s how it must be until now.

But her emotions that had ended up recognizing this being as a man shocked her.

“I, I did! I did that but you…!”

“No, you’ve never begged me, Livia.”

Triton, drawing a firm line, whispered to Livia.

“You only dared try to use me.”

…Only tried to use you? Weren’t you the same?

Livia’s eyes trembled with shock.

You wanted my body, I wanted your heart… Weren’t we trying to use each other to possess what we wanted?

Triton’s hand cupped Livia’s cheek as she was in confusion.

The cold, cool touch that had become familiar somehow held Livia’s small face as he whispered roughly like a roar.

“Beg me, Livia. Cling to me saying you need me and plead for my help. Pray that I’m all you have.”

In a voice that seemed like he would grant anything if only she would beg…

Livia’s lips trembled uncontrollably. Unable to breathe properly, she gazed into his turbulent eyes while gasping for air.

Waves crashed in those deep blue eyes. Though impossible, it seemed as if his very soul was being shaken to its core.

To beg…?

She couldn’t believe his words. Weren’t these the words of someone who had always pushed her into trials? It was hard to believe. Yet it was too sweet a proposition to reject outright.

That’s why Livia wanted to test it.

Her lips, still catching her breath between gasps, quivered slightly.

“…me.”

The world had always deceived her, but this foolish hope that you might be different… She wanted to test it just once.

“Take me there, Triton…”

Her voice came out hoarse and cracking through her trembling lips, her throat tight with emotion.

“Please, take me there!”

No sooner had Livia’s words ended than his lips parted hers. Not knowing why she was so tense, he pulled out her trembling tongue and sucked and licked it forcefully, whispering without breaking the kiss.

“Beg more, Livia. More…”

“Ahh… hnn…”

“More, until even the gods couldn’t ignore it.”

Her parted lips were messily bitten. Her head spun with the mild pain and the rushing pleasure. She shook violently, unaware that a large stream of water had enveloped both their bodies.

His tongue, rigid and upright, pushed between her widely parted lips. This time, Livia caught his probing tongue and sucked it hard. Then, just as he had done, she held his cheeks and desperately sucked his lips.

She had an intuition that his lips, his obsession with her, would become her lifeline.

The intuition that even if it wasn’t her salvation, it could at least be her breathing hole.

Heavy breaths from unknown sources continuously burst between their friction-heated lips.

“…Damn human.”

Though his voice, now drained of venom, muttered more curses, nothing registered in her hazy mind.

He sharply turned his head toward the waterfall gushing violent streams. His heat-tinged blue eyes narrowed. His urgent hands caught Livia’s wrist and turned her body.

In a single step, they were before the waterfall, and with one gesture, the falls split in two, revealing what lay behind. A small cave that had been hidden there came into view.

In the blink of an eye after that, Livia found herself lying in that cave.

“Ah, nnh…!”

The water rippling across the cave floor welcomed her softly like bedding.

Whether he had increased the water’s density or done something else, she couldn’t tell, but the water supported her so well that the rough floor couldn’t scratch her back at all.

Though perhaps even if she had lain directly on the floor and her back had been torn, she wouldn’t have noticed. That’s how completely Livia’s senses were buried in the pleasure Triton was giving her.

“Ah, yes…!”

His tongue slipped between her parted lips, sensually scraping across the roof of her mouth. As if intending to drink every gasping breath, his cool tongue prodded and licked every corner of Livia’s heated mouth.

It felt like water being poured down her parched throat.

Livia wrapped her hands around Triton’s neck and desperately sucked his tongue.

She couldn’t understand why she was so thirsty. But one thing was certain: only he could quench this thirst.

Triton’s hand came down as if stroking Livia’s head, then pressed firmly against her cheek.

Her lips opened round as he pressed, and her lost tongue trembled inside. Seeing her red flesh, ripe and soft like an overripe raspberry dripping with juice, Triton felt his stomach tighten.

“Stick out your tongue, Livia. So I can taste it.”

As he whispered softly, her hesitant tongue gently slipped out. Her submissive gesture of accepting him made his throat burn with desire.

Something so irritatingly beautiful, something he wanted to hold in his hands and knead to his heart’s content…

Triton made no attempt to hide his possessive feelings as he sucked on Livia’s tongue thoroughly. Livia twisted her waist in response, seemingly aroused. Without hesitation, he reached down and lifted the skirt that clung to Livia’s thighs.

His cold fingertips touched her hot, wet private area.

Squelch. Squish. Slick. Slick.

She was so sweetly wet that his fingertips slid easily between the slick flesh. In other words, without even having to push forcefully, that lewd hole was sucking in his fingers on its own.

Finding it endearing and lovely, Triton let out a pleased laugh as he inserted two thick fingers into her thoroughly wet entrance.

“Ahhh!”

Just from two fingers, the inside of her thighs began to tremble. Triton clicked his tongue as he gently stirred the flesh that clung to his fingers.

“Hah! This, this is strange… ahh!”

Livia’s gasping moans were pleasant to his ears. Her bewildered expression, gulping for air, looking up at him with wet eyes in a daze – it all intoxicated him.

“Call my name, Livia.”

“Ah, aah…. T-Triton!”

Those green eyes wet with tears, her hands desperately scratching at his shoulders, those lips whispering his name…

Livia was clinging to him just as he had wanted. So desperately, as if wanting something, squeezing him with her sticky inner flesh…

His already painfully taut cock became rock hard.

Triton nibbled on Livia’s parted lower lip while breathing heavily, thrusting and stirring his fingers even more vigorously. As he spread and stirred her tight entrance that seemed too narrow to even take his cockhead with his fingers, Livia’s hips bucked.

He eagerly took her pink nipple, which had risen appetizingly, into his mouth. When he gently rolled it with his tongue and then bit down on the erect peak that seemed ready to pierce through the wet fabric, a cry burst from Livia’s lips.

“It hurts, ah, ah, it hurts…. ugh, hic!”

Amidst the noise of the waterfall, Livia’s moans jumped out like an instrument creating an entirely different scale. Her voice, unable to hide her pleasure, delighted him.

Those lips that had only spat out defiance and unpleasant words now released sweet moans like they were dripping honey.

It was satisfying. But this wasn’t enough. Triton wanted more. He wanted to draw out more from Livia.

He wanted to fill that small head, so consumed with revenge, completely with thoughts of him.

So full of him that she wouldn’t even think about that worthless revenge she was clinging to, to the point where such things wouldn’t matter at all…

He willingly lowered his body to fulfill his desire.

He needed to confirm with his own mouth, tongue, and nose whether his human female was aroused, and if so, just how aroused she was.

When he pressed down on both thighs with his hands to spread them, the pink flesh between her legs opened up like a flower to welcome him. The plump flesh, glistening with transparent fluid, bloomed enticingly.

It was such a mouthwatering sight that it made him salivate. His lustfully shining blue eyes took in her most intimate and lewd part as though he was licking it.

“No, I don’t want this… ahh!”

Realizing what he was about to do, Livia desperately tried to close her legs, straining with all her might.

But it was futile. Rather, the more she tensed her legs, the more her widely spread hole would clench and unclench, creating an utterly debauched and lewd sight.

Triton bound her ankles using the power of water, then gently rubbed her entrance with his fingertips. He could clearly see transparent fluid leaking from her lovely hole.

Just when he thought she couldn’t get any prettier, she does even prettier things.

He let out a rough laugh as he watched the twitching narrow entrance swallow his fingers.

As he repeatedly pushed deep and pulled out, despite her protests, it eagerly swallowed, even drooling…

“P-please! Don’t, ah…! Stop, d-don’t, look…!”

“Look at what? Hmm? Do you enjoy using such lewd words?”

“No! No… ugh!”

Though Livia shook her head strongly in denial, the streams of water wrapping around her entire body left her with no choice but to expose her shameful parts to him.

Her cheeks, flushed with humiliation, stimulated his appetite like a perfectly ripened peach.

And that wasn’t all – everything about Livia stimulated Triton’s sense of smell and sight.

Who said gods were noble? Gods were more primitive and instinctual than any being. They could be cruel for their amusement, and then on a whim, become generous.

They weren’t bound by the laws, order, and social norms created by humans. Even the concept of shame that applied to humans was nothing but a joke to them.

Beings who could have anything just by reaching out…. That’s why they could only be the most primal and instinctual. For gods, these were their most developed senses.

Triton lowered his head deeply and brought his nose to Livia’s vagina. As he took a deep breath, Livia’s scent rushed in abundantly.

How could this small, lovely thing emit such an erotic scent?

Perhaps your body is made of something different, something I don’t know about.

Otherwise, how could it be more fragrant than the nectar served at Olympian feasts, and sweeter than the ambrosia that even gods covet? How could this fragile body, which could break with just a touch of his hand, be more enchanting than the divine feast that grants immortality?

With a mocking smile at such absurd thoughts, he extended his tongue tip and licked Livia’s honey-like fluids flowing down.

She was so wet that the juices flowing from her vagina trickled down between her butocks in an arc. As Triton ran his tongue along the stream, a sharp cry burst from Livia’s lips.

“Ah, no, Triton! N-not there…!”

At Livia’s urgent voice, Triton smiled crookedly and whispered.

“Nothing is forbidden, Livia.”

Spreading her plump butocks, two twitching holes came into view. Finding them equally tempting, saliva pooled in Triton’s mouth.

“They say when a mouth receives a cock, it becomes a mouth pussy…. Livia, your mouth pussy was quite useful, so I think your other holes won’t disappoint either.”

Slurp, suck.

As his wet lips delved into the wide-spread cleft between her butocks, Livia’s bloodshot eyes flew open. While she moaned spasmodically, unbelievable words reached her ears.

“Livia…. As you saw with your own eyes, you’ll have to take two.”

Above her blinking eyes floated the image of the split genitalia she had seen – what had been one splitting in half, and then each growing to its original size….

She had to take ‘them’ all?

But Triton didn’t give Livia time to think. An unexpected sensation came from an even more intimate place than her vulva. Her gaping lips gasped in a hurried breath.

“I want to ravish every hole of yours. Each one will be just as tight and stubborn. Just like you…. And how delicate they’ll be. I’ll have to coax them gently and push in bit by bit. How particular they are.”

“S-stop… Triton. Please, please… I beg… ahhh!”

“But what choice do I have? I have to claim them. To fill you completely with myself…. Gently coaxing so you don’t tear….”

As if to demonstrate how he would coax her like this, his pointed tongue tip licked her vagina and the other hole that extended down below it.

At the lewd sounds of him probing her holes and the tremors spreading from her lower body, Livia cried out sharply and shook her entire body.

The tremors emanating from her lower body whitewashed her mind. Her body twisted and trembled uncontrollably as if it wasn’t her own. It felt like some part of her senses was breaking.

Slurp, suck….

The sound of him licking her kneaded butocks and the space between echoed lewdly throughout the cave.

She wanted to cover her ears, but bound as she was, all Livia could do was surrender her body to the tremors Triton was giving her.

Both holes between Livia’s legs became soaking wet. As his cold, cool tongue searched out and probed only her sensitive spots, Livia begged through her tears.

“U-up… At, at least, just up… ahh!”

When she pleaded and begged, she felt his breath as if he was laughing. Kissing and sucking, his tongue returned to her vagina, finding her swollen bud and rolling it with his tongue tip.

But as if that wasn’t enough, his fingers that had somehow slipped inside her hole began to probe here and there.

His curved fingers inside her vulva swirled around searching for her sensitive spot.

“Don’t, please… s-stop… just, please…!”

It was like lightning striking before her eyes. Three fingers at once probed her entrance, while his thumb rubbed the wrinkled rim of her lower hole.

With her bud being sucked and all her holes being toyed with, she was on the verge of losing her mind. At some point, even her panting breath began to catch in her throat.

Triton, who had been tormenting her up and down, strongly sucked in her trembling bud.

“Ahhh! Ah, no. No, ah, no!”

The moment an urgent scream burst from Livia’s lips, a thin stream shot out from her thoroughly sucked, reddened vagina. 

Livia kept her eyes tightly shut as she convulsed. Even without looking, she could feel the streams shooting out not just once, but multiple times.

The sensation of something unknown leaving her body made Livia feel ashamed and embarrassed, but there was nothing she could do about it.

“Ah, hng, nng! Aahn!”

Though she tried to clench her teeth to suppress her embarrassing voice, it was futile.

A truly uncontrollable sensation shook Livia’s entire being. Her lower body jerked about as she was completely immersed in pleasure. A frightening level of pleasure overwhelmed her.

“Haahngh! Hng… ugh, hic!”

Tears streamed down from beneath Livia’s reddened eyes. Sobs mixed with the moans that burst out like hiccups.

…She came. She released something. It was an undeniable sensation.

What exactly happened? What had she done? Or was this… also Triton’s doing?

Her heart grew cold at the thought that she might have unconsciously done something shameful. She was afraid to confirm what had happened, but she couldn’t avoid it either.

Livia painfully lifted her tear-soaked eyelids. But she immediately regretted opening her eyes. If only she had kept them closed….

“After I licked you down there, you went and squirted all over my face….”

Triton was smiling with his face covered in the fluids Livia had released.

The water had splashed so much that transparent liquid was trickling down his cheeks, over his eyes, and between his lips.

Even seeing it with her own eyes, she couldn’t process what she was looking at. The scene was so unbelievable and difficult to accept that Livia’s mind froze.

“I… did I… really just… on your face…?”

When she belatedly tried to hurriedly raise her body from her daze, Triton wouldn’t allow it. His water chains firmly bound and held down Livia’s thighs and lower body as she tried to move.

“Perhaps because you’re mine…. How can you be so wet?”

He muttered with subtle pride showing on his face as he licked the love juices that had dripped down his mouth with his thumb. Livia cried out in shock at the lewd sight.

“No! Don’t lick it! D-don’t eat it!”

Unlike Livia who worried that what came from her body might be dirty, Triton, who was thoroughly covered in her fluids, seemed pleased.

With a satisfied smile, he sucked her juices from his fingers, then with a mischievous grin, extended his tongue to lick Livia’s soaking wet vagina.

“Triton…!”

Livia urgently called his name with veins standing out on her neck. She could feel her lower body, still tingling with aftershocks of pleasure, trembling and dripping more fluid.

“Yes, Livia.”

Triton responded softly as he positioned himself between Livia’s legs.

As he gathered the beads of fluid pooling over her entrance on his fingertips and spread them in circular motions, her tightly clenched butocks quivered.

How lewd and cute that sight was….

“You don’t need to rush, I’ll fill you completely.”

Triton teased the tightly closed entrance with his fingertips a few times before positioning his greatly swollen cock against the gap.

When he rubbed the round tip against her entrance several times, Livia’s vagina twitched and welcomed him as if eager for him to enter.

Triton didn’t rush, thoroughly savoring that wet and slick sensation.

Could the touch of calm waters be softer than this? Could water warmed by the midday sun be this warm?

The ecstasy given by this insignificant woman’s body was wondrous even to a god.

Was your body special, or was it simply because it was you?

Triton surveyed Livia, who had turned peach-colored with his hungry eyes, as he slowly pushed his tip into her entrance.

Ah, Livia.

As her chewy walls wrapped tightly around his cool cock, Triton unconsciously closed his eyes and softly murmured Livia’s name.

Livia’s warm inner flesh felt like it was kneading his rock-hard cock.

“Ah…! B-big, you’re too, big…!”

Livia shook her head in fear as she panted heavily, feeling overwhelmed. Her tight inner walls resisted, trying to push out his greatly swollen penis, but he didn’t retreat and steadily advanced forward.

“Hic…! It’s hard, too h-hard. Triton…!”

Her voice calling his name through tears sounded almost coquettish, like a child’s whining.

While humans might soften at sobbing voices, it wasn’t so for him with his predatory instincts.

To Triton, Livia’s whimpers were like an aphrodisiac that only fueled his excitement.

The louder her cries became, the more his sadistic nature unfurled like spreading wings. Enough to make chills run up his back….

“Hnng…. Ungh!”

He wanted to drive her to cry even louder.

Just as his feelings had been upturned when she dared speak of seeking another god before him, he wanted Livia’s heart to be completely shaken and confused because of him.

Like her lower entrance that had been opened by his touch, he wanted to see those cunning green eyes trembling while thoroughly wet because of him.

Not from anything else, but solely because of him.

Licking his lips that still held Livia’s faint scent, he slowly pulled back as if granting her plea.

She looked up at Triton with hazy eyes as she shuddered at the sensation of him withdrawing after filling her so tightly.

Her swollen, tear-filled eyes seemed both relieved and somehow disappointed.

What that look meant would be clear if he could see inside her.

After letting his cock rest at just her entrance, he firmly gripped Livia’s waist and thrust his hips forcefully.

With a thud, Livia’s half-closed eyes flew wide open.



Her chest heaved as she desperately gasped for air. Triton reached out and tore away Livia’s cumbersome clothing.

He satisfyingly grasped her alluringly raised breasts before pulling back once more and thrusting forward powerfully.

“Haah…!”

He pounded his greatly swollen cock against her inner walls that had tightened in resistance. When he felt her cervix at the deepest part of her narrow passage, his heart burned hot.

“Your mouth tried to bite my cock, and your lower hole is just as fierce, Livia.”

Livia thrashed about, shaking her head as if denying his words. Triton kissed each of her powerless fingers as if holding her flailing hands. He barely restrained himself from biting even her hands that tasted so sweet.

“Livia…. Haa, Livia….”

“Hic, haah! Triton…!”

Triton gripped Livia’s shaking hips as he rolled his waist, searching for her sensitive spots. As he stimulated different areas of her inner walls, her twitching passage welcomed him again, releasing more wetness.

The sound of their wet friction mixed with the thudding vibrations of him striking her inner walls. Each time, Livia gasped for air with her mouth open as if she couldn’t breathe.

Triton leaned down and filled Livia’s parted lips with his tongue. A satisfying thrill ran through him as he blocked both her mouth and pussy completely with his own.

What would it be like to fill even her womb that was touching his tip with his own?

A shiver ran through him. His tip twitched in response to imagining filling that empty space completely with his seed.

“Ah….”

He let out a low moan as he instinctively pulled Livia into an embrace.

He placed her on top of his body so the threatened female couldn’t escape, held her tight without any gaps, and bit her nape to prevent her from sensing anything. However, Livia instinctively sensed something was wrong and faced Triton with frightened eyes.

His large hands lovingly stroked her wet red hair as he embraced her. As her small head filled his palm, he couldn’t help but kiss her.

Their gasping tongues intertwined messily. When he gently stroked her head as she desperately sucked his tongue, he could feel Livia’s wariness melting away.

Squelch-

Finally, his cock split open inside Livia’s vagina. Though Livia hurriedly tried to lift her body as if sensing something was wrong, it was already too late.

“W-what is this…! Take it out…! No!”

Despite her urgent pleas, Triton gripped Livia’s waist with both hands and forcefully pulled her down.



Her mouth gaped open, but she couldn’t breathe easily. Triton’s twitching penis pushed in forcefully as if it would destroy her womb.

Livia held her breath in fear. When she looked down at Triton with frightened eyes, she saw his calm blue eyes that seemed to suggest this was nothing.

“Ah, ah…”

As she trembled with an inexplicable sense of betrayal, his hands enveloped her soothingly.

“Shh… It’s alright. It’s alright, Livia.”

The hands that had been gently stroking her hair as if to comfort her now wrapped tightly around her slender shoulders.

Just as she thought her trembling body was completely trapped in his embrace, Livia’s body was lifted up only to be thrust back down.

Thud!

“Haah!”

Lightning flashed before her eyes, and it felt like she was being split apart. Her vision alternated between white and normal as the sensation threatened to break her completely.

Though the small kisses trailing across her trembling eyes, cheekbones, jaw, and lips were certainly sweet, they weren’t enough to ease the unprecedented pressure Livia was experiencing.

“Ah, no. I’m breaking, hngh! St-stop, ugh! Hic!”

Each time she was thrust downward, Livia’s body split in two. Triton’s cock pounding against her womb as if it was trying to break it was too much to bear.

Yet as her soaking wet entrance and walls created friction that wrung out unimaginable pleasure, Livia truly felt like she might die.

Squelch, squelch, squish!

“Hngh, ugh! Hng…! T-Triton…!”

Was it this overwhelming before?

Thinking back, she remembered crying until her eyes were sore then too. Being taken until she passed out, over and over… Could it be happening again this time?

When she shook her head in terror, Triton roughly crashed his lips against hers as if displeased by something.

“Ha, hic… ngh…! Hnng…”

She could only sob without properly responding to the kiss. The way the pleasure kept growing despite how overwhelming and painful it was frightened Livia.

However, what scared her even more was… his cock that was clearly changing inside her. His penis was writhing and pushing against her inner walls. It was undoubtedly splitting in two just like she had seen before.

The vivid memory of the two members that split in half before suddenly swelling to their original size each flashed before her eyes.

It was already so overwhelming now – could she possibly take two of them…? Dripping cold sweat and hot tears, Livia desperately pleaded while clinging to Triton’s neck.

“Triton, please… no, not two. Hic…”

Triton quietly looked down at the woman trembling as she pressed her forehead against his shoulder.

What kind of woman was she? One who wouldn’t beg even in pain that could break her body. Wasn’t she the woman who stabbed herself in the chest, saying he was making her feel ashamed?

For such a woman to shake her head with tear-soaked eyes saying she couldn’t take this, that she couldn’t handle his two members – this was truly a troublesome and bewildering situation.

Though her uncharacteristically terrified expression was lovely, he couldn’t accept her rejection.

“Livia.”

Whispering her name like a song, Triton turned Livia’s waist and stimulated her sensitive spot.

Hng. A moan escaped between her tightly closed lips.

He patiently advanced slowly, searching for the places that made her feel good.

Controlling the swelling speed of his split cock was quite difficult for him too, but he endured it while watching Livia’s expressions change moment by moment.

As he gradually widened her inside with extreme patience, heat began mixing into Livia’s panting breaths.

“…That’s right, feel it like that. You’re doing well.”

“But… this is…, no matter how I think about it, impossible…! Hic!”

“That can’t be, Livia.”

Whispering sweetly, he pressed his forehead against Livia’s and caught her gaze.

When his image filled her thoroughly wet green eyes completely, he felt the sexual excitement he had been barely suppressing stir again.

No, I must hold back. I must endure…

Having barely suppressed his arousal, he lifted the corners of his mouth.

A flash of color crossed Livia’s hazy eyes.

He knew that whenever he smiled like this, Livia couldn’t take her eyes off him. Even when she was glaring daggers at him, she would still pause and stare for a moment.

It was only natural for creatures with aesthetic sense to be captivated by beauty.

Isn’t that why the goddess of beauty was so proud – because she knew how much influence her beauty held?

Triton kissed all over Livia’s frozen face while wearing a thoroughly gentle smile.

He pinched and rubbed her nipples that were standing stiff with tension, and also thoroughly caressed the ridge between her butocks that trembled at every touch.

While doing so, he gradually increased the volume of his cock so slowly that Livia wouldn’t notice, and at some point he felt her rigidly frozen body begin to sway softly. The wetness at their point of connection was also becoming more damp.

“See, Livia? You can definitely do it.”

Whispering as if praising her, he fully swelled the cock he had been suppressing.



He could feel Livia’s inner walls tensing tightly again after he had worked so hard to relax them, but there was little to worry about from here on.

“Just as I accepted you, you too will fully accept me, Livia.”

Speaking gently, he slowly began moving his hips. At the same time, one of his fully expanded members inside Livia writhed and moved as if stirring her inner walls.

“Aah… Ahng…!”

The thing that writhed as if alive thrashed wildly inside her chewy flesh.

Though he had never told anyone, Triton’s penis didn’t simply split in two.

When his penis divides in two, each has its own role. The first dick ejaculates semen that can impregnate, while the other heightens arousal and pleasure so the main penis can ejaculate perfectly inside his mate’s walls.

“Don’t be afraid. There’s nothing to fear.”

The second penis began its role as it swelled and moved this way and that inside Livia’s walls. The sensitive Livia couldn’t possibly fail to notice it.

But there would be no time to be surprised. The excitement fluid flowing from the tip of the second cock would raise her sensitivity to the extreme.

“Some-something… something feels strange…. It’s moving around inside… Hngh!”

She looked at him with disbelief at what was happening inside her body as she panted.

Finding that innocent gaze lovely, he showered her with kisses. The pleasure you’re about to experience will be incomparable to now, and yet you’re already so surprised…

Triton laid Livia back down on the floor as he placed dense kisses on her small chin.

“It will feel good. No, I guarantee you’ll come to like it, Livia.”

When her back touched the ground, Livia seemed to relax a little. Not missing that opening, he pulled his hips back and quickly thrust forward.

“Hngh!”

An urgent moan burst from Livia’s lips. The cock that entered as if to split her open completely dominated her inner walls as it raged violently. Enormous pleasure swept through like a storm.

“Ah! Haah! T-Triton… ngh!”

She wanted to deny his words about it feeling good, but as the pounding speed increased, Livia could only let out moans without even being able to breathe.

Love juices poured out from her entrance that hadn’t been dry for a moment since they began. Livia convulsed with sobs at the wet, hot sensation. The wringing pleasure made her feel like she was going blind and deaf.

“How is my human so good at adapting… Haa, no matter how I look at it, you seem to take it even better than when there was just one….”

“Hahng, ngh! No, that’s not, hic…!”

It felt like all the flesh inside her entrance had melted. Her breath caught repeatedly at the sensation of his roughly writhing cock scraping against her inner walls. Saliva dripped from her open mouth, but there was no way to stop it.

“Ah, Livia, Livia.”

Triton repeatedly filled and withdrew from her insides while ceaselessly whispering her name.

Squelch, squelch, squish! Thud!

The sound of his two thoroughly wet members colliding echoed powerfully like waves crashing against cliffs.

The pleasure was so intense it was similar to pain. Livia couldn’t stop convulsing.

She couldn’t tell if their point of connection was itchy or throbbing each time Triton’s cock moved in and out.

Though it was clearly Livia’s entrance holding his cock, she felt like she was being devoured each time his penis moved in and out.

“Livia… my Livia.”

The embrace pulling her close with a sweet voice was both cold and hot. She couldn’t understand what this feeling was, but with her reason already crumbled, she had no strength left to continue thinking.

“Hng… T-Triton.”

She wanted to run away, but she couldn’t even do that since she had no strength from head to toe. Between her sobs, another flood burst from between her legs again.

“Haaahng! Ugh! Hic, hic…!”

For the first time, Livia wanted to cry out to someone for help. But only mindless moans and sobs came from between her gaping lips.

Though she felt her hazy eyes growing heavy, the fearsome size of the cock digging into her hadn’t decreased at all.

‘Ah, no more….’

Her mind, unable to withstand the repeated climaxes, finally abandoned her body and fled to the other side of unconsciousness in search of peace.

The giant god greedily embraced that small limp body and kissed it until the very end. His tongue persistently stirred inside her powerlessly parted lips.

“…I can’t send you anywhere.”

My female, my human, my Livia.

Letis trembled in the corner of the cave, bound by rotting seaweed that reeked of decay.

Dark red blood dripped steadily from beneath her bound wrists, but she couldn’t even scream. Her tongue had already been cut out.

The untreated wounds continuously regenerated pain. Endless terror consumed Letis.

‘Why did this happen to me…?’

No matter how many thousands of times she looked back, she felt nothing but wronged.

“The liver of a bottom-dwelling anglerfish is incomparably better…. What do you say, would you like to hear about it?”

Who knew those words would be an invitation leading her to hell….

Her tear-filled eyes blankly scanned the dark cave. The pressure crushing her body was considerable, and the water temperature was hot, though she couldn’t tell how far down they had come.

The cave’s environment, which could not be called comfortable by any measure, was choking Letis. As her clouded eyes swept around, she saw the form of a human carelessly discarded.

Letis couldn’t tell if that human was dead or alive. The only thing certain was that it had been lying there on the floor since she was brought to this cave. The witch had abandoned it without so much as a glance.

‘But why me….’

Letis stared at the old woman chanting suspicious spells in the distance with eyes that seemed mad with indignation.

The old woman who had lured Letis with promises of good things….

Though she had felt suspicious, how could she have known the hag was Echidna.

The woman who had schemed to claim Triton and his glory. The witch who had brought about her own destruction through desires beyond her station.

Echidna’s story was so famous that there wasn’t anyone in the sea who didn’t know it. She had been famous even before, when she displayed contemptible arrogance claiming divine lineage.

Believing in her fair face and that single bloodline, she looked down on nymphs and merfolk as if she were sea royalty herself. There weren’t many who liked her.

There were some mindless ones bewitched by her beauty, but far more who disliked her.

That’s why news of her downfall spread quickly and was forgotten with a casual click of the tongue. No one sympathized with her.

And so, while they thought her existence had been completely erased from this world….

‘To think she returned alive from the labyrinth….’

And transformed into such a completely blackened, corrupted witch at that….

She had heard that the human woman Triton brought had Echidna’s golden dagger, but she couldn’t have imagined that woman would still be alive.

No, in truth, there was no need to think about such things. She and Echidna had no connection, no relation at all.

So Letis couldn’t understand at all why she had been captured here, and why that woman had cut off all her fingers to use in strange sorcery.

“Huu…. hic hic….”

She sobbed while biting down hard on her blood-filled mouth. With a mouth that could no longer form proper words, all that could come out were cries.

But perhaps that sound irritated Echidna, who had been muttering strange sounds inside the red magic circle, because the chanting suddenly stopped.

An bizarre silence pressed down on the dark cave. The only sound was Letis’s uncontrollable sobbing.

The corners of Echidna’s wrinkled mouth slowly turned upward.

The old woman rose from where she had been crouching in the magic circle and approached Letis. Terrified, Letis scooted backward on her bottom.

But there was nowhere to retreat as there was a wall behind her.

“You said you wanted to become a shining being above the sea, didn’t you?”

“Uu, uu…. uuuu!”

Letis begged to be spared with her voiceless throat. She prostrated herself, pleading desperately with hands that had only palms left, all fingers cut off.

“Oh, how pitiful. Are you afraid of me?”

Echidna looked down with emotionless eyes at the fear and despair on that tear-stained face, muttering as if in sympathy.

However, her eyes gleamed cruelly, showing not a grain of sincerity.

Echidna lifted Letis’s chin with her single remaining finger, the rest having been sacrificed for spells, and whispered:

“I owe you much gratitude.”

“Uuu… huuu…. uuu!”

“Though you may be a deity of the lowest rank, you are still of divine blood…. You’ve been a great help in completing my spell. So I shall grant your wish….”

A glimmer of hope briefly shone in Letis’s eyes, as if thinking Echidna’s words meant she would be spared.

Echidna loved such looks. Eyes that yearned for the unattainable, sparkling with foolish hope.

She too had once had such eyes. Not with this hideously aged, sagging face burning with revenge, but with a young and pretty face beautifully sparkling with hope.

‘But… that me died back then. Crushed most cruelly.’

A dark blue light flickered at Echidna’s fingertip as she held up Letis’s chin.

“You said you wanted to become a shining being above the sea, didn’t you?”

It was what she had mindlessly babbled while being enchanted by Echidna as she walked herself down to these depths.

When asked why she sought poison, she had answered it was for revenge against the woman who had trampled her dreams. When asked what that dream was, she had said this:

That she wanted to become a shining being floating high above the sea. To become one of the moon goddess’s halo, receiving praise and envy from all….

To think she was a wench who worshipped the moon goddess, Selene. It was the moment when an even darker, crueler shadow was cast over Echidna’s heart as she lured Letis.

“Uu, uuuuuu! Uuuuu!!!”

Though Letis shook and resisted as if sensing tragedy, it was futile.

The moment the dark blue light rising from the fingertip of Echidna – a devoted follower of Hecate and wielder of dark powers – seeped into Letis’s forehead.



The nymph’s huddled body began to shrink. Without any dramatic sound, just smoothly, as if the moisture filling her body was draining away….

“I don’t know if you’re aware, but the moon shines brightly because it’s draped in night’s curtain. It’s because of darkness that she can shine.”

The shrinking body stopped transforming when it became about the size of a thumbnail. Echidna blew a breath toward Letis, who had become a small black insect, advising in what she knew to be her kindest voice.

“Do you want to shine? Then…. remain in darkness.”

The air bubble created by Echidna’s breath enveloped the insect and floated up. A tiny, seemingly powerless bubble crawled its way up toward the sea’s surface.

“…Well, you probably can’t hear me anymore.”

Echidna’s gaze followed the air bubble skyward.

Far, farther. High, higher….

After rising for a long while carried by the air bubble, the trembling insect finally reached the surface.

The bubble burst with a pop, and at last the insect that had been shaking in fear flew up above the water’s surface with wet wings. Then the light sac attached beneath its round bottom emitted light.

A single small, humble firefly rising above the vast sea….

It flew vigorously toward the moon hanging high above, but its wingbeats were too weak to reach the sky’s moon.

The firefly climbed high for a long while, briefly twinkling like a star in the darkest dawn, but just before Apollo’s rise, it fell toward the sea as if returning home.

Like ending a very brief but intense journey, the body smaller than a pebble dropped into the vast sea with a plop.

Never to rise again, sinking very, very deep….



Something that sounded like both a storm and waves knocked at Livia’s hazy consciousness. Though she didn’t want to wake because her body was so exhausted, her consciousness floated to the surface on its own.

‘Don’t want to wake up. Just a little longer like this….’

The floor undulated gently as if floating on water. The fabric pressed close against her back and butocks was so smooth, she wondered if this was how expensive silk worn by royalty felt.

“…Mm, nice.”

Though her whole body ached as if she’d been beaten, every sensation touching her body was satisfying. So she might have unconsciously muttered something like sleep-talk while rubbing her cheek against the pillow her head was resting on.

If she hadn’t felt something squirming between her legs then, she might have forcibly pulled her increasingly wakeful consciousness back below the surface of sleep and stayed asleep for a long, long time.



Her eyes flew open without her meaning to. She blinked her bleary eyes several times to survey the scene before her. The sound of roaring waterfalls, humid air, the squelching floor… and someone’s arm and hand that she was clearly resting her head on.

Without a doubt, it was Triton’s hand. The hand was larger than most men’s and stretched out freely, yet smooth and white without a single scar.

As she grasped the situation, the previous night flooded back into her dull mind. A night spent crying, sobbing, begging, panting…. A night holding something unbelievable inside her body.

“It will get better. No, I guarantee you’ll come to like it, Livia.”

“How is my human so good at adapting…. Haa, no matter how I look at it, you seem to take it better than when it was just one….”

Though she wanted to believe it was a dream, the memory of being held by him was too vivid. So vivid that even now her lower half felt hot and overwhelming, as if his cock was still inside her body.

When she shifted her hips uncomfortably, something coiled between her thighs squirmed in response.

‘N-No way….’

Just as she tried to look down with trembling eyes, the hand wrapped around Livia’s waist firmly kneaded the valley between her breasts. Triton whispered in a low voice by the ear of the startled Livia.

“If you move now, I feel like I’ll split apart right away….”

Livia’s body instantly froze stiff. She couldn’t believe it. The sea god’s shamelessness was beyond shocking, to the point of being appalling.

Was this man saying he had actually slept all night with his penis inserted in her womanhood?

How could a sea god be so lewd and dissolute? Even as she experienced it firsthand, Livia could only let out a hollow laugh of disbelief.

Yet the reason she remained frozen without doing anything was because his threat about his cock splitting into two again if she moved had worked too well on her.

She vividly recalled how it had split and swollen inside her, becoming something monstrous. The foreign sensation between her legs felt like it was threatening her like a sword.

As Livia tensed up and froze stiff, cool lips touched her shoulder. She heard laughter that seemed to know exactly what she was thinking.

“How unusually well-behaved.”

He murmured languidly, while fondling her breasts, pinching and twisting her nipples between his fingers.

Her nipples, swollen from being tormented all night, stung at even the slightest touch, making Livia’s shoulders instinctively shrink inward.

“Don’t touch… hng…”

“Does it hurt?”

“How could it not hurt when you…!”

“When I what? Why stop mid-sentence?”

…bit and sucked on them like that.

She bit her lower lip hard and held back the rest of her words. Somehow, she felt that provoking him further would only end badly for her.

“When I what, Livia?”

“…Never mind. More importantly, hurry up and pull it out, what are you… ngh!”

As if seeing right through Livia’s attempt to dodge the question, Triton increased the pressure of his hands kneading and pressing her breasts. While squeezing the breast that filled his large palm as if wringing it, he suddenly began gently stimulating her nipple with the hollow of his palm.

The stinging pain gradually transformed into familiar pleasure, making Livia’s body heat up bit by bit. She bit down hard on her lips to hold back a moan.

It was obvious that if this continued, last night would inevitably repeat itself. Frightened, Livia hurriedly moved her hips forward to escape from him.

The large penis joined with her vagina gradually slipped out with a wet sound. Just as she thought she only needed to pull out a little more…

“Ah…!”

The hand that had been fondling her breasts suddenly wrapped around Livia’s flat stomach and yanked her hips back to their original position.

Thwap!

The sound of lewdly wet flesh colliding rang out carelessly. At the same time, the hand wrapped around her stomach pressed down firmly, making it feel like the tip of the cock deeply inserted into her vagina was stabbing into her belly.

“Up to here.”

Triton whispered while rubbing exactly the spot Livia was feeling.

“It’s in here, isn’t it? Can you feel it too?”

“Haah, ah, it hurts…”

“It hurts? Where? Here? Or down here?”

As he gently rubbed Livia’s tense stomach, his cock inside her somehow felt even more intimately present. Panting, Livia shook her head and said.

“No. Stop, Triton. I can’t… can’t take anymore.”

A sigh escaped Triton’s lips at Livia’s words.

“My human is so prone to exaggeration…”

Though he clicked his tongue and muttered, he didn’t withdraw his hands that held and caressed her.

“You showed such patience during the trials I gave you, yet your endurance becomes truly weak only during intercourse.”

Though his mutterings sounded irritated, his actions of kissing Livia’s shoulders and nape remained gentle.

Though Triton’s bite marks had already made her skin red and mottled to the point where it seemed there was no room for more color, he spent a long time meticulously fondling her skin as if obsessed with leaving more of his marks.

Just as Livia’s panting grew heavier, divine power flowed from Triton’s fingertips as they caressed various parts of her body.

The red marks on her heavily sucked and raw nipples disappeared, and the swelling of her inner walls that had been stretched to their limit taking his two members began to subside.

As if feeling the pain subsiding, Livia’s stiff shoulders also began to relax.

“By now you should know how much I’m looking out for you…”

Livia shot back, feeling indignant.

“If you were really looking out for me, you wouldn’t have shoved those two things inside in the first place!”

“Oh? Was it only difficult then?”

Unlike her wronged expression, her unconsciously hesitant face was flushed bright red, telling a different truth.

Triton let out an amused laugh while holding Livia close. Her earlobe, turned as red as the mountain strawberries his young sisters used to offer, looked simply sweet and delectable.

“If you hated it so much, your pussy wouldn’t still be this soaking wet.”

She whirled around to glare at him with a shocked expression at his terribly vulgar words.

When she met his gentle downward gaze and face that seemed incapable of saying such things, her insides squirmed in response.

At that moment, Triton’s brow twitched in response as he stared at Livia. He slowly closed and opened his eyes before letting out a heated sigh and whispering her name.

“…You say you can’t take anymore, yet you’re squeezing me, Livia.”

Flustered by his words, Livia tried to relax her lower muscles but couldn’t manage it. Rather, the more conscious she became of that area, the more her inner walls twitched and roughly massaged his penis.

Triton rested his forehead against the back of Livia’s head. A suppressed groan tickled Livia’s nape as if he couldn’t hold back, raising goosebumps. It somewhat resembled pleasure, but Livia tried not to focus on that.

Indeed, there was only one way out of this situation. For him to pull out the penis he had inserted into her vagina.

“…Stop saying nonsense and just pull it out. Why aren’t you… hng!”

“That’s not possible. Your pussy is so tight I’m deliberately keeping it in… This way you’ll be able to enjoy the pleasure my second cock gives you more quickly in the future.”

Various emotions flashed across Livia’s face at his words.

She would have to take Triton’s split penis again in the future?

The mere thought made her head spin. Intimacy with him was never an easy thing. Hadn’t she experienced firsthand yesterday that his cock didn’t simply split in half to become two?

Livia looked at him with fearful eyes. Her trembling lips unconsciously blurted out a question.

“…I’m asking just in case, but can your second penis move on its own?”

She desperately hoped he would say no. Good heavens, a living, moving cock was something unheard of.

Well, she had never heard of a single penis splitting into two either.

“Oh, Livia.”

He silently stroked her hair for a moment. As her disheveled red hair caught on his fingers and tucked behind her ear, a suggestive smile played on his lips.

“You think it merely moves on its own?”

What…?

Livia doubted her ears for a moment. Was he saying it had other abilities besides moving?

No way, that’s impossible. How could such…!

“You look like you have many questions. Don’t worry. I’ll teach you one by one from now on.”

Her head felt dull as if she’d been hit on the back of her head. As her green eyes, clouded with confusion and shock, trembled slightly, Triton clicked his tongue and said.

“That’s why I told you. I’m doing this for your sake. I can already imagine how much you’ll cry and whimper next time.”

“I, I didn’t whimper, Triton!”

“Oh, don’t humans call it whimpering when they cry saying ‘please, please’? Ah, or was it begging?”

How annoying…

This crazy human, no, crazy god!

His thing was no longer just a penis to Livia. Not only did it move on its own, but it had other abilities too…!

At that point, she thought it was no different from a divine weapon like Hermes’ shoes.

“Why don’t you try having your cock inserted in you. See if you don’t cry out.”

Seeing his face contort as if he’d heard something bizarre gave her a tiny bit of satisfaction, but it was truly just a moment’s satisfaction. He whispered mischievously in Livia’s ear in an even lower voice.

“Oh my… what to do, Livia. Since that won’t happen, you’ll be the only one suffering from now on.”

“Horrible Triton! There can’t be such a lecher like you anywhere else in this world!”

As Livia cried out in disgust, he pulled her even closer with a satisfied expression.

Here we go again. No matter how much she struggled, she ended up in these arms again.

His hands held her firmly, pulling her close as if refusing to allow even the slightest distance between them.

Perhaps because Livia’s hot body temperature mixed with his cool temperature, she felt a lukewarm warmth.

The feeling of their body temperatures mixing felt strange. Before she could conclude whether she liked it or not, she couldn’t deny that she was becoming accustomed to his touch.

To be honest, it was difficult to reject this sensation of someone ceaselessly caressing her entire body. Triton’s touches as he caressed her were so affectionate and gentle that she might mistakenly think she was being loved by him.

She would tremble at this beautiful god’s gaze, crave his touch, and eventually come to desire everything about him.

A mortal yearning for an immortal….

Wasn’t it such an obvious tragedy?

That’s why Livia couldn’t let her guard down even more. These almost loving things this man poured out as he pleased were nothing but poison to Livia.

To her who had lived a lonely and humble life, his casual smile and touch that resembled love were too sweet and addictive.

“You think I’m enjoying this situation, Livia? You don’t know how hard it is to keep holding back from roughly taking your tight, clingy insides.”

“…That’s something I’ll never know in my lifetime.”

“Then it’s fair for both of us, isn’t it?”

“It’s not fair at all!”

When Livia burst out with an indignant face, he broke into clear laughter.

As his laughter transmitted through their touching chests, she didn’t know what expression to make.

His bright eyes sparkled innocently beneath curved lids, and the vibration traveling through his chest felt just like a heartbeat.

Livia hurriedly turned her head away and hastily blurted out whatever came to mind.

“And please, I’m begging you, stop saying things like that.”

“Like what?”

“…Vulgar words like pussy and fucking.”

“sex is inherently lewd, isn’t it more unnatural to try dressing it up in polite terms? To demand something that should be lustful not be lustful, that’s what’s truly strange.”

“Such bizarre logic isn’t important. I just feel embarrassed hearing it, so I’d prefer if you didn’t say it.”

“Oh my… but I enjoy seeing you feel ashamed and embarrassed just as much as I enjoy stuffing my cock into your pussy, what should we do, Livia?”

…Was it her imagination that he seemed to be saying even more vulgar things after she asked him not to?

Even if he wasn’t human, could he really be this far outside common sense? Livia retorted with a pale face, shaking.

“Then maybe I should just become shameless like you from now on.”

When Livia replied while still looking elsewhere, Triton reached out and lifted her chin to make her look at him. It was a firm gesture saying not to look anywhere else.

“Well, that wouldn’t be bad either.”

His casually smiling face was so natural she wanted to scratch it hard with her nails. Though of course, it probably wouldn’t even scratch…

As she glared at him resentfully, Triton, who had been smiling gently, slowly lowered his head. As if it were only natural, his lips met hers and naturally parted them.

Chu, chuup-

The movement of his tongue sweeping inside her mucous membrane was explicit, and there was clear intent in the way his hands caressed her breasts soothingly. Livia, fighting her clouding consciousness, urgently pushed against his shoulders and whispered.

“…Triton.”

Reading the fear in Livia’s eyes, he sighed and slowly withdrew his body. Just as she was feeling relieved thinking he was backing off, Triton’s penis, slick with her love juices, pushed between Livia’s thighs.



“This is fine, isn’t it? Right?”

Before she could say no, his hips had already started moving.

Moving behind her waist, he suddenly seemed unsatisfied and made her get on all fours with just her hips raised.

When Livia, horrified by the lewd position reminiscent of mating animals, tried to look back, he pressed down on her back and whispered tenderly:

“It would be better to stay still before I force it in for real.”

Firmly gripping Livia’s stiff butocks with both hands, he pushed his cock between her thighs without hesitation. His penis thrust in so forcefully it made a thwap sound as it poked through her thin thighs.

“Hah…!”

Each time, Livia would urgently gasp and widen her eyes. It was strange. Even though it wasn’t real sex, she felt a hot and sensual pressure as if he were really penetrating her vagina.

Between her wet thighs, the reddened cock endlessly repeated its advance and retreat. With each thrust it seemed to grow slightly thicker, as the foreign sensation between her thighs grew increasingly prominent.

“Hah, ugh! Hng!”

In her vision as she panted on all fours, she could see the tip of Triton’s penis repeatedly surging up between her inner thighs.

It was an obscene sight that could make one’s eyes go white, but what shocked her even more was seeing the wet glans poking through her thighs starting to split open.

‘Ah, no…!’

She tried to lower her hips in stark terror, but his grip was so tight she couldn’t move at all. When she twitched and tried to avoid it, Triton instead pulled her hips up even higher.

“Are you trying to make something that could end here become something bigger?”

“Again, hah, ugh…! It’s trying to split into two?”

“How pitiful… Are you scared? But don’t worry. I’m holding back well….”

Yet even as he said this, his hip movements became more violent, thrusting roughly as if punishing her for trying to escape. Holding back well…? Really? She couldn’t believe it, but her mind went blank from his penis rubbing against her sensitive, swollen vagina as it moved between her thighs.

If he had forcefully entered her vagina still bearing traces of their previous coupling, it would have only been overwhelming, but just rubbing against her entrance like this was more stimulating. Because it wasn’t too overwhelming, the pleasure building up gradually felt just right.

“Ah, ah…! Hnng!”

Moans like groans of pain leaked out involuntarily.

Triton too noticed the change in Livia’s moans and shifted to gentler movements. Each time he thrust his hips, her raised butocks bounced enticingly.

It was fascinating that he felt the urge to climax even though his cock wasn’t inside her womb. He felt like he could cum anywhere on her, not just in her pussy.

With darkened eyes, Triton gripped her butocks more firmly and spread them apart, making Livia’s smoothly moving hips bounce dramatically.

“Hng, hik! Not there…!”

Ignoring Livia’s startled, panting voice, he traced his fingertips over the pink hole that was shyly closed.

“How can even the wrinkles here be so lovely?”

“Hahk! Ugh!”

When he rubbed until it became slick with leaked love juices, Livia shuddered and shook her hips. Finding her feeble resistance cute, he teased her a few more times with his fingertips before rapidly thrusting his hips toward climax, feeling pleasure lazily rising.

Though he could have continued much longer if he wanted, he had to stop here as he’d been sensing presences lingering outside the cave for a while.

Even with the waterfall’s sound blocking it, he didn’t want his subordinates with their sharp ears to hear this woman’s moans so explicitly.

Even her breathing sounds belonged to him alone, and couldn’t be shared with anyone.

He would keep her by his side until he tired of her, tasting every inch…. Given humans’ short lifespans, he would probably keep her until she died.



At that moment, Triton frowned and hesitated. Though it was just for an instant, he felt his heart grow heavy.

His heart tightened with an ache that resembled pain, and fleetingly discomfort too, such an emotion….

But it was truly just an instant, and he couldn’t think of anything as he saw Livia, moaning beneath him, tense her raised hips.

The pink hole twitched and then clenched tight as if gritting teeth. As he gritted his own teeth and gave one final powerful thrust, thick fluid burst forcefully from the glans poking through Livia’s thighs.

“Ahk…!”

A startled gasp came from Livia on all fours. She whirled around to look at him while biting her lip, still panting. Her small face framed by disheveled red hair was completely covered in his semen.

As the cloudy fluid dripped down cheeks as red as her hair, a hollow laugh burst from Livia’s panting mouth.

When she squinted one eye from the semen running down below her eyebrow, more semen flowed down beside her small, straight nose.

“…What a splendid sight.”

Triton’s belated comment about the situation scraped at Livia’s insides.

The one who did it could laugh, but the one it was done to couldn’t.

Squinting one eye covered in semen, Livia glared at him before impulsively wiping her face with her hand and quickly rubbing her semen-covered fingers against his unsuspecting lips.

“A splendid taste too, Triton.”

Triton’s expression, which had frozen in surprise, twisted peculiarly. He looked both dumbfounded and like he was twisting his lips in a smile.

Still like that, he suddenly grabbed Livia’s cheeks with both hands. Though Livia screamed with a terrible premonition, it was already after their lips, covered in semen, had met.

“No, don’t…mmph! Mmph!”

Sharp screams, cursing sounds, and faint laughter mixed with spite all tangled together.

For quite a long while, until the water spraying from the waterfall soaked them both.



Though day had broken and they’d left the waterfall, they hadn’t yet returned to Triton’s castle.

Instead, she had drunk goat’s milk brought by Actius until her stomach nearly burst, and had to endlessly devour all sorts of fruits carried on the backs of turtles that had appeared from who knows where.

“Eat it all even if you’re full. It’s milk from the goat that raised Zeus. Even if it won’t make you a god, it will make your body very strong.”

First he forced her to eat Demeter’s flowers, and now today it’s milk from the goat that raised Zeus….

Triton acted as if he was desperate to make Livia’s body stronger. Even though no matter what she ate, she would still die with just one flick of Triton’s finger….

For a moment she felt sullen with indignation, but soon changed her mind.

Still, she had to strengthen her body somehow if she wanted to stab his chest with a knife during sex, right? So she gulped down even a whole bucket of goat’s milk, and nibbled on fresh fruits even though her stomach felt ready to burst.

Triton lay on his side, watching with apparent enjoyment as Livia’s mouth continuously chewed. Sometimes he would reach out to poke her bulging cheeks, as if amazed at how such a small mouth could eat so much.

Though Livia, who was chewing and swallowing food as if completing a task, found his touch somewhat annoying, she decided to show some patience since he had brought her precious food.

Earlier when his semen had splashed on her face she had wanted to strangle him, but well, she had gotten revenge by making him taste it too….

Though it was a very small and petty revenge, she was quite satisfied with it.

Thinking of how his face had instantly frozen, probably not expecting to taste his own semen, made her smile without realizing it.

“I’m curious why you’re suddenly smiling like that?”

Triton asked suspiciously while gently rubbing Livia’s cheek with the back of his hand. Trying not to show her startled reaction, Livia quickly put the strawberry she was holding into his mouth.

“The strawberry is sweet. Isn’t it?”

“…It is sweet.”

“See? Want more?”

At her evasive question, he obediently opened his mouth.

Somehow it felt like she had ended up volunteering to serve him, but since she had succeeded in changing the subject, she put the strawberry in his mouth without complaint. Even the fruit juice on Livia’s fingertips was sucked into his mouth before her finger was bitten.

Though she yanked her hand away in surprise and glared at him as if sending a stern warning, all she got in return was an innocent smile.

…If warnings worked on him, he wouldn’t be a god.

It would be faster for the human to give up. As Livia shook her head and reached for one of the few remaining strawberries.

“Shall I kill them for you, Livia?”

When she turned to look at him with a start, he pulled at Livia’s hand holding the strawberry. The strawberry in Livia’s hand was once again sucked into Triton’s mouth.

As she stared at his lips as if entranced, his tongue, similar to the red fruit, moved slowly as if seducing her.

“Those ones who killed you and your family.”

‘kill them for me?’

What was his intention in saying that?

Livia stared intently into Triton’s eyes, trying to read his thoughts, but the calmly undulating blue eyes were too deep and dark for her to decipher.

“…Why would you?”

So Livia decided to ask directly. What his intention was, what feelings lay behind those words.

Playing with grapes in the basket, he picked the plumpest one and pushed it into Livia’s lips while saying:

“It’s nothing special. Once your revenge is taken care of, you’ll be free.”

Free…?

The two syllables he spoke were hard to understand. Free from what? And what did her freedom have to do with Triton….

No, the fact that Triton offered to help with her revenge in the first place confused her.

“…I don’t understand what you mean.”

“The condition of your contract with Echidna was revenge. So, if the targets of your revenge disappear… the condition for establishing the contract between you two completely disappears. If I eliminate Echidna in the meantime, your contract will be nullified.”

So, he was talking about making the contract with Echidna void from the start.

It sounded plausible, and coming from Triton, it seemed like it would surely happen that way.

But was it really… as easy as Triton made it sound? Though Triton’s confidence was reassuring, Livia felt an inexplicable unease.

It was vague like a premonition, but she clearly sensed it would be something ominous.

‘Would Echidna, who sent me to Triton, have made a contract that Triton could break so easily?’

Livia recalled the moment she had secretly gone to burn the village without Echidna knowing.

The ashes she received after begging the goddess of revenge…. But Echidna had stopped her as if she had already anticipated Livia’s betrayal. Not only that, she even took Lete’s soul hostage to threaten Livia.

Then she commanded her precisely. To fulfill the contract.

‘Lete….’

Thinking of that time made her grit her teeth again. Though thankfully it seemed he had been rescued by Zagreus….

“His soul seems somewhat damaged from being forcibly taken and dragged away by someone. I’ve healed him as much as I can, but he keeps calling your name without waking up.”

Zagreus had said Lete’s soul seemed broken.

It was heartbreaking enough that he had died burning in flames without any sin, but it was even more pitiful that the child couldn’t find peace even in death, caught up in a witch’s schemes.

And she utterly despised Echidna who had stolen the child’s soul and caused such trouble.

That’s why Livia had to be careful. She couldn’t act rashly until she found out exactly what Echidna had done to Lete’s soul.

The most important thing was to see with her own eyes what state Lete’s soul was in.

Wasn’t that why she had begged Triton so desperately?

To take her to Demeter’s feast….

“…No, I’ll take my revenge myself. With my own hands.”

As if he had expected Livia’s resolute answer, Triton let out a light laugh.

“There’s no need to answer so hastily, Livia.”

He tapped the pearl anklet bound to Livia’s ankle with his cool fingertips as he spoke.

“There are still more white pearls than not.”



The short outing came to an end.

Livia returned to the golden castle without giving Triton a clear answer. As soon as they returned to the castle, his close subordinates flocked to him and conveyed something serious.

That was the first time Livia saw Triton’s face become quite serious.

“Stay here quietly while I’m gone, Livia. It might take several days.”

Though she couldn’t understand where he was going that would take several days, she didn’t ask anything.

She had her own things to think about and investigate.

The fortunate thing was that the person who could answer what she was looking for wasn’t far away.

“…What? Echidna?”

Audike, who had come to serve food, widened her eyes at Livia’s question.

Since that day, after Livia had been harmed by Letis, Audike had taken charge of all services related to Livia.

Having slept on the streets before, she couldn’t understand what kind of service she needed. She had said several times that she didn’t need any service, but Audike had instead grabbed Livia and said desperately:

“Just let me do this. There are many harder jobs outside. If you really care about me, you shouldn’t kick me out of here, Livia.”

When she put it that way, she couldn’t send her away….

Anyway, it wasn’t bad having someone to talk to during the boring times when Triton was away. Above all, Audike knew many things from working at the castle for a long time.

“You want to know about that woman? I thought you would know her better than me…?”

“Me?”

When she asked in surprise, Audike carefully added:

“You have that woman’s golden dagger, don’t you?”

Ah, the golden dagger…. So there were rumors about that.

Come to think of it, Audike had also been at that feast where Livia first fell into the sea. At that feast above the sea where she first pointed a knife at Triton….

Now that she thought about it, she remembered how Triton and his subordinates had been surprised to see the golden dagger. How did Echidna come to possess this knife that could harm gods?

“I actually don’t know much. I just… happened to get it. So could you tell me what you know?”

“Really? Well…. Actually, I don’t know that much either. Let me tell you what I do know….”

Audike continued carefully. The story wasn’t long, but it was intense.

Chrysaor, the warrior born between Medusa and Poseidon. The golden dagger originally belonged to him, and he was said to have been holding it when he was born.

But… Chrysaor, backed by Poseidon’s affection, began subtly claiming ownership of the sea, which provoked Amphitrite, the mother of the sea.

No one could breathe in this sea without the great mother’s approval. Even if it was Chrysaor who carried Poseidon’s blood.

In the end, he was driven from the sea. There were stories that he became king of a country, and rumors that he was killed by Amphitrite when he tried to return to the sea, unable to accept his exile, but they were all just rumors.

Just when things seemed to have quieted down, one day a woman appeared claiming to be Chrysaor’s daughter. A beautiful woman with a snake’s tail, a suspicious nymph who served sorcery.

“I too am a member of the sea. Isn’t it natural for one who belongs to the sea to long for water? My father is already gone, so please accept me. Please let me stay in the castle.”

Echidna, who had been a gentle and beautiful woman, showed her true colors from the time Poseidon and Amphitrite withdrew to their own castle and completely handed over control of this sea to Triton.

She spread rumors that she and Triton had fallen in love, pretended to accidentally visit his bedroom, and coveted the trident….

Then she failed in her attempt to put a spell on Triton to claim him and the trident.

They thought she had died after falling into an eternal labyrinth like that, but then Livia appeared carrying her golden dagger….

“…So Echidna really shared blood with the sea gods?”

“Well, yes. Surprising but it’s true. That’s probably why she has such strange powers.”

“Then, the same bloodline… Ah, never mind. That’s just how gods are.”

“Mm. Right. Sharing blood isn’t that important to gods. It’s something we can’t understand.”

Audike also shrugged as she spoke.

After hearing her words, Livia became more confused. Though Echidna had offered to exchange revenge with her life as collateral… her revenge was too unreasonable.

In the end, wasn’t it just that she harbored resentment after failing when she recklessly acted on her own vain desires? Was it really… right to stab Triton’s heart for such a woman?

Livia felt dizzy with a mix of self-loathing and confusion. While feeling she shouldn’t have learned about this, she simultaneously thought about how she had blindly rushed at him, blinded by revenge.

Yet Triton, knowing all this, had told her his weakness, inviting her to try stabbing his heart. Even if his words were underlaid with arrogance that she wouldn’t succeed, he had still let her try to attack him.

What if I really succeeded then….

At that thought, Livia froze in shock.

Am I actually worried about him getting hurt right now? It was absurd. How could I be so two-faced?

Livia was left alone in his bedroom, filled with self-mockery. The night was deep. As Triton had said, he had already been gone for two days.

Two more pearls that Triton had bound to her ankle had changed color. That night, Livia tossed and turned, unable to properly fall asleep. Though she wasn’t particularly suffering, her confused mind wouldn’t let her sleep.

She greeted the morning with dark circles under her eyes. Just as she thought she couldn’t possibly eat breakfast with her queasy stomach, a nymph entered carrying a large plate of food.

But it wasn’t Audike. It was Letis, the very nymph who had previously played that nasty trick with Livia’s food.

Livia frowned as she watched Letis casually walk in. Audike had said Letis no longer came to the palace.

So why had that woman come in? As she stared intently at her, harboring doubts, Letis curved her lips and said:

“How nice to see you living in such luxury, Livia.”

The witch’s chilling voice pierced Livia’s ears.

The cave was located deep in the ocean.

The pressure was high enough to crush bodies, and the floor was boiling hot….

It was hidden beneath the pillar of an underwater volcano. No wonder even Triton’s trusted subordinates couldn’t easily find it. If Dugong hadn’t accidentally discovered suspicious traces while searching for pearls, it might have remained buried until now.

“No matter how I thought about it, finding a waist ornament used by castle nymphs in such a place was very strange. And sure enough…!”

Dugong spoke energetically beside Triton as he led the way. His head was held so high that you could see his whiskers trembling as they fluttered in the currents.

Always so dramatic.

Watching his colleague take such joy in a small achievement, Actius shook his head and let out a small laugh. Though he wanted to tease him seeing how proud he was, he decided to let him enjoy this moment of satisfaction since it was his first achievement in 100 years.

Echidna who used Hecate’s sorcery.

The witch who returned alive from the underworld….

Triton and his subordinates arrived at the cave where Echidna was presumed to be hiding. The cave, immersed in quiet darkness, was suspicious in how it felt devoid of any life force and eerily empty. Perhaps what makes the darkness at the bottom frightening is how difficult it is to guess what it conceals.

Triton’s eyes narrowed in front of the cave. Actius and Dugong, gripping their weapons tightly, entered the cave first as if to guard him. Triton’s lips twisted as he quietly watched them.

“…We’re too late.”

True to his words, a scream burst from Dugong who had entered first.

“Ahhh! She’s gone! No, no, why isn’t she here?!”

Dugong roared as if wronged, having entered to boast about his achievement in 100 years. Actius and his subordinates who were examining the interior also looked at Triton, who had entered the cave a step behind them, and spoke with apparent confusion.

“…We’ve searched the cave thoroughly but she’s not here. It seems she noticed and fled.”

“She left in a hurry. Looking at how she couldn’t erase all traces before disappearing.”

“Her instincts are remarkable. How she knew…”

“That’s how she’s managed to survive until now…. She couldn’t have gone far. Track her down, Actius.”

“Yes sir!”

Actius left the cave without delay. His subordinates who had been waiting spread out in all directions at his command.

Triton carefully examined the cave where Echidna had been. Though they hadn’t caught her, finding traces of her presence wasn’t a bad harvest. Triton knelt on one knee and examined the magical traces remaining on the cave floor.

Red magical circles emanating malevolent energy….

A sticky mixture of all kinds of blood had seeped into the floor without mixing with the seawater. What kind of spell was it for? As Triton carefully examined the inside of the intricately drawn magical circles, his eyes suddenly caught several red threads buried in the floor.

‘This is….’

No, looking closely, these weren’t threads but red hair.

Could it be. A cold wind crept into Triton’s heart as he thought of someone, but it didn’t last long. As soon as he held the hair and examined it closely, he immediately noticed it wasn’t the hair of the person he was thinking of.

This hair belonged to someone long dead, and the color was slightly different from Livia’s hair.

If Livia’s hair was the color of flames burning under the sunset, this was blood-red like a ripe pomegranate.

If Livia’s abundant hair was warm and brave like flames, this was just like cold, congealed blood.

Livia’s rich hair might seem ordinary at first glance, but the more closely you looked at it, the more you saw it was a conceptual and enchanting red that no one could easily copy or imitate.

How could such a crude thing be compared to that color? They were completely different. It was laughable that he had mistaken it even for a moment.

Then whose hair was this….

Triton’s eyes shone a bit more clearly as he examined the inner cave. Of course, magic wasn’t his domain, and he had never wanted to know about it. However, he knew one perfect ally who would likely know about these things well.

“Dugong.”

“Yes, Lord Triton!”

“I need to go somewhere. So make sure you investigate every corner of this place thoroughly.”

“I will investigate down to the last piece of moss!”

Dugong answered with firm determination. Triton scraped up part of the magical circle, trapped it in a water droplet, and left the cave.

Amphitrite’s castle was quite far from this sea, so he needed to hurry.



‘This can’t be.’

Livia stared at the woman before her with shocked eyes and unconsciously stumbled backward. Though she quickly glanced around, even the sharks that had been constantly following her were nowhere to be seen.

Hiding her tension, Livia spoke to Echidna.

“How did you get in here?”

“Oh, my child. It wasn’t easy. If he hadn’t found my cave, I probably wouldn’t have dared come here… Ironically, thanks to him emptying this place, I could enter the castle.”

The witch in the form of a young nymph burst into giggles.

No matter whose shell she wore, the core inside was Echidna.

After laughing for a while with a voice like scratching at one’s throat, the witch raised her eyes filled with madness to stare at Livia.

As her eyes swept over Livia’s tense form from head to toe, a sinister energy gathered in them before Echidna smiled with curved eyes.

“You’re wearing pretty clothes, Livia.”

Echidna spoke with excited demeanor as if she was very pleased with it.

“And wearing precious jewels on your ankle too.”

Her snake-like gleaming gaze fell on the pearls tied to Livia’s ankle.

“I told you to stab Triton’s heart, but you’ve taken his heart instead?”

Livia’s expression hardened at Echidna’s words. Echidna, who had been cheerfully spouting nonsense, approached Livia with light dancing steps.

“Whether you stab his heart or take it, anything is fine. As long as it leads to his destruction!!!”

“Nonsense. He doesn’t love me.”

Though Livia hurriedly denied it, her voice seemed not to reach the mad witch.

“Ah! Foolish Triton, stupid Triton! You’ve finally fallen in love with a human!”

Ahaha, Echidna laughed loudly as she spun around and around in place, dancing.

Unlike the laughter that rang out as if she was truly joyful, Echidna’s eyes weren’t laughing at all. Livia frowned and stepped back at that chilling discrepancy.

Echidna, who had been dancing around the huge bedroom like a fluttering ray, suddenly stopped.

She whirled her head to look at Livia, suddenly split her mouth in a long smile, and rushed at Livia while shouting.

“You precious thing, you lovely thing! You’ll really kill the sea god!”

Though Livia pushed her away in shock, black smoke that extended like a snake’s tail instantly wrapped around and pressed in on her.

“Ugh, let, go…! Kugh!”

Livia, who had reflexively tried to draw out the golden dagger in her wrist, hesitated.

The wound site had felt oddly hot for a while, but when Echidna came closer, it hurt as if burned.

She could feel the dagger thrashing inside her arm as if trying to burst through her flesh to return to its owner. She had an intuition that it would be of no help in attacking that woman.

“Yes, how did you win his heart? Ah, it doesn’t matter. A sea god dying at the hands of his loved one, what revenge could be more delightful than that!”

Echidna giggled as if she had lost her mind.

She was clearly insane.

It was chilling how she thought and concluded things as she pleased. One shouldn’t deal with a mad woman. Moreover, a mad witch. What could be more dangerous than that?

‘…Someone like that won’t properly fulfill a contract. No matter how I think about it, it’s right to consider the contract with that woman void.’

Triton had said he would find and eliminate Echidna. If he dealt with Echidna now that she had entered his castle…. Perhaps as he said, she could be freed from the contract with the witch. But before that, one thing.

“Echidna, what exactly did you do to my sister?”

Echidna, who had been cackling, suddenly stopped laughing and looked at Livia.

At that moment, cracks appeared across Letis’s mask that she was wearing. Though that sight was incredibly grotesque, like flesh splitting and falling away, Livia didn’t avert her gaze.

Echidna said with a grin.

“Ah, your sister… I don’t know what method was used, but the one who killed my father who was guarding the underworld and took her away, you mean your sister?”

Echidna’s father? Then… could that old man have been Chrysaor?

Livia recalled the old man she had met in the underworld. Though he had seemed to be particularly close with Echidna, he had said he wasn’t sent by her.

‘Specifically, he said it was half right and half wrong.’

Then did that mean not that Echidna had sent him, but that he had been waiting there for Livia whom Echidna would send….

Echidna, who had been quietly observing Livia’s expression, spoke with a chilling laugh as if she had read her thoughts.

“Don’t worry. I’m not devastated by my father’s death, as I don’t have such great affection to be so attached to family like you people. Still, finding him when I had hidden him so carefully was truly remarkable. How did you do it?”



“Well, I didn’t expect you to answer anyway, so never mind. More importantly…. You asked what I did to your sister?”

Echidna hunched her shoulders in laughter as if thinking of something amusing and answered in a cheerful voice.

“Some poisons spread through the soul rather than the body. Especially your sister’s soul, being so pure and young, the poison spread so quickly…. It seeped into her soul in an instant. Even I was surprised by the speed!”

The cackling laughter pierced Livia’s ears like needles.

Echidna’s words, delivered as if speaking of a slightly nasty prank, struck Livia’s heart like hot arrows, burning and sharp.

“How could you do such a thing…!!!”

Though Livia burst out in anger with a scream mixed with tears, for some reason no one came to where they were.

It seemed Echidna had done something to this area.

Why did Echidna appear when Triton wasn’t here? No, Echidna must have targeted the time when Triton would be away.

It’s frustrating, so frustrating! Why don’t I have the power to defeat this witch?

Livia thrashed her whole body, struggling to break free from the witch’s spell.

The black smoke that had seemed immovable felt like it was loosening slightly with each of Livia’s movements.

“What is this…?”

It was Echidna who was bewildered. Even though she had weakened, this wasn’t magic that could be broken by mere human strength.

How could this woman resist her power? It was astounding to see a mere human opposing her power like some demigod with special abilities.

At that moment, something flashed through Echidna’s mind. Her lips twisted in disbelief.

“Aha, I see. Triton has been feeding you all sorts of good things, hasn’t he?”

Though Echidna asked, Livia had neither the intention nor composure to answer.

Her struggling hands finally reached near her skirt hem. Livia’s eyes flew open as she grabbed what she had tied to her outer thigh just in case, and swung it at Echidna who was approaching.

“Ugh!”

With a tearing sound, Echidna groaned while covering her face with both hands.

“You, you…. Damn bitch!”

With a vulgar curse, Echidna lunged at Livia.

Her face, which had been cracking and crumbling, completely shattered from her attack, fully revealing her hideous appearance. And that wasn’t all – dark red blood trickled down from where sharp teeth had grazed her cheek.

“Damn it! What were you holding in your hand!”

Echidna’s face froze as she twisted Livia’s wrist to see what she had been holding. A sharp shark’s tooth of unknown origin was clutched in Livia’s hand.

“I had an ominous feeling, so I’ve been keeping it strapped to my thigh for the past few days.”

Livia smiled with pale face, lifting her trembling lips. Seeing her attack had worked, a faint pleasure welled up.

“You wench…!”

In that moment, Echidna, unable to contain her anger, lunged to strangle Livia. Though strong pressure was felt, it was futile with Echidna’s hands that had almost no fingers left.

Black smoke wrapped around Livia’s neck in place of her hands, but it wasn’t enough to prevent breathing. The faint light protecting Livia’s body helped too.

“The blessing of Styx…?”

Echidna too seemed to recognize it as she stared at Livia with incredulous eyes. It was amazing how many times this human woman had surprised her in this brief moment.

Soon after, the strength in the hands choking Livia’s neck loosened. Rather than anger, which had disappeared as if washed away, joy spread across her face.

“You really are quite something. To think you obtained the blessing of Styx while you were in the underworld. Well, being this cunning must be how you won Triton’s heart too.”

Echidna let out a satisfied laugh and whispered.

“I am not your enemy. Think carefully. Don’t you want to save your sister? Then I’ll tell you how.”

She held out a ruby-like red bead in front of Livia, who had frozen like ice. And when she blew on it with a “hoo,” a black leather strap appeared on the bead.

Echidna put it around Livia’s neck herself while whispering.

“Here, just feed this to Triton and make him say he loves you.”

“…As I’ve said many times, he doesn’t love me.”

Though Livia spoke through gritted teeth, her words had no effect on Echidna.

“What a foolish answer. A god who despised humans gave his bedchamber to that ‘human.’ He brings food personally prepared from land to feed you at every meal, and though countless beautiful goddesses throw themselves at him naked, he raises his cock  that never stirred for them and sucks and licks for days on end. You think this isn’t affection, then what is it? Just some passing desire?”

The witch’s words felt like they were striking the back of Livia’s head.

Though she thought it definitely wasn’t love, no words came to mind that could refute Echidna’s words.

Her mind was spinning in confusion. Reason screamed to deny such words from a witch, but something else on the opposite side spoke differently. That the witch’s suspicions might not be completely groundless….

It wasn’t affection. It couldn’t be.

But when she recalled his laughter that occasionally passed by, his touch caressing her skin, her nape strangely grew cold.

“You are my human, Livia.”

Yes. Even if it wasn’t love, there was clearly possessiveness.

Every touch that enveloped her entirely proved that.

She remembered his heat that penetrated and split her flesh so frighteningly. She remembered those persistent hands that wouldn’t let go even after she fainted, holding her close.

Love…? She wasn’t sure about that, but what was certain was that Triton wanted to dominate, possess, and control her.

Hadn’t he delighted in seeing her suffer through his trials, seeing her sob and shudder at his touch?

Those gazes persistently following her every reaction to his gestures….

In all of Triton’s actions, she felt his will to possess her soul completely.

To some extent… yes, to some extent his will seemed to have worked on her.

Livia’s feelings toward Triton were also swaying chaotically like ripples in the wind….

But could that lustful desire really be called love? As he said, wasn’t she just his plaything?

No, she didn’t know. She was confused. Everything felt pitch black before her eyes.

“Think carefully. Though Triton might break, he won’t completely vanish… but your sister’s soul is continuing to corrode and break even now. If you want to save that child, you must listen to me.”

Stay calm. If she didn’t keep her mind straight, she would only be swayed by this mad woman. After taking a short breath, Livia asked in a trembling voice.

“…How can I trust you?”

“Do you have a choice? The fact that your sister’s soul is corroding is true. Will you let your sister’s soul be destroyed like this?”

“…She’s already dead anyway.”

Livia spoke flatly, trying not to think about Lete.

What she needed to remember now wasn’t her poor brother, but Zagreus’s promise that he would surely bring the child’s soul back to her side.

“Oh reaally?”

Though the witch mocked Livia’s bluff, Livia continued to feign composure.

If she wavered here, she would gain nothing. Seeing how Echidna had pursued her all the way to Triton’s castle, it was clear that she was the one who was desperate.

“As you know, I have a god of the underworld helping me. Even if it takes time, if I get a little help… No, if Triton loves me as you say, I can just ask him for help. Right? Without your help, I can save my sister.”

In that moment, Echidna’s eyes flashed fiercely. Grinding her teeth and smiling ferociously, she whispered to Livia.

“I called you cunning… are you threatening me?”

“You and I have already betrayed each other. We can’t be together anymore anyway. So just… let me go.”

Livia tried to speak without her voice trembling, but it shook a little anyway.

As if not missing that moment, Echidna’s eyes, which had been quietly staring at Livia, glinted sharply.

“How foolish. Did you think I hadn’t considered that much? Do you think a contract bound by blood could be broken by betrayal? The moment you held my dagger and I received your blood, we formed a ‘bond’ that can’t be broken even in death. Even if you refuse.”

“What do you mean?”

“It means this contract will continue eternally until you split Triton’s heart.”

Her heart sank at those worst possible words.

Just as she was about to shout at her to stop talking nonsense, a pain like having her wrist cut with a knife stopped her.

“Hah…!”

She clenched her teeth to hold back the groan that was about to burst out. Looking down with contorted eyes, black smoke rose from the wound on her wrist where Echidna’s golden dagger had seeped in.

The black smoke, very similar to when Echidna used her sorcery, violently ground into her flesh as if proving all the witch’s words were true.

“Yes… you mentioned time was the issue? You’re right. Time is the issue. Which will be faster – him saving your sister, or my poison killing her? Hmm? If you don’t care, it doesn’t matter to me either. As you said, she’s already dead, what does it matter if one soul dies? And….”

Echidna, who had been muttering rapidly as if she’d lost her mind, suddenly spoke in a meaningful voice.

“You don’t think I have no other cards to play, do you?”

…She had been wrong. This was a fight that was unfavorable to her.

Though she tried to put on a brave front, now she had to accept reality. Livia glared at the witch while gritting her teeth that threatened to chatter. Sensing victory, Echidna let out a laugh and poured a wicked voice into Livia’s ear.

“Ailar.”

The incomprehensible word burrowed into Livia’s ear and was engraved on her soul. Echidna whispered beside Livia, who had frozen with a start.

“Whisper it when you meet your brother’s soul. It’s a spell that temporarily detoxifies the soul. Oh, don’t expect more. I’ve made it so it can only be used once, so it won’t work again.”

As Echidna stepped back, waves like black smoke rose behind her.

“You say you’ll ask Triton for help? Go ahead, try it. If you want to see your brother’s soul pickled in evil poison and thrown into eternal torment!”

Though the witch’s form completely disappeared into the black waves in an instant, her voice shook Livia’s mind like the lingering aftermath of a storm.

“I’m not hungry. But sister looks hungry. Eat this.”

“Sister’s name is now Livia. Livia Horn! Sister is part of our family now!”

Lete….

Livia collapsed on the spot as if all strength had left her body, covering her pale face with one hand. An immense sense of powerlessness heavily pressed down on her delicate shoulders.



Mother’s sea was vast and desolate.

It was much bluer and more sparkling than the Aegean Sea where Triton resided, and with no islands or continents nearby, it was a place where only the sea stretched endlessly.

Like a sky without a single cloud, beneath a horizon without a single reef protruding, dwelled Amphitrite – daughter of the ocean, wife of Poseidon, and Triton’s birth mother.

Amphitrite’s palace, adorned with crystals containing the color of water, pearls, and red coral, had a different elegance from Triton’s golden castle which gave off a grand and splendid feeling. Of course, since it was a space where only females existed, Triton’s impression might have been particularly gentle.

As Triton entered the palace, tiny cute shrimp swirled around him like a whirlpool, performing a welcoming dance.

Though it was quite adorable and touching to see these finger-sized creatures with their tiny bean-like eyes twinkling as they performed for the great guardian of the sea, unfortunately, their king had no time to enjoy such things now.

At Triton’s light gesture, the small crustaceans flailed away into the distance. He thought he heard something like a scream, but pretended not to hear it as he headed to the top of the palace.

Every time he moved and created waves, secretive gazes followed him. Those who shyly hid their forms behind pillars and rocks observed Triton with curious eyes. Though it was natural, it was annoying every time.

Triton was the only male allowed in this place that was practically a female sanctuary.

Amphitrite didn’t even allow her husband into her palace.

She harshly criticized him, saying it was obvious that unwanted bastards would be created in abundance if his seed were to be released in her sea.

The emperor, who wielded his lower body no less than Zeus, respected his wife’s opinion without objection.

The reason Amphitrite allowed Triton’s entry was not only because he was her beloved firstborn, but also because he had never once done anything that displeased her eyes.

Especially in terms of cleanliness, tranquility, and modesty, which she valued most, no one had satisfied her more than her son.

A god who doesn’t carelessly spread his seed while caught up in pleasure. How precious a man he was.

Of course, being her child, there was absolutely no doubt about his functionality in that regard. This was purely the noble result achieved by Triton’s high will and spirit.

Amphitrite highly valued Triton’s purity. That’s why her son could be the only male allowed to enter the Crystal Palace.

This also meant that Triton was Amphitrite’s most cherished one.

“Welcome, Triton. It’s been a while.”

Amphitrite welcomed her son while lying on her side on a red anemone carpet where sunlight shone through transparently.

Dolphins adorned in all sorts of colors swirled around her, but contradictorily, her tail was more similar to a shark’s than a whale’s.

The mermaids surrounding the queen squealed and blushed at Triton’s appearance.

Amphitrite patted the mermaids’ backs as if to calm the small commotion, and with a slow gesture, sent them all outside.

Only he and his mother remained at the very top floor of the palace spire that was open on all sides, and only then did Triton offer a brief greeting to his mother.

“You seem to be doing well as always.”

“Indeed. As I have for thousands of years.”

The boredom underlying her languid voice was a chronic and hereditary disease of the gods.

She looked at her son with half-closed eyes as if about to yawn, then suddenly curled up the corners of her mouth in a smile and said.

“My son’s face looks a bit different from before. Perhaps because of that human?”

“It’s convenient that there’s nothing to explain.”

“As you know…. The flowing seawater is quite talkative. So, what about that human child brings you to seek me?”

Though the queen’s voice was soft, it was sharp. At her implicit signal to get to the point without dawdling, Triton began speaking to Amphitrite without delay.

“I found this in Echidna’s cave. It seems to be a very old spell… and you know these things better than I do, Mother.”

At one gesture from Triton, the seawater surged and a heavy rock dropped down between them with a thud. Triton had torn out the entire floor where the magical circle was drawn from the cave and brought it to present before his mother.

Amphitrite blew away the slight dirt dust that floated up with a “hoo” and began examining what Triton had brought carefully. Blue eyes that were similar to Triton’s but shone a bit more brightly glinted darkly, and her red lips twisted upward.

“This is a very old spell.”

“Do you know what it is?”

To Triton’s question, Amphitrite nodded slightly and began an old tale in a singing-like voice.

“She was probably the first mermaid to fall in love with a human. One with a very beautiful voice…. Foolishly, she wanted to have legs. She who wanted to have the same form as him went to a witch and obtained legs, but had to give up her voice.”

Amphitrite spoke bitterly.

It was a voice she too had loved very much, but it disappeared forever. All for the sake of obtaining just one love….

“The witch actually had no intention of harming that young mermaid. She thought the mermaid’s unrequited love would cool quickly once she went outside the sea. Because humans and mermaids are different in every way. She thought she would only be disappointed as she experienced it… But that wasn’t the case. Neither the witch nor anyone else expected that love to grow more fierce.”

Amphitrite’s eyes grew hazy at the long-ago past that came to mind.

“The witch… actually wanted the mermaid to return. To return and sing again…. So she finally begged the gods and found a way for that mermaid to return to the sea. One that could succeed if only she killed that love and broke that heart.”

However, the small and lovely mermaid could not kill the person she loved even though he did not love her. That would have been an act of defiling her own heart that loved him, a betrayal.

And so the mermaid chose tragedy to protect him and protect her love. Even if she would become sea foam because of it….

Haah.

When Amphitrite let out a long sigh, small bubbles rose up boiling.

As if even bringing up that story made her troubled, she touched her forehead but then smiled as if shaking it off and stared at Triton.

“Her story has become very famous now, so you must know the rest.”

Regret showed on Amphitrite’s face as she smiled wryly. Triton intuitively realized that this mermaid’s story was about someone his mother knew.

“I still don’t understand what she called love, Triton. What exactly is it that makes one rush to change destiny, and yearn for love while going between life and death. But, my son….”

Suddenly Amphitrite raised her head to stare at Triton. Deep, quiet eyes gazed penetratingly at the god of the sea who sparkled beautifully as if he were part of the Crystal Palace.

“What about you?”

The meaningful voice pierced Triton’s ears.

“Do you know what love is or what kind of thing it is? Or perhaps….”

A chilling voice seeped in as if gently pressing down on his hearing.

“Has it already infected you?”

Amphitrite’s cool gaze as she posed the question was quite sharp, but underlying it was infinite trust and faith in Triton.

Despite having such fulfilled eyes toward her child, the mother said she didn’t understand love. Perhaps the love she spoke of was different from the affection one feels for blood relatives or the tender feelings one has for companions.

Like the heart of that mermaid who gave her voice to a witch and obtained legs just to be by his side for a moment, it must be such an intense feeling that one would burn themselves even without receiving the same feelings in return.

‘Love?’

Triton quietly rolled the single word his mother had thrown out around in his mouth.

Love. Love. Love….

Though the word that wrapped softly around his tongue felt very unfamiliar, it wasn’t awkward. Revenge, joy, delight, hatred…. What difference was there between these and this thing called love?

It was just one of the common emotions felt by anyone with a soul, and part of the poison coating Eros’s arrowheads. A very powerful poison that even Eros, the owner of the arrows, couldn’t neutralize.

Triton recalled stories of gods who had fallen in love.

Among them, who had truly loved?

Zeus’s love was too easy, Poseidon’s love was persistent, and Hades’s love was violent. Yet they called these different forms of action ‘love.’

Yes. Even such seemingly frivolous raw emotions were love.

Love….

Triton rolled that word on his tongue once more, adding another name to it.

Livia.

The two words that blended softly melted into Triton’s mouth as if becoming one. It wasn’t awkward. It had a not unpleasant sound.

Then am I in love with that woman?

Well… is that what this is? There were too many questionable parts to affirm it, and too many unclear corners to deny it.

Livia, what are you to me?

Simply a temptress who makes me feel lust? Or a challenger of my trials who happened to roll in?

Whatever she was, there was no doubt that Livia’s existence had sprouted like a splinter in one corner of his heart.

However, conversely, if he imagined her looking at him with love-struck eyes like other humans….

Light flashed like lightning in Triton’s mind.

A silent thunderstorm passed through him.

Over his slowly closing and opening vision, Livia’s recent image remained like an afterimage.

“It’s a wonderful taste, Triton.”

That moment when those eyes that had always been busy glaring at him fiercely curved brilliantly…. That moment when they spent meaningless time sharing heat all night and filling each other’s hungry stomachs with fruit.

At that time, you smiled at me. For the first time. With wide-open eyes containing me, you even sent a playful glance for a moment. Like ordinary humans dealing with lovers, you burst into laughter in my arms.

How did I feel then…. It was quite good, I think.

A strange fullness welled up as if something great had been achieved just from one laugh.

An urgency that he alone should see this made him anxious.

Those eyes should contain only me, that body temperature should be felt only by me, and exchanging that saliva should be with me alone.

Livia’s hair fluttering in the wind was more dazzling than the blazing sun, and that laughter ringing through the moistureless air was clear and enchanting like a harp performance.

On land, among soil and air and sunlight, the woman shone more beautifully and revealed her enchanting self.

However, Triton found this extremely irritating.

The sea should have been what made her shine the most. He hoped that what Livia missed most would be the sea.

You should have been happy by my side, and sad by my side. Making you laugh or cry should have been my role alone.

Yes.

A deep and intense possessiveness that he had never felt before boiled in Triton’s heart.

Though his face showed a gentle smile, inside he was riddled with dirty and sticky desire and possessiveness, considering how to block off everything around her.

Indeed, he needed to drag her into the sea.

There were too many gods who could reach her outside the water. Then how many humans must there be.

If this pathetic ecstasy, this unfamiliar and unreasonable desire is love….

If this sticky, violent, persistent and willing heart is love.

Yes, I would not be remiss in daring to call it love for you.

Though I can’t be certain yet…. But why is certainty needed?

If I want her by my side, I just need to keep her there, and if I don’t want to show her to anyone else, I just need to confine her by my side.

And so, as I keep her by my side until I tire of her, perhaps there will come a moment when I become certain.

It wouldn’t be too late to draw conclusions then.

His vision became clear as if a lighthouse had been erected in his foggy mind. Everything became lucid, like watching the western sky gradually brighten.

I will possess that woman.

I will remove anything that might interfere with that and possess her completely. Since she’s such a lovely thing that has caught my eye, I’ll cherish her until I tire of her.

No, even if I someday tire of that woman, she was mine. Even if I grew tired of her, the mere thought of another god or human standing beside Livia was intolerable.

So before he could tire of her, he thought he should make her immortal so she couldn’t escape even through death.

Even if he had to steal the nectar and ambrosia that the Olympian gods try so hard to hide… perhaps, even if he had to sacrifice something for it….

As his thoughts stretched that far, Triton belatedly realized he had fallen into too deep contemplation in front of his mother.

When he raised his head to look at the goddess, Amphitrite was gazing at him with a quiet smile.

He noticed that many meanings were contained in the tip of his mother’s seductively curved lips.

“Seeing how you, who was always certain about everything, have no answer, it seems there’s no room for doubt anymore.”

The goddess muttered in a calm voice as if this was what she had expected, not surprised at all. However, undisguised concern showed in her eyes as she gazed at Triton.

“People often say gods are great and humans are foolish, but that is wrong.”



“Gods merely appear great because they have few occasions to make mistakes, and humans merely appear foolish because they have much to lose even from small mistakes, making them hasty.”

“I don’t understand what you’re trying to say, Mother.”

“I’m saying that gods can be just as foolish, my son.”

Triton stared at the goddess with an amused face. Wasn’t foolishness something said only of humans who make mistakes? He was not one to ruin things with small mistakes.

“If humans have hastiness, gods have the trap of arrogance.”

Amphitrite added with a smile, as if she could clearly see what Triton was thinking.

“Why do you think the mermaid who loved a human died? Was it because she sacrificed herself for the human as is widely known?”

Amphitrite’s gentle voice suddenly turned cold.

“No. That beautiful mermaid was weak. She who had only received love from everyone met someone who didn’t love her for the first time. What was that single rejection that she became frustrated and gave up on her future? She didn’t have the courage to face the worst ending that her noble love would meet.”

Triton quietly gazed at Amphitrite, trying to grasp her intentions. When he showed through silence that he was listening attentively to her words, she quietly continued.

“I would have been different, Triton.”

Amphitrite’s eyes sank darkly as she stared into space.

“I would have made that human mine somehow. No matter what methods I had to use, I would have surely made him mine and kept him by my side. Made him mine, completely mine!”

Fierce thunder raged in the goddess’s eyes.

The blackened sea surges greedily, swallowing islands and ships. As if nothing loved could be let go, as if only satisfied when everything was put into its belly.

Her eyes turned to the magical circle Triton had brought. Though her glinting eyes were fierce, her lips curved up leisurely.

“That is a spell that will lead to self-destruction unless you stab the heart of the one you love.”

“…Self-destruction?”

“Like the mermaid did, if she cannot stab your heart, that child will eventually turn to sea foam.”

Triton’s eyes twitched at Amphitrite’s words. He knew his heart had to be split, but he hadn’t thought that if that failed, Livia would turn to sea foam.

It was a much more vicious spell than he had thought.

“Triton, I don’t want you to embrace the bones of the human you hold in your heart after they die, or to become immortal yet not truly alive. We are different from those promiscuous ones up there. We want only one companion for life. That is a trait and curse engraved in our blood and flesh.”

Triton also agreed with Amphitrite’s words.

How else could it be explained that no one had wanted him for such a long time? And that his body, which had not stirred for such a long time, grew hot only for one….

“No rock can block the waves. The same goes for fate and destiny. Your soul has already chosen its companion, and no one can stop that. Never let go of what you want.”

Amphitrite declared fiercely.

Triton’s eyes sank heavily as if inheriting her gaze.

Smirking, he lightly waved his hand and turned the stone engraved with the witch’s spell to powder. Even with such a wicked spell cast, Echidna’s end would be little different from this.

Amphitrite was right. He needed to make his human more thoroughly and perfectly his own.

Not just that fragrant and soft flesh, but also that strong soul and fierce spirit.

‘Completely mine….’

To make you completely mine, what acts might I be capable of?

Could I perhaps even tear out my own heart and offer it to you? For my small and beautiful human who no longer appears shabby?

…Yes, if it comes to that.

Then I would have to acknowledge it.

That this sticky and dirty emotion is certainly love too.

After the witch disappeared, Livia remained sitting there for a long time.

She was both exhausted and suddenly everything felt empty, so she just sat quietly staring blankly into space.

She had jumped into this for family revenge, but in the end, she ended up hurting family even after death. The soul of beloved Lete, her young brother….

Though she sat frozen like a stone, soaked in futility, time flowed like running water.

When the shadows in the room slowly changed direction and turned black, Livia noticed a familiar shadow cast on the floor and raised her head.

Through the pillared window, she saw a black shark watching her.

“You….”

Where were you? You were following me around to the point of being annoying before, but where on earth were you earlier when you weren’t there…!

Though she wanted to cry out like that in surge of emotion, her heavy lips only quivered without moving.

The black shark, unaware of her feelings, circled outside the window trying to get her attention, but Livia just stared expressionlessly at the huge sea creature.

…This is ridiculous. Why am I resenting that shark, what is it to me?

After realizing that the black shark that had seemed so much like an enemy showed affection towards her, this feeling of considering that black shark as being on her side felt absurd.

You are truly selfish, Livia.

Swallowing a hollow laugh, Livia raised her heavy hand to brush her face. Suddenly she saw the black scar on her wrist.

Chrysaor’s blade and the mark of the contract with Echidna….

She thought it was a weapon protecting her, but it was actually a chain binding her. If she eliminated this thing that was the source of misfortune and proof of her foolishness, would the contract with Echidna be void?

With a terrifying grimace, Livia began scratching her wrist with her nails. Red lines were drawn across the white wrist, and soon blood began to rise.

At that moment, there was a thud and the wall shook.

Sympho, who had grown too large to enter the bedroom, urgently crashed against the pillar but couldn’t stop Livia’s fierce gestures.

“Ugh…!”

She just dug her nails in as if intending to completely tear off the flesh.

Like Triton had done once before, she wanted to gouge out her wrist and cut away the black scar. At least until she saw the black scar climbing up her skin over where the flesh had been scraped away….

“…Ha!”

Red blood dripped down her wrist. With her flesh stuck under her nails, Livia burst into an empty laugh.

I can’t escape. This much isn’t enough to escape the witch! Damn it!

Clutching her wrist and laughing hollowly like a madwoman for a while, she staggered to her feet.

She was tired though she hadn’t done anything. She wanted to rest now.

It was fortunate that Triton was away. As she stumbled toward the bed, Livia suddenly stopped and looked at the black shark outside the window.

The huge sea creature’s anxious gaze was fixed on her. After hesitating, Livia approached the shark. blood spread with her every step, but she paid no attention.

They say human blood makes sharks violent, but perhaps because this shark was a divine messenger, it didn’t seem to react much to this amount of blood.

…Or maybe it was holding back.

Standing right in front of the shark, she hesitated for a moment before blurting out what she had been holding in her heart.

“Thank you.”

The shark stared at Livia as if asking what she meant.

“…I wanted to say it at least once someday.”

After hesitating, Livia raised her hand that wasn’t bleeding and stroked the shark’s pointed snout while speaking.

“I don’t know what about me appealed to you, but I know that you… helped me many times. And today too, I actually benefited from you.”

Looking around, Livia picked up the shark’s tooth that had fallen to the floor and showed it to Sympho while speaking.

“This. Your tooth… I kept it because it seemed a waste to throw away. It became a good weapon. Thank you.”

At Livia’s words, the shark blinked its eyes and suddenly leaped up high in place.

As she looked up startled, the shark that had returned to its place in an instant as if it had never jumped opened its jaws wide to show off its hundreds of teeth.

“…What?”

Karrrr!

The shark shook its large open head while spewing water bubbles.

Looking carefully, the place where she had pulled out the tooth was already filled with a firmly grown new tooth. They say sharks continue to grow new teeth even when they lose them, and it seems that was true.

Livia, who had been quietly looking down at the forest of teeth that was too fierce to call beautiful, added in a doubtful voice.

“…Are you saying I should take more?”

Karrrr!

This is like… only fierce in appearance, but acts like a neighborhood dog….

Livia, who had been letting out incredulous chuckles, patted the shark’s cheek and shook her head.

“It’s fine. I don’t need any more. Go now. I’m going to rest.”

After sending away the shark that circled its spot reluctantly, Livia lay down leaning against the bed.

Conscious that the bleeding had stopped, she lifted her wrist to see that the wound was already slowly healing.



Is this Echidna’s power, or Triton’s?

Whatever it was, she felt that she was definitely no longer an ordinary human now. Well, what ordinary human would return from the underworld anyway….

She smirked and forced her eyes closed, but her thoughts continued endlessly.

The contract with Echidna was close to a curse. The contract engraved on her soul wouldn’t break even if she cut off her arm. The witch told her to hear Triton say he loves her. She remembered the bead the witch had put around her neck. When she tore off the necklace and examined the bead, black liquid swirled and moved inside. It seems she’s supposed to feed this….

After glaring at the bead for a while, Livia threw it behind the bed where it couldn’t be seen.

If he says he loves her, would he turn to sea foam?

Wouldn’t it be better to just stab his heart instead? At least when stabbing his heart, he won’t die…. But can that word be trusted.

At the end of a sigh, Livia squeezed her eyes shut.

‘Lete, what should I do? I can’t give up on you, but I don’t want to be manipulated by the witch either.’

And above all….

She no longer felt the need to stab Triton as much as before.

Her heart fluttered in many directions like a storm brewing.

Though the knife handle was clearly in her grip, there wasn’t a single appealing choice. She closed her eyes wishing she wouldn’t wake up after falling asleep like this.

Fortunately, sleep came right away as if it had been waiting.



“Livia.”

It was a sudden dream.

Though she thought she had fallen asleep, Livia opened her eyes in the middle of the dream.

‘I’m sure I heard someone’s voice…?’

As she blinked her hazy eyes and looked around, she saw a horizon that had no discernible end. Being half-floating above the vast ocean, neither underwater nor on land.

Though it was clearly too deep to stand on the bottom, she was floating as if standing with her upper body sticking out of the sea.

As she was looking around, flicking water drops with her fingertips and wondering what kind of dream this was, a huge shadow was cast over her head and the voice that had called her into the dream was heard again.

“Livia.”

When she quickly raised her head at the familiar voice, she saw Zagreus with giant eagle wings flying toward her.

“Zagreus!”

Without realizing it, she called out his name loudly in joy. She felt a cool breeze as his wingbeats enveloped her.

As she made a visor with her hand and raised her head to see him with the sun at his back, Zagreus reached out toward Livia and said.

“Shall I pull you out from there, Livia?”

“…There?”

As she tilted her head not understanding what he meant, Zagreus whispered in a low, seductive voice.

“Yes, there. From that dark and pitch-black sea of greed.”

“Ah….”

Livia looked down at the sea beneath that wrapped around her waist. The ocean, beautiful at first glance, was so deep that one couldn’t tell what lay submerged below.

While the imperceptible depths were frightening to human eyes, that wasn’t the only emotion she felt. After all, not everything unknown had to be negative….

As she gazed quietly for a while, she could see light somewhere in those deep, dark depths. The brilliant silver light was like a lamp carved from moonlight, beautiful like the shimmer of sunlight reflecting off the water.

Perhaps, Triton… could you be waiting for me down there…?

Just as her body began to unconsciously lean toward the depths, Zagreus spoke.

“I wanted to keep meeting you. I was worried that you might not have received Demeter’s invitation. That you might not be able to find your way there properly. But no matter how many times I tried to enter your dreams, they just wouldn’t open.”

“Really? I didn’t know…. Ah! I think I’ll be able to go to the banquet. Don’t worry, Zagreus.”

“You can manage without my help? That’s a relief. But Livia, don’t you want to come out of the sea?”

His question sounded strange to her. It felt as if he was asking whether she had any intention of escaping from Triton’s grasp.

Livia looked back and forth between the sea she was immersed in and Zagreus above her with confused eyes.

“I….”

Before the hesitating Livia could give any answer, Zagreus hastily flapped his wings and approached her. The shadow of his large eagle wings completely covered Livia.

“No, Livia, you don’t have to answer. I think you should get out of there quickly.”

“What happens… if I leave like this?”

“Your physical body will remain in the sea while your soul comes with me. It was difficult until now because ‘his’ power was too close, but today it might be possible. So let’s hurry. Okay?”

“…Just my soul goes?”

“Don’t worry. The river of forgetfulness will wash away your concerns. You can forget all the complicated and difficult things. If you just forget, you’ll be at ease.”

His words about being at ease sounded incredibly appealing.

…Could it be? Would it be possible? If I could forget, could everything be undone?

“Let’s go see your younger sibling. You’re worried about them, aren’t you? What about your brother? You’ve heard that he became Charon’s ferryman, right? I’ll help you find his boat.”

Zagreus whispered enticingly as he extended his hand before Livia’s eyes. With his back to the sun, his darkly shadowed face couldn’t hide his urgency.

“Everyone you miss is there, Livia. Come with me. We can think about the consequences later.”

Lete, Iason….

The reason she started her revenge. The only ones who were warm and gentle in her desolate life. Her family whom she still desperately missed.

She wanted to see them so badly it made her heart ache. It was so frustrating and sad that she couldn’t even say goodbye before parting.

If possible, she wanted to greet them even for just a moment. She needed to thank them for taking in someone like her as family out of pity….

She wanted to tell them how much their sweet kindness had warmly embraced her, and that what they gave her was the only thing she ever needed… She should have told them that….

She felt so sorry that she couldn’t protect those who had protected her childhood. Foolishly, out of embarrassment, she had never even properly expressed her feelings to them.

Because of that carelessness, thinking this peaceful happiness would last forever….

So she wanted to meet them just one more time.

She wanted to finally deliver those greetings she had kept postponing, saying she was too shy and embarrassed throughout her life.

‘If I take this hand, could I meet them? If I follow this man….’

As Livia stared blankly at Zagreus’s outstretched hand, her eyes filled with misty moisture.

The thought of Triton in the sea was pushed aside by the hope of meeting her family whom she thought she would never see again.

“Really, can I meet them?”

“Of course, Livia. If you follow me now, I’ll make sure you meet them.”

His resolute whisper seemed quite reliable. As if enchanted, Livia slowly raised her hand.

Before she could rationally comprehend what it meant to abandon her body and let her soul depart, Livia’s hand moved toward his palm. Just before his large hand could grasp her small one,



A massive silver shark burst up from the sea, snatched her waist in an instant, and dragged her into the ocean.

“No! Livia!”

Zagreus’s voice, screaming her name like a shriek, penetrated her water-filled ears dully. Livia’s consciousness was pulled into the dark, deep abyss, frightening in its unknown depths.



What awakened her before consciousness was a sensation that rose with piercing sensitivity.

“Uh….”

A soaking wet tongue deeply licked up between her neatly closed folds. An eerie, strange sensation diligently hammered at her sleeping consciousness.

Livia twisted her waist, trying to close her trembling thighs, but her caught legs only spread wider.

“Ah… Huh….”

As her shyly parted flesh revealed a round bud, plump lips sucked it in without hesitation.

Unlike Livia’s burning hot core, the tongue licking and sucking her wet flesh was chillingly damp, making the sensation even more vivid.

Tsk, Chup, Chup….

The sounds of wet flesh tangling and sucking echoed clearly, producing a horrifyingly lewd sound.

“Hah, uh…!”

Livia, who had been bucking her hips, gasped, unable to hold back her moan. Her hazy consciousness fully returned, but she couldn’t tell if she was in her right mind or not.

Waking up from sleep with her legs wide open and her lower body being sucked. Far from waking up from a dream, it felt like she was being tormented by another ridiculous dream.

She definitely dreamt of Zagreus….

Her heavy eyelids still drooped as she stared blankly at the man positioned between her legs. A voice, suppressed to hold back a moan, whispered his name in disbelief.

“…Triton?”

Am I having another dream? He hasn’t come back yet….

Her drowsy mind, as if unable to accept the sight before her, spun slowly.

However, the moment Triton, who had raised his head at Livia’s call, met her eyes without a moment’s hesitation and stimulated her by licking her core, everything became clear.

Livia, her eyes wide open, hurriedly let out a moan and pushed his shoulder away.

“What are you doing… Haaah!”

“Shh.”

Triton, his gaze fixed on Livia, whispered softly as if to soothe her, and his broadly extended tongue dug and burrowed into her trembling flesh.

“Huk! W-why suddenly… Uh…!”

Startled, Livia twitched her hips as if to shake him off, but Triton was unmoved. No, he even firmly lifted her hips and buried his face in.

“My female smells of another male.”

His gaze still fixed on her face, he murmured incomprehensible words, his tongue darting. The cool tip of his tongue stimulated her clit repeatedly, and a tingling sensation began to heat up Livia’s lower body.

“What are you, talking…. Hah!”

“What kind of beast’s scent is this?”

“I don’t, I don’t know what you’re, talking… Eung, Hngh!”

His firmly planted tongue dug deep, exploring every corner of Livia’s flesh, and swirled.

At first, as if searching for something as he had said, it fumbled about, but at some point, it began to indulge in licking and sucking, as if intoxicated by the taste of her supple flesh.

Squish, squish…

The explicit sounds of wet flesh colliding and rubbing against each other erupted incessantly from between Livia’s legs.

Livia tried to stop him by wriggling her caught hips, but he was not a man to listen.

This beautiful and shameless god unhesitatingly rubbed her clit with the tip of his nose and sucked between her fluttering hole with a sound as if he were kissing it.

“Haahh… Uh, ugh…!”

At his sucking so powerfully that his cheeks seemed to cave in, Livia felt a fainting ecstasy and lifted her head. A delirious moan escaped her parted lips incessantly, but she had no time to care.

“Ugh! Haa… Tr-Triton! Stop, Hah! Ah, uh. Aah!”

The moment his swirling tongue stabbed deeply somewhere inside her, her mind went blank and her captured lower body trembled.

As the familiar feeling of climax approached, Livia took a deep breath, preparing for the oncoming pleasure. However, it was not the kind of sensation she could dare to endure, so no matter how hard she tried, she couldn’t hold back her scream-like moans.

“Tr-iton…! Heuk! Hngh!”

Along with tears, her fluids spurted from between her folds, which Triton’s tongue had meticulously licked and kneaded. She could feel the wetness trickling down her butocks and spine.

Livia, who had barely opened her flushed eyes to look down at him, flinched. He was staring at her with intense eyes, as if he hadn’t taken his eyes off her for a single moment.

“…Fortunately, it doesn’t seem to be leaking from here.”

Triton, who had been staring at Livia for a while, muttered, licking his wet lips with his tongue. Then, he closed his mouth over her flower, which was soaked red like a ripe persimmon, with a soft sound. Carefully lowering Livia’s limp lower body, he laid himself on top of her and met her gaze.

“Then….”

He sucked on Livia’s parted lips, kissing her chin, cheeks, earlobes, and finally whispered, his lips resting on her forehead.

“It’s here. Isn’t it, Livia?”

His lips, brushing against her cheek, added in a lower, darker voice.

“…The place that damned eagle bastard messed with.”


---

Continue in part 4!!
